The Easy Language 16 is only useful if you're already familiar with the language you wish to learn.  I've been studying French for months before buying this product and found it to be helpful when I'm getting rusty.  The only problem is that it's hard to make out what is being said because the sound is not clear.  The recorded speakers also don't bother to slow down to give you a chance to understand or repeat what is being said.  This is good cause it's like listening to an actual French speaker and not a robot, bad if you actually want to learn how to pronounce what is being said.  It will also go over basic French grammar but is totally useless if you don't already know basic French grammar.I also tried to use this to learn Japanese.  Unlike French, I'm not familiar with the Japanese language at all so trying to use this product to learn it became a nightmare.  If all you want to do is learn how to speak the language it does have a Romanized version of the words and phrases to make it easier to sound them out.  Unfortunately the basic Japanese grammar and Japanese alphabet are all written in Japanese.  For instance, in the grammar section it has the past, present and future "I am"  it's written in english then beside it it's written in Japanese.  You can't click them to have it sound out for you.  In the Japanese alphabet section all it has is the Japanese alphabet and you can click them to sound them out but you really have no clue what you are sounding out.  So it teaches you nothing about reading the language but the test they want you to take are purely in Japanese.  I do want to learn how to read, write and speak Japanese so none of this would be a problem if it actually taught you how to read, write, and speak Japanese!   So my guess would be that you really have to be familiar with Japanese (NOT the Romanized(Romanjj) version) already in order to use this product.  Because of my experiences with this product I would say get it only if you know the languages you're interested in and use it as a refresher and nothing more.  Since I am familiar with French this product was pretty helpful but if I used this as a starter for the language I probably would have quit.  I'm searching Amazon for better Japanese books. So if you want to actually learn a language look to the books with the language tapes and CD's</review_text>
My boss asked me to get this, so that he check out the Latin portion of it.What a waste!  The only Latin on this CD is *Latin* American Spanish.The interface was underwhelming. I needed to guess at what did what, because the controls are mostly icons. What's worse, there is no  menu bar at the top to help take the guess work out of using the program.Apparently though, the manufacturer did throw in an extra *not* listed on the back.  If you are learning the differences between US and UK English, its there!I gave this one star, only because I couldn't give it no stars</review_text>
I found this title messing around adding things to my wish list.  I only read the blurb on Amazon enough to see Haitian Creaole listed as one of the languages.  Today updating my wish list I took extra time to find out why this was rated so low since nearly every thing on my list is 4 stars or more!  How unfortunate to find out that others before me made the mistake I almost made buying this in hopes of it having Haitian Creole!  Very disappointing!!!!  The makers should be ashamed</review_text>
They have the hebrew backwards!! You are supposed to read hebrew right to left-the opposite of english and this cd has it left to right. I find it extremely confusing. I know how to read hebrew and I wanted to learn how to speak it.What a poor effort!</review_text>
I just bought and installed this CD with the hopes of learning some Haitian Creole, and I, too, couldn't find it.  There is absolutely nothing on the installation CD that mentions either Haiti or creole... except the jewel case which insists it's there.  I'm so dissapointed I haven't actually tested anything else out:  I consider this a VERY bad start</review_text>
I just bought this cd because I am learning Haitian creole, and that's one of the languages that is supposed to be on this cd. When I installed it, I was unable to find anything on the CD in Haitian creole, even though it is listed as one of the languages on the case. So it has been a complete waste of money for me, perhaps if I was interested in the other languages I could give it more stars.It also says in the blurb that u can use any of the 16 languages as the source language, but that is not possible either, u can only chooose a few of the languages as your source. I am very disappointed in the false advertising for this product. If anyone can find creole on this cd I would be happy to stand corrected.PS I contacted IMSI and they say the cd's were mislabelled, there is no haitian creole on the cd, despite the fact that it is listed on the cover</review_text>
This dude is selling info that you can learn from ANYONE with VERY LIMITED computer knowledge.  All of the same info is on the net for free.This product exists for one purpose... to steal from you.This pathetic thief has gone through the trouble of putting together an eleaborate scam to steal from his customers by charging their credit card 80 bucks a month without their permission.  He could have used his energy and tallents to just make a good product... but scams seem to be his thing.  AVOID!!  This is the WORST company that I have ever delt with in my ENTIRE life.This John guy and anyone that works for him should be ashamed.  He is an embarrasement to his company and his family.  At least a mugger steals from me face to face... this snake is sneaky about it</review_text>
Imagine that you know so little about a computer that you wouldn't even be here reading this review.These discs are for your grandmother who still has the corded, dial, yellow wall phone.If you are a recent (one hour ago) immigrant from a sixth world country, and you need to forward the "Burger King Christmas Song", well, then you're already ahead of these "learning" CDs.(My apologies to grandmothers with corded, dial, yellow wall phones). (Actually, I kinda wish I had one!)Regards,Older But No Smarter</review_text>
When I first installed the program I was able to access the images, but since that first time I haven't. My operating system is XP and I don't know if that is the problem with the software. I have since then uninstalled it. I did not think this product was very easy to use</review_text>
I installed a perfectly legal upgrade of Photoshop CS2.  It worked fine for a handful of months, and then it quit.  Technical support was of no help.  I had to reformat my hard drive and essentially rebuild my entire machine.  I am so frustrated about this.  I probably spent 100 hours with the data backup, moving data, reformatting, and reinstalling.  If I were a small business, I would be out of business.  All because this piece of crap program, which I purchased legally, decided to quit.  Totally unacceptable</review_text>
Im computer literate and regularly use a number of varying programs from Visio to Logic Audio to MS Office.  After picking up Illustrator however, Im frustrated by the lack of intuition and steep learning curve the software offers.  Ive been told that the world revolves around 2 types of people: those who "get" vector graphic programs, and those who errrr...dont. Unfortunately, after 10 hours use and much manual reading, I fall into the later category. I dont plan to give up however and plan to enroll in a course. This decision was supported by friends proficient in its use - but who had difficulty demonstrating the  complex concepts to me. (Indeed, defining the direction of a drawn curve was as intuitive as metaphsyics or nuclear science!)So my advice is this: Be extremely carefull if youve never used Illustrator before. It may be a breeze to those well versed in its use, but to an absoloute beginner its an extremely difficult program to grasp and you may be dissapointed to find this out after youve forked out your hard earned dollars for it.</review_text>
This is the worst version of Adobe Illustrator to be released since version 9. Opens files that I've been using for years and then writes scribbled, unopenable 'saved' versions. Crashes. Can't save for mysterious reasons. Writes "version 10" files with text split into pieces.Such a fine product! Really glad I paid money for it!!I downgraded back to Irritator 10</review_text>
I assumed, incorrectly, that Adobe's customer service would be professional and quick. I have called three times in the past two weeks and have had to wait, at a minimum, 23 MINUTES just to speak to someone.When I finally got my product, they sent the Mac verion rather than the PC version I purchased. I called again and waited approximately 30 MINUTES to get customer help. I had originally ordered the PC Standard version and asked to upgrade (and pay difference) for the Professional version -- since I still hadn't received the PC version. Customer service stated that they would ONLY ship me the Standard version to replace the incorrectly shipped Mac Version and then I would have to wait for the Standard verison to arrive at which point I could call again, and ask to exchange for the Professional verion - INSANE!!!  Adobe's call center is easily the worst customer service I have dealt with -- and I've dealt with some bad customer service</review_text>
I use PDFs a lot and I must say that quite often I turn to Free PDF software to actually do the tasks that Acrobat fails to do. One area I have always had a problem with is the formatting of some documents in size and sometimes Acrobat simply fails to recognize them and so I switch to the Free PDF software which has no problems doing this and is easier to use.However if you are a pro PDF maker who wants to add sigs and links and notes and chapters and all the other function tags including security tags then I recommend this product hands down as the best one. I just find that it is not always the best PDF software package in the world, but a good one all the same.I would not recommend buying this one just to make standard PDF files alone. If you want to touch up those file then this is what you need to do that right.</review_text>
This product could put user/customer's life at risk. The mapping software navigates user turning into a one way street and takes you to a very remote off-road. This is the worst product that I have used in my life.</review_text>
The only redeeming quality about this GPS system is that it's cheap.  I used it on a 1,000 mile trip on the east coast the week after I got it.  The navigation is poor. I found that I often had to look over to the laptop screen because I was "off route" so often due to the poor maps. The system repeated the same annoying problems that I see in other feedback.1) The unit would show me being off the road even though I was on an Interstate. In this case it would continually recalculate the route and diretc me to take exits to get off the highway and circle around.2) It directed me to make turns onto one-way streets in the wrong direction.3) It could not locate a POI that turned out to be a few hundred yards away4) It often did not know the correct side of the road for my destination5) It doesn't provide a chime when it's time for a turn.  It will tell you the turn is a half-mile ahead, but that might be the last time you hear an instruction.6) In one case, it got me to my destination (at least close enough) but couldn't guide me back to my starting point.The GPS receiver seemed to acquire and hold the satellite signal well. But the maps are poor, as is the verbal instruction - it sounds like a 1980's computer generated voice.If you're looking for a trustworthy guide in unfamiliar areas - this ISN'T it.This is going back asap.</review_text>
I rarely write reviews but I decided to write this since I had this urge to let everyone know that this product is just plain bad.  The review by "Reviewer: RC Lansing Mich" has listed all of my frustrations and I will not go over them again.  But the rating of 4 stars that he has given does not agree with what you will read in his review.The summary of this product is that it is "highly unusable".  You will be tired of using this on your first trip that you will not feel like every using it again.  Yes, you can "manage" you way with this product.  However it is not worth your time and money.And last point that struck a nerve with me about the ols maps database ... the company came out with a plan where customers can send them updated maps, based on locations they have travelled, not covered by the original map database ... come on!</review_text>
I have used MS streets and trips 2005 and 2006 for over a year. It has some map errors that I wish were updated. I read that The Delorme Street Atlas was far superior, so I bought it. It only took one day for me to find a mountain of problems. Not only is the mapping way out of date (Many years) Microsoft Streets and trips 2006 Maps are far more up to date. On many occasions told me to turn the wrong direction on roads even when the road doesn't exist in that direction. It doesn't even know the name of some very old roads Displays..."Unknown Name" While driving on very old established roads it tells me to turn onto a road that is actually an elevated overpass that I am driving 30 feet below. The program actually wanted me to get back on the freeway by making a U-turn from an off ramp to an on ramp. I have used Microsoft streets in all of these same areas and it is much more usable. The Delorme is very confusing and frustrating. I'm sending it back for a full refund</review_text>
There's a reason why this stuff is significantly discounted. This is definitely one of the worst products I have ever bought. I did not do much research. I think the data may be in there, but I could not learn how to make it work. The interface is horrific - unusable. Don't do it</review_text>
I was expecting a lot more from these two CD's. It teaches you a few items of food, basic words like "Hello", Please" and "airplane" and even teaches you to ask "Where are the suitcases"... but then that is about it. I was really hoping for more... much more</review_text>
Acrobat 5 was so buggy that I thought I'd give Adobe a couple of product cycles before upgrading. Should have waited longer. There have been improvements in v7: a better look, better commenting, the ability to add text that actually prints, and far better OCR functionality. But other basic functions are way worse than in v5: some Word documents that were easy to convert to pdf in v5 will not convert in v7, seems to be something to do with font license issues. Installation is a nightmare and repeated re-installation was required to get past system hangs, clashes with standard security software, and endless errors in the automatic update feature. The new product activation makes this even more of a pain because too many re-installations force you to activate by phone. Despite my already low expectations of Adobe, this product is a disappointment. With Acrobat 7, Adobe is, as usual, charging top $ for what any decent company would consider an embarrassing mess even as a beta version.(For reference, my system is Window XP pro, Pentium 4 3GHz, 2.5GB RAM)</review_text>
This software didn't quite do what I expected.  I was somewhat disappointed when I discovered that it wouldn't convert iTunes m4p music files to MP3 files to run on a REAL Player.</review_text>
Did not work with my apple computer,requested help but did not get results I wanted which was to return idem & get credi</review_text>
The computer I have now(about 500 Mhz)is faster than my last one, and the earlier version of Plus! worked well with my older model. However, my current model can't process most of the programs available, so I just deleted the whole package. I intend to get a faster computer in the near future, and will use SuperPack at that time. The features look pretty cool, but I can't give it a favorable rating at this time. However, when I see how it would work with a faster processor, I may re-rate my review</review_text>
This is the first time I have ever reviewed a product and I do it so that no one else will waste their money on this.  It adds virtually nothing to XP.  Too bad they didn't make it as interesting as their packaged media edition.  That would have been worth the money, but old Bill who doesn't want to be the richest man in the world would rather you spend money on a new PC to get that product.  The themes are nice but far too few for the price.  The games are a gimmick since you have to pay to play the real things.  The DJ is dumb and the dancers are cute but after a while boring.  Hard to figure out how to use the music converter and photo stuff.  Too bad could have been something but in its present form, not worth the money</review_text>
I purchased this software thinking that I could take my digital images, create a slide show with music, and then burn it to dvd for the family to watch.Unfortunately, the disk that I got gave me some error messages that when I called tech support (one hour hold time)they told me that my error message meant that I could create files, but they'll only run on my computer, not on my tv dvd player. In addition, you need to buy additional dvd burning software, because the dvd burning software imbedded in this software package will only create dvds that will run on a dvd player with the Microsoft logo on them. (The package says the dvds will run on almost any dvd player)So I asked for my money back. However, since it took me more than 30 days to find all of this out, they refused a refund.</review_text>
By reading the cover I thought it would be a great product to have. It indeed has some good items but overall this is something one can live without.Games - Bowling game is actually a teaser version. You can play only two lanes. Others cost you extra. Two other games are not exciting.Themes and Screen Savers are mediocre.I liked the analog convertor but not too much. If you can get input from any audio device, this program can convert it into a digital format. Alas it doesn't convert to MP3 format. Also you need to keep computer completely free of other load while recording otherwise songs will be recorded slow or fast, but not on the normal speed.Dancers can provide some entertainment to young kids for two minutes but soon they find out that these dancers have canned actions. I liked Ben though especially when he gets tired of dancing.Bottom line - I don't think you would regret buying this at 17 dollars but the novelty will wear off within a week.</review_text>
Warning! I resized my partition and when it restarted my computed could not boot. It destroyed my system and I had to format my whole drive.Read all the reviews from this program carefully. I read them but did not believe them</review_text>
I have to qualify this review by saying that I do not own PM 8.0, so I cannot fairly give a rating, despite overwhelmingly negative reviews. I can only relate personal experience with Norton/Symantec products. I do own and have used PM 6.0 since '01 when it was still Powerquest instead of Norton/Symantec and it has worked very well, though the GUI is a bit quirky. I have run it with 2 drives, one with 98SE and XP Pro, with PM loaded on 98SE partition and it did everything I needed on both drives. Trouble is, version 5.0 is, AFAIK, not compatible with XP and since M$ no longer supports 98SE, we have a problem, Houston. Currently I am  using a mobile drive bay to switch drives as needed. If I get a drive partitioning software product compatible with XP, it most assuredly WILL NOT BE ANYTHING PRODUCED BY NORTON/SYMANTEC, based on these reviews and personal experience with Norton/Symantec products. I first bought a computer in '98 and used Norton Antivirus 5.0. At that time, Norton was probably the best antivirus product out there. It worked flawlessly and I used and recommended it for years. NO MORE. I purchased a copy of Symantec System Works 2005 right after it was released. Long story short, I no longer use Norton products because I got tired of the system crashes and stability issues caused by the unstable bloatware and system resource hog that it has become, and am currently using a competing product that is very highly rated but is not common on the shelves of the big box stores. There is one lone Symantec product I still use---Windoctor, which is not installed on my 'puter but ran from the CD as needed.  Adios, anything else produced by Norton/Symantec. It ain't worth the headaches when there are much better products available for less coin.</review_text>
I purchased Partition Magic 8.0 based on my previous experience with Symantec virus protection and firewall products.I am sorry that I did this as the level of support provided for this product is vastly inferior to that provided by Symantec for other products that I have purchased from them.   All I wanted was to increase the size of my system partition on my C: drive by getting rid of some free space at the beginning of the drive.    I was unsuccessful in ever accomplishing this despite hours on the phone with Symantec Technical Support.   I was only able to speak to technical support staff in India who finally told me that they could not solve my problem, but that I would be called back by a senior engineer.  It never happened despite repeated promises.  I finally gave up and returned the product to Symantec for a refund.</review_text>
I am an experienced computer user, and I bought this primarily on my previous experince with Symantec products, which had been good.  My experience with this product was unfortunately, very poor.First - the product claims to be able to clone your boot partition, but this failed repeatedly, creating cloned partitions which were not bootable.Second - Tech support failed to provide an answer for days while I eventually figured out myself that I needed to use the bootable media to make a clone of my system disk - something the windows application was happy to try and fail at without warning.  Even when I attempted to provide this information to tech support so they could answer similar questions for others, they didn't get what I was saying and sent me another form letter response detailing how to make a copy (instructions which failed of course).Third - On another occasion, even using the bootable media, I got the error "1517" when attempting to clone by boot partition.  Searching the web revealed others having this problem, and Symantec tech support full of bogus solutions for it.Fourth - no support for USB/Firewire drives with the bootable media.On the plus side - it did resize partitions I asked it to without trouble (I give it one extra star for something working)</review_text>
Attempted to upgrade from 97 to 2003... bad move... none of my access 97 programs work now... in fact I, I brought home a 2003 access database from work to see if it was an incampatibility problem between the two versions... nope... the upgrade just didn't work.....had to purchase a full version to set things right... save your money on this product..</review_text>
Why are the newer products getting slower by the version. I still love Version 5. It does not forever to open up in a Web browser..Update: I have been using Version 7 now for several months.. I am glad to say that I am now a lot happier. Granted it still uses a lot of memory. However, the new features that it has compared to Version 5, makes the upgrade worthwhile.However, watch out.. there are several features that Adobe took out from the Standard version and only has on the PRO version..</review_text>
Being familiar with some Adobe products, we opted to try this at work as a cheaper alternative than some other packages for simple web graphics work.  Boy, were we disappointed.Simply put, this tool is not so much a tool, but a hindrance.  Utilities such as transparencies, are not only difficult to make work properly, but hidden in non-intuititve locations.  Dialogs are non-standard, which requires getting used to strange layouts in design.  While seeminly small for just a couple items I've mentioned, multiply this by the supposed feature set of the product and you start to get an idea of how cumbersome the tool really is.As has been mentioned by plenty of other people, it is also slow.  If you want a simple image viewer, find anything else - even freeware, as I have never come across an image utility that takes so long to load, regardless of it is the first time or the umpteenth time.While I could go on about the unsatisfactory qualities of this product, I will simple reiterate what others had also said; it is cumbersome to use, slow to use and load, un-intuitive with poor layout and design, and lacks many basic features one would expect in this form of utility.</review_text>
I am in agreement with others here who indicate that 4.0 is a downgrade from 3.0.  Performance is very poor, especially the organizer.  It's depressing to see how fast alternative programs are, such as Mac iPhoto and even the Canon software that came with my camera, compared to Elements.  Recently, I've been getting lots of crashes, though everything else on my system is completely stable.  The only reason I gave it more than 1 star is it does have some nice functionality, when it works correctly</review_text>
I bought this software primarily so I could create slideshows with music and other special effects. Since I got it, I have had nothing but problems. First of all, it would not install completely on my computer. The techs at Adobe could not figure out the problem. After I reformatted my hard drive, I finally got Photoshop to install properly. Then another problem. When I burned my slideshow photos to a VCD, they came out just awful (unlike Adobe's demo video showing a perfectly created  slideshow.) Boy, was I deceived!I cannot say that this software is all bad. It does a nice job in correcting exposure errors in digital photos. However, if you want to create neat slideshows, Photoshop Elements 4.0 is not worth the cost</review_text>
JUNK! I am a professional photographer and have used 2.0 for years for quick fixes and easy additions, thinking they might have made some improvements to make life easier... I was wrong. This program is a step back. I was a refund! I don't know who is writing they like this new version, but buyer beware! Laur</review_text>
Crashed the system every time I tried to use it...   gave me such a headache I tossed it in the trash...</review_text>
I just purchased the Hallmark Card Studio 2004 (...).  Everything installed fine but when attempting to print a card, the first side printed fine, but when printing the next side I keep getting the "this program has performed an illegal operation and will shut down".  I have been in contact with their technical support but have not had any luck so far.  I have wasted a lot of paper and ink so far in getting just part of a card printed.  I am running windows 98SE.  I will probably be returning this to the store (if possible).  It looked to have some nice cards on it, which is basically all I wanted it for, but for some reason will not print correctly on my computer.</review_text>
The program works fine on Windows XP and is easy to use. It lets you print cards of many sizes. The big disappointment is in the number of cards that comes with the program. The back of the box claims &quot;4500+ Cards and Sentiments, Celebrate life's special moments with cards for all occasions&quot;. That's nice. The problem with that is that I counted the total number of cards that come with the program.  It only adds up to 1045! So where are the other 3450+ cards and sentiments? Are you supposed to design them yourself? I just don't know. And certainly &quot;cards for all occasions&quot; means just that, doesn't it?  Well there's lots of birthday cards and plenty of holiday cards but not one sympathy card of any kind. I guess you just need to buy those on your own</review_text>
I've owned this software since it's ridiculously overpriced $500 1.0 inception.  Even at it's latest 1.5.1 $299 version Apple should still be ashamed of themselves.  I use Final Cut Studio and own 3 recent Macs, so I've been devoted to Apple to say the least.  I am a professional wedding photographer/videographer.  I have been more than patient with this software.  It looks great, up to Apple's standards in design and vision but remains absolutely plagued with bugs.  And unless you pay Apple laughable amounts of money (much more than the cost of the software itself!), they will not provide support on anything except installation...even if there software update is the source of the issue.  As someone who has been such an Apple fan, I feel obligated to let everyone know that unless you enjoy pulling your hair out and repeating tasks over and over again do yourself a favor and DOWNLOAD LIGHTROOM FROM ADOBE.</review_text>
I have a Compaq Presario laptop with Windows ME. I wanted to upgrade it, so I decided to buy the Windows XP Upgrade. I have another computer that came with XP built in, and I like that system a lot.Well, before I purchased this software, I specifically asked the manager at CompUSA if there are any problems upgrading from Windows ME to Windows XP. I was very specific. "No problem!" he told me, "It works great!"NONSENSE!Here is a list of hardware problems I had after loading Windows XP onto the laptop:1. My touch pad stopped working.2. My PCI bus started getting errors.3. My wireless network card (D-Link GW-630) stopped working.And these are just the things I noticed in the first day of using it!I spent over six hours on the telephone with various technical service reps at Microsoft, uninstalling and re-installing the software, being put on hold, reinstalling drivers, restarting the computer over and over and over and over again... Six extremely frustrating hours!Finally, the tech support people told me to uninstall the software. They said I should return the software to CompUSA.Now for the fun part. CompUSA refused to take it back!!! After arguing with the very same manager who told me everything should work great, all I got was an offer to do an exchange for the same product. Then the manager said my system must not be compatible. Well, I showed him the "System Requirements" on the box, where it says "Windows ME."  According to the box, my laptop is perfectly compatible!  But apparently it's not.Then the manager told me that he would not recommend upgrading from ME to XP. Well, intyeresting he says that now!  I reminded him about our conversation!!!I even gave the manager my Microsoft Case Number so he could see for himself the problems I had and all the tech support people who tried to fix it for me.In the end, I am stuck with software that does not work.Learn from my trials. Do not buy this software if you have Windows ME. Only buy it if you can get a written agreement from your seller that they will take the software back after it messes up your system</review_text>
Don't take my word for it that's a quote from the title of a recent post excoriating this irritating and increasingly bloated product on Slashdot.Be warned: Adobe has not learned its lesson, and despite the outcry that followed the release of version 6, this latest release of Acrobat continues Adobe's aggressive trend of intruding into your desktop environment, again, as in version 6 without providing an easy way to undo the damage once its done--in fact, it's now nearly impossible. Like earlier releases, this version of Acrobat adds startup macros and new toolbar buttons to your existing applications and adds menu entries to your desktop "right click" menus. Adobe argues that these are conveniences, but they are entirely unnecessary (for most of us "printing" to Adobe PDF achieves the same result, is much more convenient, and a more natural model), and clutter what for most users is either a too-crowded user interface (for those who don't have the knowledge or patience to customize it) or a carefully tuned one (for those who do). Unlike many well-behaved applications that provide obvious ways of avoiding this kind of intrusive and disruptive behavior (e.g. through a simple checkbox option in a settings dialog), Acrobat's "option" for disabling this behavior, once deeply hidden in the setup process,is now almost completely absent. To disable the "Convert to Adobe PDF" button that mysteriously appears in the Outlook mail editor, for example, one has to be sure to choose "this feature will not be available" from the "Microsoft Outlook" option under "Acrobat PDFMaker" under "Create Adobe PDF". Simply deleting the button using Outlook's toolbar customization feature will not work: it comes right back when the editor is next opened. Similar problems arise in Word, Excel, Visio, Project, and Internet Explorer. And there's simply no way to get rid of the never-used "Convert to Adobe PDF" and "Combine in Acrobat..." entries in that appear in the desktop context menus for files (even if one installs none of the Acrobat PDFMaker features).For the technically inclined wishing to repair some of the damage that Acrobat 7 does, there are complex but largely effective step by step instructions available on the web, but even the authors of these are driven to despair by version 7: ("Adobe has really pushed the boat out with Acrobat 7 and managed to screw Word royally") .In short, Acrobat will make a mess of your working environment, there's no way to completely fix it, and even the partial fix is a pain (and not well documented). (This may seem a minor issue, but if every application followed Adobe's reckless example, our working environments would start to look like strip malls, crowded with features screaming for our attention to the point where it is hard to find what we need when we need it. One of the great strengths of the personal computer desktop is that users can configure it in ways that suit their needs; no application should interfere with that.)Experienced Acrobat users will also notice that this version continues another frustrating trend for Acrobat (and most other Adobe applications): it is yet again slower to launch than the previous version. In fact, on my 2 GHz Pentium 4, it takes longer to launch than the entire Visual Studio .NET development environment, and longer than the boot sequence for Windows XP!There are other minor problems as well (arbitrary rearrangements of menu and tool bar items, etc.) but these two major flaws are more than bad enough. Unless you really need the latest Acrobat features, you should probably avoid this upgrade. And if the "improvements" in this release are any indication of where Adobe plans to go with future releases, it may be time to start looking elsewhere for a tool for digital document management.Fortunately, there's no reason at all to upgrade. Version 7 offers no usefully new features, so you can (and should) avoid this one (at all costs)</review_text>
If you use Microsoft Office (Word, Excel) don't buy it!  Links to your previous .pdf simply don't work.  Adobe knows about it, but have no viable work around.  Stick with prevous versions.</review_text>
Obviously bogus reviews.  Version 6 was slow as a dog, so any improvement will make this more interesting.  Of course rasing the price to $300 and $450 is less interesting.  What about those of us that upgraded to the slow dog 6 and unintalled it to return to v5?  how bout tossing us all a bone</review_text>
In an effort to boost their file numbers and appear to be more comprehensive, the creators included many VERY low resolution images that they "artsied" or "roughed" up with a dirty polaroid-transfer effect, or split up into 5 small stagger-stacked slides, which they must have hoped would excuse the poor quality of the original image.For example, if you do a search for "tiger", you will get 165 results, but only 86 will be of the animal, (and not one of 20 images of 10 toy tigers, or 5 images of one tiger-striped chair-cushion and so on), and of those 86, 80 have the crusty effect applied to them.  The other 6 tigers have been taken out of those same 80 images and clipped out of their background to give you a floating tiger on a clump of grass or a tiger head (but have, thankfully, not been "dirtied" up with the transfer effect).  Out of all, there is NOT ONE clean image of a tiger in its environment.Here is another example.  A search for "sunset" yields 247 results.  Of these, 163 have the crusty polaroid transfer effect applied, and 70 are the same images duplicated (much smaller) in a sloppy stack of 5 slides. There are TWO clean sunset images.These are typical results.  Numbers don't mean anything!  This product is stuffed with multiple images of toys, frankly not-so-attractive people from hard angles, and old low-resolution stock photos to achieve 150,000 files. Would it have killed them to include ONE clean, print-resolution image in each category? Perhaps we could have done without 50 of the fake slide images (talk about dated anyway!) in order to get a product worth having around</review_text>
First of all, the many samples I viewed in browsing this software are the same object just turned different angles. There are far fewer images than the number touted. This is a scam in my opinion, but a situation I could live with.But The major issue is that most of the photo images I have searched for my actual use have very poor, actually totally unusable resolution. They have corrupted clarity, Poor pixel quality, are distorted, and unsuitable except for perhaps, a third grader's school project.It was a complete waste of money. It is headed for the first garage sale I hold, and I will offer it for 50 cents with a non-return policy.</review_text>
This product is very nice when it works.  However, I'm having the same problem as the reviewer below me.  When I attempt to export the image - either by saving, draging or copying, Hemera places a transparency over the object, making the product worthless.I gave it two stars because, for the two months it worked, it worked well, however, now, it won't work at all.  And as the other reviewer stated, support is nearly non-existant</review_text>
This product offers much to chose from and I really liked the photos. However, I have yet to get this program to work right. I am able to view the photos but when I go into the the Export Wizard to save the photos, the photo has a transparency over the top of it, instead of in the background. I tried bypassing the Export Wizard by right clicking on the selected photo and saving. This also inserts the transparency over the photo. I called Hemera in Canada and they instructed me to call Encore USA in CA for support. Encore USA said they couldn't help me. Encore's technical support is "limited to crashes, error messages and lockups". I also referred to their website hoping to find help in the knowledge base or FAQ's. There was VERY little about this software and no help to be found. I wasted my money on a product I can't use and that offers no support for issues out of my control.</review_text>
I thought this would be a good product for my computer.  I didn't know that the only way to receive this product is over the internet via download.  During the process the prompts for the internet download ask you to remove (uninstall/delete) all of your known antivirus, spyware, and firewalls from your computer prior to install.  This leaves your computer susceptible when you receive an error message.  I received an error message that prevented me from completing the download.I purchased the software on Aug 3 and called customer support, they researched the problem and even took remote access of my computer to try and fix the issue.  They were unable to do so and then passed me to the second level of computer technicans.  Microsoft guards its secrets well and has varying levels of technical support, those that know the basics and those that know more. they asked me to set up a time span when I would like to receive a call from the "teir II" agents, I chose 6-9pm.  I received several calls over the next two weeks, all of them were outside of the specified time.  I missed several of them because I have a career and a life.When I finally spoke with an agent they again took over remote access of my computer and were also unable to solve the issue.  Here it was, two weeks after I purchased the software, I still did not have what I needed.  I was also unable to surf the web because the download process requires you to delete all antivirus and firewall software.  I called in several times druing the ordeal and the "teir I" agents just told me that I have to wait for the call, "they'll get to it when they get to it."  I was very upset with the customer support, I have no idea how the product is, but the customer support is just horrible.  Go to the windows live onecare home page and search for the "post your own thoughts" page through member accounts, you'll see that I'm not alone in this issue.  I have since purchased other software that cover what Microsoft says it will with onecare.  I did not have one problem with these installs.Please be aware that you might have to purchase technical support if you cannot download due to a problem with your operating system (seperate from onecare).  This costs an additional $35 ontop of the cost for onecare</review_text>
I bought this product after reading the other on-line reviews saying how easy it was to use. I am someone who works with computers daily and this was anything but easy! It was hard to understand and getting someone from their help desk to assist was a joke! I wouldn't recommend this product to anyone unless you're a professional architect/ computer genius</review_text>
This program does not allow you to switch to elevation and view or alter framing details. I'm only using it for a simple garage and I expected to be able to generate simple working plans with basic demensions. Not so. You might as well pick up a copy of The Sims so you could at least have some fun with it. If you want to get rough ideas this might be for you but if you actually want to work from it, forget it. Very disappointing waste of money</review_text>
1. You can't print on anything over 8.5x14 paper.  Useless if you want to review your house to any standard scale.2. I bought this thinking that it would be better than my 1993 version 3.0 of Broderbund 3D Home Architect.  It turns out that this is exactly the same software!I strongly recommend looking for something better</review_text>
I was excited to plan out an interior design project with this tool, but ended up disappointed.  They definately oversell it as an interior design tool.  Looking at the brochure online, I really think they must have touched up the images, because I don't see any way that they could have created them with this product.  As a matter of fact, the website Punch Interior Design software package implies that they did just that.The reason I don't give it 1 star is that the video tutorial section is really great.  I wish all software had that.</review_text>
As is typical with software claiming to be "topo", it is not. Expecting that the buyer of topos will typically be someone looking for USGS quads this software is not as advertised.Since I own the other major competing program (for which you need to buy each state in order to get Quads (and for which I can not seem to find Wyoming)), I was eagerly awaiting this package.  In five minutes I realized Delorme is essentially useless to the backpacker/mountain biker (et al). You can order quads very simply using the package, but at the zoom level appropriate for making an ordering decision the wonks at Delorme decided they would make the map blank (apparently to force you into buying electronic quads at $2.50 a piece).  So, you need to actually know the quad you want before you order it.  Well, if I knew that, I would already own the quad, and certainly wouldn't need to buy an electronic version.  For 2.50 more I could get it laminated.Yes, this is a flame, but it is deserved. Delorme might be great software if you know the quad you want; it is ridiculous software if you are trying to explore and area in order to decide where you want to go (and then download, and pay for, the appropriate map).All in all, a complete waste of money--I only feel it worth my time to write this review so that the suppliers of such software get a clue and discover a more appropriate business model (versus selling blank maps, with a 100 dollar credit for maps that you don't even know will work)Cheers.</review_text>
This computer system, although almost universally accepted, can be beaten in quality and flexibility by an operating system that can be downloaded for free, such as the fedora project (a distribution of linux, a OS which can be changed by anyone for free), or bought from software company supporting these open source project with unlimited customer support for around ï¿½50 ($90) or less</review_text>
Windows XP, and basically any other windows based OS is junk. After using Windows 3.1, 95, 98SE, 2000, ME, and XP, I was getting very sick of the same old boring basic programs.Linux however, has tons of programs with a lot of extra features to it.Spellcheck is one. I have to buy Microsoft Word or some other office program for spell check, and how much?!?! I'll tell you one thing, it ain't free.Linux however, there is spell check, and not just in their word processor. I also found this in their messenger program, email, and even in web browsers, free!The other thing I hate about Windows is "You must activate your copy, and only one copy per computer".With linux, there is no activating, or "one per computer". You don't have to fear changing hardware and having to call in to reactivate, typing in a ton of numbers and answering questions. You can give someone a copy of linux, and they can try it, for free, and for life! It's not 30 days free, or free for only a few people, it's free for everyone for life!As for one who mentioned that Linux releases more fixes than Windows, that is true. The difference between Windows and Linux when it comes to releases is like this. When Microsoft finally gets the operating system done enough, they will release it.Linux will release free their OS/software right away. You can download it right away as it becomes available or simply wait until they fix the bugs.So in other words, let's say both OS's have the same software. Day 5 comes along, and this software pretty much works, but may have some bugs.Linux will release this, and you have the "option" of installing it and trying it out, or wait until more bugs are fixed.Windows will not release this until it is more offical and finished.This is why linux has a lot of patches, they give it to you when they first get it going, and as they continue to improve this, you can enjoy it right away and not have to wait so long.It is also true that Windows can be attacked by viruses within hours, where as linux can take several days/weeks/months.Also, Linux has been proven to give your hardware/computer a longer life span.It can also work better with older hardware so you don't have to be compelled to upgrade all the time.Why not try out linux? It's a lot cheaper, and you may be amazed by how great it really is. I prefer Mandriva 2006. It's a great system.Final note -Windows: Very costly, even more so to get the benefits/featuresLinux: FreeWindows: One per computer, or buy more licensesLinux: One copy to everyone for life, or each person can have a copy for lifeWindows: Boring; basic programsLinux: Several programs, multiple browsers, more than one type of software to fit your needs.Windows: New hardware/reformat PC: You must spend time on phone and answer questions and type in SEVERAL numbers to activate your PC.Linux: New hardware/reformat: Here's your OS installed; you're good to go!Windows: Constantly gets attacked by virusesLinux: Quite a lot saferWindows: Support? lol. Yeah, there may be someLinux: Various sites where you can ask questions for free and get help on your OSThat's just some of the reasons why I love linux</review_text>
The Mac OS, $129 list, often cheaper, doesn't get viruses, worms, malware, etc and probably runs all the software you do on a PC, with the exception of some games. Go to a Mac Store and try it for yourself</review_text>
Sorry to disappoint the believers, but this OS is way overpriced for what it does.  And, it will dominate you instead of the converse</review_text>
This is Microsoft's most stable OS yet, but ridiculously over- priced.  I'll admit, I'm no fan of Microsoft, but I've very few problems with my desktop once I upgraded from Windows me</review_text>
They sent me a product that wasn't legit and wouldn't take it back. Horrible service & I don't recommend anyone buy from this particular vendor! Just a horrible waste of time & MONEY</review_text>
What a complete pain! ..... We now use Macs. However, I decided to take the California bar examination July 2006. The California bar examiners allow the use of laptops utilizing a software program written by Examsoft. Presently, the software will only work on Windows XP. Moreover, the California bar examiners will not allow any Macs, even the newer Macs with the Intel processors which require complete re-booting into Windows.As a result, I was forced to upgrade my Gateway laptop, a fine laptop as far as PCs are concerned, in order to sit for this bar examination. (That, or purchase a new laptop, which was probably the point.) THANK GOD FOR GATEWAY COMPUTER TECHNICAL SUPPORT AS THE MICROSOFT FOLKS ARE CLUELESS:Even though the warranty on my Gateway laptop expired some time ago, Gateway has walked me through more issues during the installation process than I can possibly discuss here. Conversely, Microsoft simply bounces me around from one tech support person to the next until the telephone becomes disconnected. .....I suspect that the marketing strategy is that new software (any new software) will only work with the newer versions of Windows XP or Vista, and since Vista will be such a memory hog, consumers eventually will be forced to dump their PCs which cannot be upgraded, for new PCs.As for how the operating system actually works: a grade of Fair. YESTERDAY, THE MICROSOFT UPDATE WEBSITE WAS DOWN WHICH, ACCORDING TO MICROSOFT'S DISCUSSION WEBSITE SEEMED TO BE A PROBLEM WITH OTHER WINDOW USERS AS WELL. Typical</review_text>
I received the package and read the instructions.  In retrospect there were hints buried there that indicated this may not go well.  It did not.  My installation stalled out and would not complete rendering the computer useless.  I had to take it to a professional to get it going.  Even so, I have had problems with Internet Explorer stopping suddenly, BSOD's.  This is not a job for the average computer user</review_text>
It is now almost a month since I bought the upgrade to XP Prof. for my destop computer running W2K Prof. I have had nothing but trouble. My notebook computer, connected by a wireless next for almost 18 months, suddenly could not connect to the desktop. All network setup and trouble-shooting help did nothing. I called MS and things got worse. Now I have an dditional problem (no sound on my desktop) and the first problem remains unsolved. I have been through three layers of MS technicians, only the last of which spoke English with an accent close enough to mine to be understood. Nonce could fix the problems and they are now "researching" the problem and supposed to call me this morning. During one of the calls, the tech. tried to blame it on my notebook. If any of you are old enough to remember when there was only one telephone company, you'll ercognize the situation. Right now, I would prefer getting a refund and returning to W2K</review_text>
First of all, Microsoft needs to come down on their prices (Not that this will ever happen). I build computers for a living, and I'd say that 9 times out of 10 Windows is the single most expensive piece of any PC I build. That being said, XP has come a long way. Service pack 2 has done wonders for security. I also found it is the most stable version of Windows I've used to date. That's not to say it doesn't have it's flaws. It still lets in it's share of "germs", stops responding from time to time (hangs), and it's very slow to shut down. The built-in CD writing software is TERRIBLE and Remote Desktop is not always a pleasure to use either. However, the biggest problem I've had so far is with product activation. As a PC technician, I'm always testing new parts. The most annoying problem I've had is that after you make a certain number of hardware changes (let's say you replace a video card, a hard drive and add some memory) all within a certain period of time (180 days maybe?) Windows makes you reactivate. This becomes a problem when you have to reactivate twice within this period of time. It makes you call Microsoft, where you have to convince the representitive that you're not trying to steal from them. Then you have to read them a long number (I think 41 digits) and then they'll read another long number back to you that you need to type in. It's driven me to the point of using Windows 2000 again to test my parts, even though this isn't always practical for testing XP compatibility.Overall, I feel that I paid too much for this operating system.</review_text>
There are issues regarding hardware incompatibility w/ specific components of the Toshiba Satellite M45-S355. The hardware incompatibility issues w/ the DVD-RAM drive, the GL910 chipset, and the SoundMax integrated audio drivers are known to both Microsoft Technical Service personnel and their counterparts at Toshiba. I spent an hour of fruitless time on a conference call with technicians from both companies (both of whom spoke what could loosely be descibed as "English"). The Amazon representative with whom I spoke was in New Delhi. I ultimately figured out (on my own) which Toshiba drivers needed to be downloaded (again consuming hours of download time with a 56K modem), and I used an Iomega CD-Rom USB external drive to load the software after about six extremely aggravating hours. I was able to avoid similar pitfalls when attempting to install Small Business Accounting 2006. Don't buy these products unless you absolutely MUST. Microsoft's "technical service" is a euphemism more aptly meaning "technically useless". There is nothing technically professional about the additional capabilities of Microsoft XP Professional. I should also mention that both the Toshiba laptop and the software were purchased from Amazon</review_text>
...for InDesign to not have one basic features. Everyone I know still does french folds, but in order to see double page spreads in InDesign you have to lay them out wrong in the program, then you have to painstakingly go through your document and shift the entire document by one page, layout by layout. This is mortally stupid. At this point Adobe should have figured how a tool like I.D. is actually used in conjunction with a printer, not just assumed the user wants to print what they see on their screen. The oversight is the difference between avergage klunky desktop publishing software and a great layout tool. Why isn't there a button that toggles me between the layout view and priont output? Why do I have to slave over a document like this? Adobe, stop thinking in the abstract and investigate how your software can facilitate printed results.Also who knows how you get an alpha path or clipping path into this? Mine shows me a heavily pixelated, entirely xparent BW image when it supposed to be a cropped color image. What do you want me to do with that</review_text>
The title of this product is a joke.  It should be called "Not Easy CD burning".  Roxio version 5 was much easier than this one is.  It is way too complicated for burning simple CDs</review_text>
First of all, this software performs like someones term project.  Why havent these guys been sued yet?Pros:Nice retail packagingCons:Not testedDoesnt burn all your filesNO supportOverall a waste of moner</review_text>
I recently purchased the software above only to find it does not support my dvd drive  (HL-DT-ST RW/DVD GCC-4482B (1.00)I have unsuccessfully tried to contact roxio support three times.  No response.  I did go through the long list of supported drives and also emailed my problem to Roxio.  Needless to say, I am very disappointed and do not recommend the purchase of this software.I have a new Gateway desktop that came with the above drive.</review_text>
I found this program simple, easy to operate. However, when creating a DVD project I used a narration for my audio.  The narration matched each picture perfectly, when I decided to burn it all of the audio was thrown off.  Do NOT count on any tech support.  They offer an online chat with tech support but do not respond or are not online at all.  You have the option of forking over $35 PER INCIDENT in order to get a real live person on the phone- but it still does not guarantee it will help.  And now, I'm not even able to burn it!!!! I hate this program</review_text>
I used Easy Creator 4 for years. Bought new computers so bought Easy Creator 6. It will not work on 2 E-Machines with XP. It wipes out CD rom drive so that it is unusable. I requested tech support 6/12/06. It's 7/15/06 and I am still waiting. I uninstalled it. I found Easy Creator 5 platinum on Amazon and ordered it. It works</review_text>
This Roxio software has caused me the most bizarre and frustrating experience ever.  First, it doesn't work.  Second, I cannot obtain any support from Roxio to find out why.  They won't give support until you register, the only way to register is to follow a web link that comes with the software, and it takes you to a website that either doesn't exist, or is always down.  Thus, it turns out to be a complete waste of money, not to mention several hours of time.  RUN, don't WALK away from this software and this company</review_text>
this product does nothing.  i put in 30 dvds and vcds and none were able to be copied.  easy dvd burner if u can actually find a dvd that is able to burn.  everything is copy protected...and i hear that over and over again.  there is a reason why this product is so cheap...BECAUSE IT DOES NOTHING AT ALL!  u CANT burn dvds.  you can only take a few files you might already have and burn them on a disk that does not play on a dvd player.  thats it.  dont waste you money on this.  its worthless..</review_text>
Loaded it on my laptop. It says that a compatible device was not found.Went to website, downloaded patch. It said I had the latest patch already.Everywhere you go on the roxio website, it tells you you can upgrade to version 8 for $20 off. It still is more than $50 and if Version 6 doesn't work, why would I throw more money at the problem?I could find no usefull information on the website and no way to speak to someone.I took it back to Best Buy. They said they could only exchange it for the same piece of junk. I went next door to Staples and they said if I bought software that does not work from them, they would refund my money if I bought it back within 14 days. So, I found a new source for software.Pros:It did not crash my laptopIt did not cause the modem to dial international callsCons:Doesn't workno tech supportdoesn't workno tech suppor</review_text>
I am very disappointed with this product.  Using the features of it are very difficult (red eye, sizing, etc.) in addition, digital photos downloaded into Photo Album 6 are of poor quality/clarity on the computer screen. I expected more from it but have found I have less.  I will not buy an upgrade but rather will look for another product with similar and more easy use features</review_text>
I used a bundled package in a new laptop to create a photo album. When trial time expired, I purchase the full package. I could not open the existing album with the new software. The new full package is hard to use and the so called 1000's of templates can not be found. USE SOMETHING ELSE!!!I even e-mailed Corel about this. Its been 4 days, I have NOT had a response.DO NOT BUY!!! I RATE THIS PRODUCE AS A -2 STARS</review_text>
It's to bad I can't give negative stars as this package certainly deserves them. This program is total garbage. A gargantuan waste of both time and money.Seemingly with every menu change, it recatalogues your entire photo collection, on ALL DRIVES, which takes HOURS (like 12+) to accomplish. And, while it will scan and catalogue all of the drives on your computer, don't even think about selecting a folder and expecting it to display the contents of that folder and all of it's subfolders. Ain't a gonna happen... but is will happily go through and catalogue them again for you, but, of course, after waiting hours for the software to finish catalogueing, it doesn't display the contents.  No, that would be way to logical.After realizing that my computer had slowed to a crawl, I checked the memory usage and found that the Corel Photo Album 6 Deluxe was using 6 to 7 times higher than any other program running, and that includes Norton Internet Security, a notorious memory hog! Guess we now know what the DELUXE part is!As far as I am concerned, Corel Photo Album 6 Deluxe is neither intuitive nor is it the "Best of" anything. It is a creeping, bloated dinosaur and a total waste of your hard earned money.</review_text>
I do not like software. It always hang no matter what I did. Maybe this is becasue it has not finished the index process? I had many many photos  in my computer.</review_text>
I am extremelly disappointed with Roxio, the makers of CD Creators; especailly Easy CD Creator 5.   I purchased Easy CD Creator 5, sometime back from an affiliate of Amazon.com.  It was dispatched promptly and in very good condition.  I installed it on my computer running Windows 98.   After some initial problmes it was running fine.A few days back I installed Windows XP professional on my computer, and I got a message that the CD Creator was not compatible with this version of Windows.  It hinted to contact Roxio.  I tried contact Roxio with the help of the link, but found it impossible to send them my message.   They have an automated "Roxann" that is so difficult to understand.  Next they invite you to a "Webticket" and you are supposed to mention your problem on it.   But when you submit your query or complain, nothing happens.  The site just stares at you dumbly!! There is no way to obtain Roxio's mailing address either.  So now I am stuck with this "Easy CD Creator 5" with no help from Roxio?</review_text>
The first version of Easy CD Creator I used was CD Creator 4 basic. It was okay, pretty much what it said it was: basic. I got the upgrade to that from an Ebay auction and it worked pretty good. Later due to lack of support by the manufacturer for new CDRW drives in good old version 4, I upgraded to CD Creator 5 Platinum (The version being sold here.) This too worked pretty good - for a little while. Then the operation was moved over from Adaptec to Roxio, and from that point onward, things have been more thorny than rosy.Roxio will REQUIRE you to register the product in order to download the (ONE) utterly essential update to keep this thing running. Perhaps you don't mind that, but I feel it's a somewhat minor invasion of privacy. Plus you have to keep track  of your password to the website and if you change ISP's you will have to RE-REGISTER. A hassle to say the least. Also , since Roxio took the reins, there are no further updates being provided. Instead Roxio tries to "encourage" (read "browbeat") you into getting the software upgrade for even more money. This upgrade will NOT work on Win98SE, which I still use for various reasons. So IF I were to upgrade the software AGAIN, I would also have to spend the extra money for a new operating system with all the faults and foibles that can introduce with other apps that I need and still use. If you have money to burn along with all those shiny round coasters you are going to be making, I applaud you. I prefer to keep a little cash for retirement.It is difficult if not impossible to get support from any real carbon-based life form, and the website gives little or no support for some of the issues you may face, such as getting "Illegal Request" errors from Direct CD, or inability to format or erase CDRW's that was once possible in version 4. Also, any CDRW's created in version 4 MAY NOT be readable with the new software, or at the least there are some technical issues with this. At any rate, it is not neccessarily all that "EASY" unless you are fairly technically inclined and understand (or are willing to learn) some of the finer technical points in CD recording technology. I prefer not to be bothered with it, I just want to create some CDs.I now find that some functions do not work appropriately at all, especially Direct CD, a program that originally provided the ability to do "drag and drop" writing of files to a Read/Write CD. Now I find that Direct CD is non-functional, and the only CD's I can write are CDR's, and there are problems growing in that area as well. Speed of the CDRW or brand of the recording media does not seem to be the issue. The software simply refuses to work as it once did.It shouldn't be called "EASY CD Creator". Perhaps "IRRITATING" CD Creator would be more appropriate.In Summary: This does not deserve stars. Perhaps a few "BLACK HOLES"? While I once would have given wholehearted supported this product, regrettably I cannot support it with the same enthusiasm now.</review_text>
I spent the last 3 hours trying to get support for this product. Although the site did not reject me it sent me through loops to get an "update" that when run, errored out as soon as it began</review_text>
This program is average to below average in it's abilities.That said, just hope you don't need any Roxio tech support.Why? because Roxio's  support bites!You CANNOT contact anyone online or by email for help;whenever their dis-functional "web portal" [web-based support] system traps you in an endless loop.I needed an couple simples updates for a pc that is NOT ALLOWED on the internet.It used to be you could download Roxio's PATCHES from any pc having internet access.Then burn patch[s] to a CD, or copy to floppy/jumpdrive.Then "sneakernet" the patches to the pc needing them.NO MORE.What happened today was that their webpage was apparently trying to download/patch a roxio product directly on MY pc.[EZCD5 doesn't exist on my pc].Instead of simply letting me download it somewhere, like to my hard drive, vs patchging it directly from their webpage to my pc,[which won't work in my case as I'm not using roxio, nor have it installed on my pc];apparently the morons that did the roxio webpage coding make the download/patch process STOP/END and proceed to send the customer back to Roxio's initial patch download page.When you need a patch, all these endless loops and support gamesare enough to get me looking for a different product/different company.If you want to minimize human contact with customers, fine.But let folks at least download the patches they need in order to keep their pc going.Don't hand over your customer support system [almost] completely to a WEB SERVER.That ignorant arrangement works about as well as when companies try to save a few pennies and get rid of phone receptionists for customer service telephone calls.Then they let customers wade through a 100 layer deep voicemail system to find the answer to a simple problem.IT JUST DOESN'T WORK.If a company won't provide access to PATCHES,even after I have logged into their website with username and password, [so they know is accessing their patches]AND they  don't offer any type ofFTP site  as a download backup  option, thenI sure as heck won't be buying anymore of their products.I see why Roxio bought up CeQuadrat and other companies.[Though I hate to see such quality companies be devoured like that].When a competitor has a better product, why fight to improve your prodsuct's quality/features, when you can buy the other company out.Thank goodness Nero is not under the Roxio umbrella.</review_text>
Despite many attempts and a complete reinstall of Windows XP, my XP machine refused to load Easy CD Creator 5 Platinum, rendering the progam disc and all update discs useless.Probably if you already had the program running in a 98 environment and then upgraded to XP you could keep it running with patches and updates.  So take statements by resellers that they provide update discs with a grain of salt.  If you cannot install the primary program, the update disc is of no use.The program is a good one but you have to run it on a 98 machine.</review_text>
Acrobat 5 was so buggy that I thought I'd give Adobe a couple of product cycles before upgrading. Should have waited longer. There have been improvements in v7: a better look, better commenting, the ability to add text that actually prints, and far better OCR functionality. But other basic functions are way worse than in v5: some Word documents that were easy to convert to pdf in v5 will not convert in v7, seems to be something to do with font license issues. Installation is a nightmare and repeated re-installation was required to get past system hangs, clashes with standard security software, and endless errors in the automatic update feature. The new product activation makes this even more of a pain because too many re-installations force you to activate by phone. Despite my already low expectations of Adobe, this product is a disappointment. With Acrobat 7, Adobe is, as usual, charging top $ for what any decent company would consider an embarrassing mess even as a beta version.(For reference, my system is Window XP pro, Pentium 4 3GHz, 2.5GB RAM)</review_text>
If I had $1 for every time a CS2 app crashed and made expend real hours to redo work, I'd have about $10. And that's enough for me to say, BEWARE of this set of applications! Adobe has allowed them to get too bloated, too slow, and the results are that all the programs (but principally GoLive, InDesign and Illustrator, in that order) are crashy and will quite suddenly, forcing you to expend the precious hours of your life redoing work you just finished. I cannot stress how disappointed I am in Adobe, and how distraught I am that we as a nation have allowed the only two competing companies to join, thus guaranteeing that there will be less quality and innovation in the future. In any event, do not buy the CS2 apps, Adobe does not deserve your support</review_text>
Yeah, I know it's the industry standard, and it's powerful, and all that stuff.  But, MY GOD, what a freaking PAIN to use.  It's just plain tedious to draw anything from scratch.  While the interface in CS2 is an improvement, doing relatively simple drawings with primitive shapes and freehand curves still requires much more effort than it reasonably should.  Frankly, I could draw better stuff faster with 1990's-era Macintosh drawing programs.  The drawing issues are compounded by the fact that -- in true Adobe spirit -- this program is incredibly bloated and slow.  It's slow doing EVERYTHING... I've never seen a program so slow starting up.  And every time you save a file (even a tiny drawing with 10 shapes) you get a "saving file" progress bar for a few seconds.  It's also incredibly slow to shut down... frequently taking about 30 seconds.  I'm running it on a Pentium M laptop, and I know this is not a "graphics professional" machine, but COME ON!  Let's get the lead out!  I just get the sense that Adobe pays no attention whatsoever to efficiency or speed.  That bugs me a lot</review_text>
Microsoft Office can be handy to have.  The files you can open, edit and create with it (most notably .doc, .xls, and .ppt) are probably the closest to universal compatibility among all your high quality options. It's (relatively) intuitive.  It has a pretty broad array of useful functions.It's also obscenely expensive, considering the fact that you can get all of these things -- .doc, .xls, and .ppt; intuitive interface; and functionality -- for free.I hunted up OpenOffice two years ago when I decided several hundred dollars was an insane price to pay for the ability to write papers, make basic presentations, or put together spreadsheets.  I was looking for basic functionality, but I was pleasantly surprised; OpenOffice does most of the neat tricks, too.  (Actually, it has a neat trick Microsoft can never replicate: it's open source, so it can respond to the needs of individual users.  You just say "Add this neat trick!"  and someone will likely be able to do it for you.)It is possible that Microsoft Office has some killer feature you absolutely must have that OpenOffice doesn't.  But considering the price differential, I wouldn't splurge on this before checking.</review_text>
Office 97 was a pretty good product. The programs were powerful, had a decent interface (maybe not as good as the Claris products of the early 1990s, but not bad), and came with a ton of features all on one disc. The Office 98 release for Mac was pretty much the same thing. The only thing that really got annoying for me was the office assistant (paperclip) but it is easy enough to turn off.Office 2000 was a bit of a disappointment for me. I felt that the improvements were minimal (aside from a bit more stability in Word--anyone who has ever used Word 97 on a regular basis knows it's prone to crashing) and in fact detracted from the ease of use. One example is the clip gallery, which went from being one of the best organizers ever created to becoming a program that wouldn't have received decent reviews in 1988. Another is PowerPoint's outline feature. I always turned this off because it ate up monitor space and therefore made the actual slide smaller. When you use smaller displays like I often do this is a problem. The menus, which hide some functions until you go to the bottom of them, were also an annoyance. The manual went from being a nice thick book to one half the size.Office 2003 continues making the program uglier. Now there are many tasks crammed onto one little panel on the right of the screen. Again, this eats into the workspace. The clip art system is even more cumbersome, and many of the clips are online only now. The help feature tries to point too much in the online direction as well. Now some people may not complain, but what if you're using a laptop in the middle of the country?I feel that the program is basically an uglier version of the same thing that was first seen in 1997. In fact, the 1997 version was more pleasant to work with and almost as powerful. On my Macs, I've switched to Keynote for presentations and Pages for some of my word processing because the new Office versions on that platform are similar.Some of the templates also look very 1997. Apple's programs are updated on a regular basis, and their templates look very modern. Now I know Microsoft adds some new ones now and then, but they should consider redesigning many of them--such as replacing the overused Arial and Times New Roman fonts with something a little more classy.The program is bloated way too heavily. I can run Office 2000 comfortably on a 486 with sub-1GB hard drive, but can't even get 2003 on it.A final gripe is that Access is not user friendly at all. File Maker is a better alternative, as it is easier to use and friendlier</review_text>
Ok! Being the richest human being on the planet called earth, Bill Gates decided that he's not wealthy enough. So he released this Microsoft office 2003, which I really think is not much different from previous edition. The price is, as usual, very expensive. What's worse is that Bill Gates decided all the pre-installed windows in new laptops and desktops come with the trial version. So mere mortals like us need to spend extra BIG money buying the full version to simply do some basic documents.I can see Bill Gates, being a deified bloodsucker, using $100 dollar bills as toilet paper, and laughing at us who work their butt off just to make enough money to live. SO SHAME ON YOU BILL GATES AND MICROSOFT</review_text>
Microsoft is simply sloppy with their programming!"Open Office" is a better program, is open-source (meaning if you don't want some paperclip's help, you simply don't download that part of it) AND OPEN OFFICE is FREE! It is also compatible with most of the functions that MS Office uses (and is upgraded with new features faster than MS's product, which is a rip-off!)MS's Office 97 was the best of the Office suites, even though it did have it's problems, Spending the money to supposedly "upgrade" to this (or any other Microsoft product for that matter) is simply burning your money!)OPen-source software is FREE, it's perfectly legal, it is open t anyone decompiling it, so if you want to make your own custom goodies, you can, but then there are so many written by so many people willing to share, you don't have to develop your own, as there are already *SO* many freebie ones (and some low-cost additions by some places, but most are free) that if you want whistles and bells, or even a Christmas theme in February, you can get it for OPEN OFFICE! (Not so with this or ANY Microsoft product for that matter)Simply sloppy programming - nothing more, AND you can get a fully functioning and compatable office suite for free legally</review_text>
While Microsoft tries very hard to make Office "think ahead of me," they almost always seem to get it wrong.  The result is a package that consistently annoys me.  It is true that one can turn off the "helpful" hints and otherwise customize the programs so that they are less hindering, however the bloated package will nevertheless usurp your computers resources like nobody's business.  In my opinion, Office '97 was an excellent package, and the versions since then have gone steadily downhill.  As with many people, I use Office at work because I have no choice.  At home I've had good luck with StarOffice from Sun.  While not perfect, StarOffice has read and created files compatible with Microsoft Office very consistently in my experience, and it's a whole lot less expensive.  I am therefore hesitant to recommend Microsoft Office Professional Edtition 2003 to anyone except those who need the most advanced functions of Excel and/or need to use Access database frequently.</review_text>
I bought this upgrade because I thought it would let me share my contacts. It says so on the box, but it doesn't. It works just like the old contacts which you can't share with others except if you export it. No live sharing. Why couldn't they make it so I could put the file on my server? Or on a secure site? Then all my office can work off one contact list.50% or more of the time the business contacts can't be found when you search for a contact. It's like the business contacts is an add in that doesn't work with Outlook. Or you add contacts, save it, email to the saved email address and then go to find the contact later and it is gone.Also, lots of times when you try to SEND, the email won't SEND, it stays in the outbox. And repeatedly you open and hit the SEND button but it won't change to SEND status. Now, if you leave it in the outbox, sometimes that fools the program into letting you send other email. Or sometimes you can FORWARD and SEND.. Geez, what a waste of money this upgrade was. We won't be using it on any of our other computers and we haven't bought if on the new computers we have ordered.</review_text>
Before you donate your hard-earned money yet again to Bill Gates' 'Feed the Multi-Billionaire Fund', do yourself and the world a favor and search for 'Star Office 8' on Amazon and read the reviews there. I use MS Office Professional 2003 in the office, and just cannot believe how badly so many businesses and individuals are being ripped off by Microsoft for this BLOAT-ware.Star Office 8 is under $50 from Amazon and is fully compatible with Microsoft Office, and includes full functionalities of MS Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Visio, and Access. Let me know what MS software I can buy under $100, let alone $50. Hopefully, this is the beginning of the end of the Microsoft Monopoly, and the dawning of the Era of Sanity in computer software.</review_text>
In the last year I have tried this program, PC-Cillin & four sharewares from CNET, and f-ZA the only one that doesn't cause more problems than it solves. The others prevent me from doing wireless printing, slowdown the computer & generate false alarms</review_text>
i bought this item because my husband heard is the best internet security.  Now i regret buying one.  Since ive installed it, IT SLOWED MY COMPUTER, ITS VERY VERY HARD TO CLOSE WINDOW AND WORSE WHEN I DISCONNECTED FROM THE INTERNET I HAVE A HARD TIME LOGGING OFF.  everytime im on the internet,i get mad and upset. its not worth all the stress. i definitely dont recommend this product. now im trying to figure how i can return the product and go back to NOrton</review_text>
Everything has been said about this product. When it's working, you're happy. With my 8 version, almost everything was fine. With the 10 version, it's a bloody nightmare. I'm giving up, throwing my Dazzle DVC150 to the junk and looking for another system to transfer my VHS to DVD. NEVER Pinnacle again</review_text>
I've worked with Pinnacle Studio versions 8.0, 9.0, 9.4., 10.0, and this one.  And they've all had two things in common:1.  When the program works, it's superb.2.  The other 50% of the time, it crashes frequently, and hard.For years, Pinnacle had designed the market's top, novice-affordable video editing/authoring platforms, but for some frustrating reason, they just can't seem to keep the bugs out.  Studio Plus v10.5 is no exception.Lately, the competition in this market has mushroomed, and there are better alternatives available for the same price.  At last, others have emulated the Pinnacle platform while eliminating the work/creativity-killing bugs.My advice?  Shop around.  Google the competition.  But save yourself the frustration and steer away from anything Pinnacle</review_text>
Crashes on every thing I try to do. I've never seen such a poor excuse for a program. I paid 70 dollars for it and am now throwing it in the TRASH.</review_text>
I used Version 8 and 9 and NEVER experienced a problem.  Version 10.latest version is terrible.  Crash and burn.  Don't take their advice and re-install your operating system.  Its THEIR software and not the OS.  Amazon and Pinnacle (Avid) continue to sell this product even though its terrible.  I read it was re-written for version 10 and they CAN'T get it right.  Nonetheless, they still charge full price and for support calls. The upgrade should have been free.There are several good products now so Pinnacle isn't your only choice.  I changed to Sony Vegas and am very happy but it does a have a learning curve.  For super simple try Ulead or one of the others.</review_text>
Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in ...Hold on ... let me start again.Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in editing some fairly interesting ...Dang it! Give me a few minutes here ...Pinnacle Studio can assist ...(Samuel L Jackson-styled expletive) ... how many times is this gonna happen? Start and stop! Start and stop! Enough already!One more time. Now, what was I saying?Oh, yeah ... Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in editing some fairly interesting video ... if you can keep it up and running.Got the idea?Just adding my voice to the chorus of those have experienced the frustration of the Pinnacle products. This is a bargain-priced product for which you will pay the cost of long hours of irritation and heart-pounding races to meet project deadlines -despite the software malfunctions.After installing the program, installing the patches, uninstalling the program and patches and reinstalling the program and the patches, I am still experiencing too many crashes.If you intend to use this program to piece together a video of Uncle Morty's birthday party, the family vacation or your neighbor's kid's bar mitzvah, the cost and the ease of this program may outweigh the annoyance of its aforementioned weakness. If, however, your video projects fit under the category of "job description," then I suggest spending the money for Adobe Premiere</review_text>
Let me sum up this software "total junk"Pinnacle will give you one free support phone call for help, then $25 for the next call.They give you free email support, but answer everything but your problem.   They try and blame it on Windows XP, and will have you reload Windows.I owned Studio 8, and it worked fine.   Went to Studio 9, and had a few problems.   Upgraded to Studio 9 Plus, and after a week of trying to make it render my projects with no sucess, and crash after crash, I removed it from my machine.They sent me an offer of their all new 10.5 plus upgrade, Hollywood FX, 3 of their Premium packs, and a hat that says Studio 10 on it.   This said that the program had been rebuilt from bottom up.    This program should be called "Crash after Crash", and the only thing that works is the hat.If you feel the urge to waste $100, and hours of your time, just buy this product.Look at the reviews on Studio 10, and the other Studio products, and most only have one star.   Out of over 100 reviews over 95% had one star.   I found one with 5 stars, but looking at the reviewers other reviews he is obviously an employee, or share holder in the company.   He wrote a 1 star review on a Sony competative product, and 5 star reviews for other Pinnacle products that you would not own if 10.5 worked</review_text>
I've been a user of Pinnacle version 8 (which I loved), and needed to update to a version that could burn dual layer DVDs.  What a disappointment this "upgrade" has been.  Crash after crash.  What is most disappointing is that Pinnacle built in a feed back system so the users could "help" them develop a better product.  This means to me that they knowingly released bad code, and used their customers as guinny pigs while sticking us for a $100.  Guess what, I don't want to help Pinnacle build a better product.  I want a product that works when I purchase it.Lesson learned.  Next time I read a bad review on a product, I'm staying away</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this program. But I was also thinking it would be more comprehensive and include more than just basic words and phrases. Even so, the male and female guides in the program often pronounce the words slightly different which can be frustrating. I learned more Icelandic (along with correct pronounciations) while in Iceland than I did with this program. And besides, anyone under the age of 50 in Iceland speaks English</review_text>
i was charged the full price of 49.95 with no $20 coupon inserted</review_text>
I have owned eleven VCOM products and from now on, they don't have my business. The product touts itself in part as a vital tool when/if your machine crashes. If it does, be prepared to shell out the cost for another complete program. You are told that the program is already installed on another machine and you can't run it-although this occurs after a lengthy and cumbersome installation process. Sadly, customer assistance is no help-emails are unanswered and you can't get through via phone...What you do get from them once you register are constant emails about new products. Thanks, folks. Version 6.0 is also much slower than Version 5. Support for 5.0, by the way stopped abruptly when the new edition came out, despite the functionality of that program.   For the price, the software should work like a major player, rather than a dollar bin special.</review_text>
I would not buy it!  Hard to use. My machine runs slower since the install.</review_text>
An Internet search found complaints about not receiving rebates.  Why would they give you something for nothing?I have had several rebate problems and most of them involved free items or insanely cheap items.This "free" software could cost you $30 if the company decides they don't want to pay</review_text>
Be advised, this Software is for a SINGLE USER, only licensed for one computer. I bought this for Home use after using SS% for 2 years and V-Com said it would no longer be supported of 03/06. I installed it on 2 home computers, it worked fine for 4 weeks, then it popped up a Box on my second computer that I couls not use it because it was licensed on another computer, I needed to buy additional license for each computer. When I tried to use it on my Main computer, it popped up the same message. So now it will not work on either computer. I uninstalled it and sent it back. Just because it's Cheap does not mean it's any good</review_text>
I was using VCOM SystemSuite Pro 6 and it was working to my satisfaction.  But, after I reconfigured my PC to "Standard PC", the software rejected my Serial Number, claiming I was using the software on another PC.  I only own ONE pc.  Technical help claimed the serial number has been used on 6 pc's.  Well, that is totally incorrect because, like I said, I only have one pc and the software cd has never left my house.  They have a Bug in their serial number checking process.  Anyway, they would not help me restore the software serial number because I could not furnish proof of purchase.  They think I am a crook. I'm not, I only want what I paid for to work</review_text>
After purchasing the program thinking it would perform a through check on my Presario running XP Home all I get is a message that SSP6 has unexpectedly quite. I emailed tech support w/ the info, but so far no response after 10 days. There is no # to call for support. Maybe I overlooked something.Also, I submitted the rebate form which came on the package, but was told that the seller was not participating in the rebate program and I need to check w/ them. I did and they said they shipped what VCOM had provided them, which included a rebate form if doing a competitive upgrade.Not very impressed w/ either the software or the company. Would never buy another product from these guys, even when the price after rebate is 0. LOF</review_text>
I agree with others who said it crashes the system. Overall, I found SS6 Pro had more problems than it was worth--even if it were free, it's not worth all the time and effort. Besides all the crashes, downloading the virus/spyware updates via dialup TAKES FOREVER! Each download runs 1 to 1 1/2 hours. BE FOREWARNED.In the end, I returned my copy to VCom, though to date I have not yet received a refund</review_text>
I don't have a problem with the software.  It pretty much does what we need but reversing an error can be a nightmare.  Before I start this tirade, I should point out that the customer service reps were very nice.  But they don't have the infrastructure to provide the most basic level of service (please, read on).  The customer support system for the payroll upgrade on this product is really scary.  (1) They want to have access to your checking account to pay for the annual payroll subscription!!  (2) They DO NOT SEND RECEIPTS!!  I help with the books for a small non-profit and paid for the payroll subscription on my own credit card.  The only receipt I could get was a copy of the invoice, which is not formatted to print correctly on an HP1200 (duh!!).  What is really disturbing is that these people are supposed to be accounting experts!  If you acquiesce to the checking account withdrawal, the only receipt you receive is the line item on your bank statement.  Have they every heard of a "paper trail".  Well you sure won't get one if you purchase the payroll subscription for this product.  I will start looking for an alternative to Intuit because they obviously don't understand some basic accounting and auditing principles.</review_text>
This dictionary is not for the person who English is his second language. It does not have enough sentence examples to let you know how to use each entry word. In addtion, the micro doesn't work well with MS Word.</review_text>
I was thoroughly disappointed.  The first few words I looked up in the thesaurus were not listed -- words like upholstery!  When I went online to see what I might be able to glean from their online site, first Fogware had not sent me a coupon, then I had to deal with bad customer service (I am not doing business with any companies anymore that give bad support) then after I finally got the coupon code they had left out of my box, the online info is exactly what we have in the cd -- so save your money and do not subscribe to their extended services site unless you need a spanish online dictionary also!  VERY BAD!  I am now going to go buy Roget's and check it out</review_text>
This is the worst thing I have ever bought. I bought it because I am having some trouble in spanish in school. I bought it thinking that if I gave a english word it would give you the spanish word or vise versa. But all it does is give you the definition and does not give you the english word.So save your self 20 dollars and don't buy thi</review_text>
Although this dictionary's contents are extensive, the screen functions are relics from the DOS era.  They are laborious and clumsy.  To find a word for difinition, it has to be spelled perfectly, there's no list of proximations to the word entered.  Changing a word selection is also clumsy especially in the thesaurus when the cursor doesn't show up in the entry slot. If someone knows of a better software, I'd sure like to hear cause this thing sucks!!  Maria McGowan</review_text>
The definitions and thesaurus cross referencing are very good. The user interface is quite honestly shameful. Software companies got away with this years ago, but there are now accepted standards for windows user interfaces (e.g keyboard short cuts are missing). Integration with Word 2003 is weak. Numerous bugs and exceptions and very slow</review_text>
The description of this product on the Amazon site does not match what I received. Like another reviewer mentioned, the product was actually shipped from the UK so it took longer, and several features listed as being in the product are not there, specifically, exporting/saving of loops is not allowed, and there is no library of 1000+ loops included either. It seems to me to be basically like a demo version. Also, even though it was advertised as being new in the box, all I got was what looks like a (used) CD with no manual or CD key - so much for upgrading later! I am returning it. The SKU should be removed from amazon or the description should be changed to fit what is actually being sent out</review_text>
I received this item today and was surprised1) It was shipped from overseas (UK)2) It came with only one CD instead of two like a previous reviewer thought3) No paperwork - it came in a clear case with no artwork, info, etc4) Sonic Foundry sold ACID to Sony in 2003 (according to Sonic Foundry's website) and SF no longer provides support5) I can't get this to register online, which seems a little dodgy, but other than that, it seems functional. No huge library of loops, either. Can't really say I got what I expected</review_text>
In installed this product on a Dell Optiplex GX110 (admittedly not the latest, but still a very standard machine) running Windows 2000 with 512MB of memory. In spite of spending literally hours with the software I was unable to get it to produce an outline or dimensioning of a wall being drawn by dragging the mouse, as clearly illustrated in the accompanying video. Without this feature it is virtually impossible to efficienctly produce exterior or interior walls. Multiple emails to Broderbund have produced autoreplies suggesting that I refer to their Website for help. This site is essentially worthless for all but the most fundamental problems (like not being able to read the install CD).It would also appear that this product is picky about the hardware it supports and also the version of driver. Be prepared for possible frustrations with this product, with little support from the manufacturer. I cannot report on other features of the software because I was never able to produce even the walls of a structure</review_text>
I've used CAD programs written in the 80's that are better than this.   I'll go back to Drawing Board 1.0 over this thing.  Not user friendly.   I can hardly draw a few walls without it crashing.  JUN</review_text>
3D Home Architect is a complete crock. I have attempted to use it many times. After hours of reading and playing with it I am still unable to perform the most simple task. I own V1.3 of this software and it outperforms the current version by light years. I also spent lots of time trading emails with Broderbund in an attempt to obtain either additional product support or a refund and I got nothing. So henceforth they will not see another dime of my hard earned $. Sorry</review_text>
I trusted that this software would do what it claimed to do and was so let down by its lack of performance that I am dumbfounded and left speechless.  During backup process I selected about 15GB of info to backup, spanning 4 DVDs.  Everything looked fine, except for TWO (2) simple errors that I received, indicating that those related files may not have been copied/backed up properly.  I figured no big deal, 2 files/errors out 15GB, I could handle that.  Based upon the false pretenses that my critical info was backed up properly (simple pictures, videos, mp3 files and Financial Files to include previous years tax files), I then proceeded to slick my drive.  Remember, only 2 simple, benign and almost inconspicuous errors during the backup process.  Everything looked great.During the restore process, I then received numerous errors, each of them requiring me to click 'Yes' when asked if I wanted to proceed.  I got tired of clicking Yes around the 100 or so mark and decided to click no.  When you click 'no', EVERYTHING is undone; there is no 'ignore all' function so I had to sit through every prompt and got tired of it and decided that proceeding with 1000 files and answering yes would involve too much pain for me.  I then selected a smaller group of files to have restored, only the 'My Documents' folder but ran into the same situation.  Eventually I ran a test on a small folder to have restored and still ran into the errors but pressed through.  Hardly any of the files were received error free and those that had issues were never restored.  My guess is approximately 2/3 or 3/4 of my files were not restored and of course none that really mattered made it.I had the latest update applied to the program, so that should not be the cause.  I would have done better to slick my entire hard drive without going through the backup process as I would have been at nearly the same place but without experiencing all the headaches, frustrations and an investment of hours, no DAYS of my time.The program has been recently purchased by Microsoft for inclusion in the Vista OS, I imagine.  It will do well as a Microsoft product, as it fails to deliver upon its promises</review_text>
All I wanted was a way to identify some files, remember which ones so every time I wanted to backup, I would press "go" and the backup would start. AlohaBob was too "smart" for my use. First, it has this intelligent file finder that finds what is likely to be backed up.  I indicate that I want to select my own files (which it lets me think I can do). Then thinking it would bring me to browser window -- no, no, no...it still needs to waste time doing its indexing as if I had selected the "smart find". I then manually select my files (great!!). In trying to save the "template" of what files I wanted to backup, it requires that I make it a reoccurring backup with selected backup frequency (YUK!!). I want to back up when I get to it (about once a month, not when it wants to -- I am backing up to a DVD which I need to put in the drive).  OK, so now I am over that and the backup begins - GREAT!!!  Upon returning into the application a month later, I can not select my saved "template" to "run now", it will run when it is scheduled to run :(  So...I need to repeat the whole process just to get the same files as last time backed up.  I exchanged emails with the company and they understood but were not going to "add" the features I described.  Oh well - it looked like such a promising product.  Now I need to find another that satisfies my requirements</review_text>
I really dislike this software.  I'm the type that likes to customize everything and this program just is not made that way.  First, when you initially select files and folders, your disk choices are "C:" or "ALL".  I have several disks and I want to pick and choose, but this program makes that really difficult.  Then you have to pick a destination where the files will be backed up.  Choose carefully, because you won't be allowed to change it later!  And if you want to do incremental backups, be sure to schedule it before you do the initial save, because you can't do it later.  Basically the entire job, future backups and all, must be defined completly at the beginning and can never be changed without completely starting over.</review_text>
Talk about junk! No search capability, mislabeled cds, some cds won't run - in short, YUK!</review_text>
800,000 images without keywords - the only useful parts of this collection are the classic and traditional .tif's that you can take into illustrator and turn into vector.  The high res images aren't, the clipart is less than microsoft office online quality and I've gotten far more use out of a 50,000 image collection b/c they took the time to keyword and catagorize the collection.If you like to look thru a book and put in one of the 32 disks and then find the image - then this collection is for you.  If you want to have any sort of search capabilites, look elsewhere</review_text>
I'm holding on the phone right now trying to get support for this product.  There is no 800 number for tech-support, so it's a long distance call.  I have had the same issue for over a month and still have not been transferred to a tech support person.  They offer only email support, but don't write back.  If you call them on the phone they tell you a support person will call you, but it never happens</review_text>
This game was a little too hard for my tastes. Despite the fact that I played at the junior level I managed to get killed shortly after starting out. I also had to restart the game to figure out what my room number was because once I left the room I couldn't find my way back (all the corridors look alike). So far I've fallen down an elevator shaft, gotten caught breaking and entering, been crushed by an elevator, frozen to death and been hit over the head...I've got to ask is this really appropriate for children</review_text>
This software didn't quite do what I expected.  I was somewhat disappointed when I discovered that it wouldn't convert iTunes m4p music files to MP3 files to run on a REAL Player.</review_text>
Did not work with my apple computer,requested help but did not get results I wanted which was to return idem & get credi</review_text>
The computer I have now(about 500 Mhz)is faster than my last one, and the earlier version of Plus! worked well with my older model. However, my current model can't process most of the programs available, so I just deleted the whole package. I intend to get a faster computer in the near future, and will use SuperPack at that time. The features look pretty cool, but I can't give it a favorable rating at this time. However, when I see how it would work with a faster processor, I may re-rate my review</review_text>
This is the first time I have ever reviewed a product and I do it so that no one else will waste their money on this.  It adds virtually nothing to XP.  Too bad they didn't make it as interesting as their packaged media edition.  That would have been worth the money, but old Bill who doesn't want to be the richest man in the world would rather you spend money on a new PC to get that product.  The themes are nice but far too few for the price.  The games are a gimmick since you have to pay to play the real things.  The DJ is dumb and the dancers are cute but after a while boring.  Hard to figure out how to use the music converter and photo stuff.  Too bad could have been something but in its present form, not worth the money</review_text>
I purchased this software thinking that I could take my digital images, create a slide show with music, and then burn it to dvd for the family to watch.Unfortunately, the disk that I got gave me some error messages that when I called tech support (one hour hold time)they told me that my error message meant that I could create files, but they'll only run on my computer, not on my tv dvd player. In addition, you need to buy additional dvd burning software, because the dvd burning software imbedded in this software package will only create dvds that will run on a dvd player with the Microsoft logo on them. (The package says the dvds will run on almost any dvd player)So I asked for my money back. However, since it took me more than 30 days to find all of this out, they refused a refund.</review_text>
By reading the cover I thought it would be a great product to have. It indeed has some good items but overall this is something one can live without.Games - Bowling game is actually a teaser version. You can play only two lanes. Others cost you extra. Two other games are not exciting.Themes and Screen Savers are mediocre.I liked the analog convertor but not too much. If you can get input from any audio device, this program can convert it into a digital format. Alas it doesn't convert to MP3 format. Also you need to keep computer completely free of other load while recording otherwise songs will be recorded slow or fast, but not on the normal speed.Dancers can provide some entertainment to young kids for two minutes but soon they find out that these dancers have canned actions. I liked Ben though especially when he gets tired of dancing.Bottom line - I don't think you would regret buying this at 17 dollars but the novelty will wear off within a week.</review_text>
This dude is selling info that you can learn from ANYONE with VERY LIMITED computer knowledge.  All of the same info is on the net for free.This product exists for one purpose... to steal from you.This pathetic thief has gone through the trouble of putting together an eleaborate scam to steal from his customers by charging their credit card 80 bucks a month without their permission.  He could have used his energy and tallents to just make a good product... but scams seem to be his thing.  AVOID!!  This is the WORST company that I have ever delt with in my ENTIRE life.This John guy and anyone that works for him should be ashamed.  He is an embarrasement to his company and his family.  At least a mugger steals from me face to face... this snake is sneaky about it</review_text>
Imagine that you know so little about a computer that you wouldn't even be here reading this review.These discs are for your grandmother who still has the corded, dial, yellow wall phone.If you are a recent (one hour ago) immigrant from a sixth world country, and you need to forward the "Burger King Christmas Song", well, then you're already ahead of these "learning" CDs.(My apologies to grandmothers with corded, dial, yellow wall phones). (Actually, I kinda wish I had one!)Regards,Older But No Smarter</review_text>
Warning! I resized my partition and when it restarted my computed could not boot. It destroyed my system and I had to format my whole drive.Read all the reviews from this program carefully. I read them but did not believe them</review_text>
I have to qualify this review by saying that I do not own PM 8.0, so I cannot fairly give a rating, despite overwhelmingly negative reviews. I can only relate personal experience with Norton/Symantec products. I do own and have used PM 6.0 since '01 when it was still Powerquest instead of Norton/Symantec and it has worked very well, though the GUI is a bit quirky. I have run it with 2 drives, one with 98SE and XP Pro, with PM loaded on 98SE partition and it did everything I needed on both drives. Trouble is, version 5.0 is, AFAIK, not compatible with XP and since M$ no longer supports 98SE, we have a problem, Houston. Currently I am  using a mobile drive bay to switch drives as needed. If I get a drive partitioning software product compatible with XP, it most assuredly WILL NOT BE ANYTHING PRODUCED BY NORTON/SYMANTEC, based on these reviews and personal experience with Norton/Symantec products. I first bought a computer in '98 and used Norton Antivirus 5.0. At that time, Norton was probably the best antivirus product out there. It worked flawlessly and I used and recommended it for years. NO MORE. I purchased a copy of Symantec System Works 2005 right after it was released. Long story short, I no longer use Norton products because I got tired of the system crashes and stability issues caused by the unstable bloatware and system resource hog that it has become, and am currently using a competing product that is very highly rated but is not common on the shelves of the big box stores. There is one lone Symantec product I still use---Windoctor, which is not installed on my 'puter but ran from the CD as needed.  Adios, anything else produced by Norton/Symantec. It ain't worth the headaches when there are much better products available for less coin.</review_text>
I purchased Partition Magic 8.0 based on my previous experience with Symantec virus protection and firewall products.I am sorry that I did this as the level of support provided for this product is vastly inferior to that provided by Symantec for other products that I have purchased from them.   All I wanted was to increase the size of my system partition on my C: drive by getting rid of some free space at the beginning of the drive.    I was unsuccessful in ever accomplishing this despite hours on the phone with Symantec Technical Support.   I was only able to speak to technical support staff in India who finally told me that they could not solve my problem, but that I would be called back by a senior engineer.  It never happened despite repeated promises.  I finally gave up and returned the product to Symantec for a refund.</review_text>
I am an experienced computer user, and I bought this primarily on my previous experince with Symantec products, which had been good.  My experience with this product was unfortunately, very poor.First - the product claims to be able to clone your boot partition, but this failed repeatedly, creating cloned partitions which were not bootable.Second - Tech support failed to provide an answer for days while I eventually figured out myself that I needed to use the bootable media to make a clone of my system disk - something the windows application was happy to try and fail at without warning.  Even when I attempted to provide this information to tech support so they could answer similar questions for others, they didn't get what I was saying and sent me another form letter response detailing how to make a copy (instructions which failed of course).Third - On another occasion, even using the bootable media, I got the error "1517" when attempting to clone by boot partition.  Searching the web revealed others having this problem, and Symantec tech support full of bogus solutions for it.Fourth - no support for USB/Firewire drives with the bootable media.On the plus side - it did resize partitions I asked it to without trouble (I give it one extra star for something working)</review_text>
I installed a perfectly legal upgrade of Photoshop CS2.  It worked fine for a handful of months, and then it quit.  Technical support was of no help.  I had to reformat my hard drive and essentially rebuild my entire machine.  I am so frustrated about this.  I probably spent 100 hours with the data backup, moving data, reformatting, and reinstalling.  If I were a small business, I would be out of business.  All because this piece of crap program, which I purchased legally, decided to quit.  Totally unacceptable</review_text>
Attempted to upgrade from 97 to 2003... bad move... none of my access 97 programs work now... in fact I, I brought home a 2003 access database from work to see if it was an incampatibility problem between the two versions... nope... the upgrade just didn't work.....had to purchase a full version to set things right... save your money on this product..</review_text>
Why are the newer products getting slower by the version. I still love Version 5. It does not forever to open up in a Web browser..Update: I have been using Version 7 now for several months.. I am glad to say that I am now a lot happier. Granted it still uses a lot of memory. However, the new features that it has compared to Version 5, makes the upgrade worthwhile.However, watch out.. there are several features that Adobe took out from the Standard version and only has on the PRO version..</review_text>
Being familiar with some Adobe products, we opted to try this at work as a cheaper alternative than some other packages for simple web graphics work.  Boy, were we disappointed.Simply put, this tool is not so much a tool, but a hindrance.  Utilities such as transparencies, are not only difficult to make work properly, but hidden in non-intuititve locations.  Dialogs are non-standard, which requires getting used to strange layouts in design.  While seeminly small for just a couple items I've mentioned, multiply this by the supposed feature set of the product and you start to get an idea of how cumbersome the tool really is.As has been mentioned by plenty of other people, it is also slow.  If you want a simple image viewer, find anything else - even freeware, as I have never come across an image utility that takes so long to load, regardless of it is the first time or the umpteenth time.While I could go on about the unsatisfactory qualities of this product, I will simple reiterate what others had also said; it is cumbersome to use, slow to use and load, un-intuitive with poor layout and design, and lacks many basic features one would expect in this form of utility.</review_text>
I am in agreement with others here who indicate that 4.0 is a downgrade from 3.0.  Performance is very poor, especially the organizer.  It's depressing to see how fast alternative programs are, such as Mac iPhoto and even the Canon software that came with my camera, compared to Elements.  Recently, I've been getting lots of crashes, though everything else on my system is completely stable.  The only reason I gave it more than 1 star is it does have some nice functionality, when it works correctly</review_text>
I bought this software primarily so I could create slideshows with music and other special effects. Since I got it, I have had nothing but problems. First of all, it would not install completely on my computer. The techs at Adobe could not figure out the problem. After I reformatted my hard drive, I finally got Photoshop to install properly. Then another problem. When I burned my slideshow photos to a VCD, they came out just awful (unlike Adobe's demo video showing a perfectly created  slideshow.) Boy, was I deceived!I cannot say that this software is all bad. It does a nice job in correcting exposure errors in digital photos. However, if you want to create neat slideshows, Photoshop Elements 4.0 is not worth the cost</review_text>
JUNK! I am a professional photographer and have used 2.0 for years for quick fixes and easy additions, thinking they might have made some improvements to make life easier... I was wrong. This program is a step back. I was a refund! I don't know who is writing they like this new version, but buyer beware! Laur</review_text>
Crashed the system every time I tried to use it...   gave me such a headache I tossed it in the trash...</review_text>
I just purchased the Hallmark Card Studio 2004 (...).  Everything installed fine but when attempting to print a card, the first side printed fine, but when printing the next side I keep getting the "this program has performed an illegal operation and will shut down".  I have been in contact with their technical support but have not had any luck so far.  I have wasted a lot of paper and ink so far in getting just part of a card printed.  I am running windows 98SE.  I will probably be returning this to the store (if possible).  It looked to have some nice cards on it, which is basically all I wanted it for, but for some reason will not print correctly on my computer.</review_text>
The program works fine on Windows XP and is easy to use. It lets you print cards of many sizes. The big disappointment is in the number of cards that comes with the program. The back of the box claims &quot;4500+ Cards and Sentiments, Celebrate life's special moments with cards for all occasions&quot;. That's nice. The problem with that is that I counted the total number of cards that come with the program.  It only adds up to 1045! So where are the other 3450+ cards and sentiments? Are you supposed to design them yourself? I just don't know. And certainly &quot;cards for all occasions&quot; means just that, doesn't it?  Well there's lots of birthday cards and plenty of holiday cards but not one sympathy card of any kind. I guess you just need to buy those on your own</review_text>
I've owned this software since it's ridiculously overpriced $500 1.0 inception.  Even at it's latest 1.5.1 $299 version Apple should still be ashamed of themselves.  I use Final Cut Studio and own 3 recent Macs, so I've been devoted to Apple to say the least.  I am a professional wedding photographer/videographer.  I have been more than patient with this software.  It looks great, up to Apple's standards in design and vision but remains absolutely plagued with bugs.  And unless you pay Apple laughable amounts of money (much more than the cost of the software itself!), they will not provide support on anything except installation...even if there software update is the source of the issue.  As someone who has been such an Apple fan, I feel obligated to let everyone know that unless you enjoy pulling your hair out and repeating tasks over and over again do yourself a favor and DOWNLOAD LIGHTROOM FROM ADOBE.</review_text>
I have a Compaq Presario laptop with Windows ME. I wanted to upgrade it, so I decided to buy the Windows XP Upgrade. I have another computer that came with XP built in, and I like that system a lot.Well, before I purchased this software, I specifically asked the manager at CompUSA if there are any problems upgrading from Windows ME to Windows XP. I was very specific. "No problem!" he told me, "It works great!"NONSENSE!Here is a list of hardware problems I had after loading Windows XP onto the laptop:1. My touch pad stopped working.2. My PCI bus started getting errors.3. My wireless network card (D-Link GW-630) stopped working.And these are just the things I noticed in the first day of using it!I spent over six hours on the telephone with various technical service reps at Microsoft, uninstalling and re-installing the software, being put on hold, reinstalling drivers, restarting the computer over and over and over and over again... Six extremely frustrating hours!Finally, the tech support people told me to uninstall the software. They said I should return the software to CompUSA.Now for the fun part. CompUSA refused to take it back!!! After arguing with the very same manager who told me everything should work great, all I got was an offer to do an exchange for the same product. Then the manager said my system must not be compatible. Well, I showed him the "System Requirements" on the box, where it says "Windows ME."  According to the box, my laptop is perfectly compatible!  But apparently it's not.Then the manager told me that he would not recommend upgrading from ME to XP. Well, intyeresting he says that now!  I reminded him about our conversation!!!I even gave the manager my Microsoft Case Number so he could see for himself the problems I had and all the tech support people who tried to fix it for me.In the end, I am stuck with software that does not work.Learn from my trials. Do not buy this software if you have Windows ME. Only buy it if you can get a written agreement from your seller that they will take the software back after it messes up your system</review_text>
Don't take my word for it that's a quote from the title of a recent post excoriating this irritating and increasingly bloated product on Slashdot.Be warned: Adobe has not learned its lesson, and despite the outcry that followed the release of version 6, this latest release of Acrobat continues Adobe's aggressive trend of intruding into your desktop environment, again, as in version 6 without providing an easy way to undo the damage once its done--in fact, it's now nearly impossible. Like earlier releases, this version of Acrobat adds startup macros and new toolbar buttons to your existing applications and adds menu entries to your desktop "right click" menus. Adobe argues that these are conveniences, but they are entirely unnecessary (for most of us "printing" to Adobe PDF achieves the same result, is much more convenient, and a more natural model), and clutter what for most users is either a too-crowded user interface (for those who don't have the knowledge or patience to customize it) or a carefully tuned one (for those who do). Unlike many well-behaved applications that provide obvious ways of avoiding this kind of intrusive and disruptive behavior (e.g. through a simple checkbox option in a settings dialog), Acrobat's "option" for disabling this behavior, once deeply hidden in the setup process,is now almost completely absent. To disable the "Convert to Adobe PDF" button that mysteriously appears in the Outlook mail editor, for example, one has to be sure to choose "this feature will not be available" from the "Microsoft Outlook" option under "Acrobat PDFMaker" under "Create Adobe PDF". Simply deleting the button using Outlook's toolbar customization feature will not work: it comes right back when the editor is next opened. Similar problems arise in Word, Excel, Visio, Project, and Internet Explorer. And there's simply no way to get rid of the never-used "Convert to Adobe PDF" and "Combine in Acrobat..." entries in that appear in the desktop context menus for files (even if one installs none of the Acrobat PDFMaker features).For the technically inclined wishing to repair some of the damage that Acrobat 7 does, there are complex but largely effective step by step instructions available on the web, but even the authors of these are driven to despair by version 7: ("Adobe has really pushed the boat out with Acrobat 7 and managed to screw Word royally") .In short, Acrobat will make a mess of your working environment, there's no way to completely fix it, and even the partial fix is a pain (and not well documented). (This may seem a minor issue, but if every application followed Adobe's reckless example, our working environments would start to look like strip malls, crowded with features screaming for our attention to the point where it is hard to find what we need when we need it. One of the great strengths of the personal computer desktop is that users can configure it in ways that suit their needs; no application should interfere with that.)Experienced Acrobat users will also notice that this version continues another frustrating trend for Acrobat (and most other Adobe applications): it is yet again slower to launch than the previous version. In fact, on my 2 GHz Pentium 4, it takes longer to launch than the entire Visual Studio .NET development environment, and longer than the boot sequence for Windows XP!There are other minor problems as well (arbitrary rearrangements of menu and tool bar items, etc.) but these two major flaws are more than bad enough. Unless you really need the latest Acrobat features, you should probably avoid this upgrade. And if the "improvements" in this release are any indication of where Adobe plans to go with future releases, it may be time to start looking elsewhere for a tool for digital document management.Fortunately, there's no reason at all to upgrade. Version 7 offers no usefully new features, so you can (and should) avoid this one (at all costs)</review_text>
If you use Microsoft Office (Word, Excel) don't buy it!  Links to your previous .pdf simply don't work.  Adobe knows about it, but have no viable work around.  Stick with prevous versions.</review_text>
Obviously bogus reviews.  Version 6 was slow as a dog, so any improvement will make this more interesting.  Of course rasing the price to $300 and $450 is less interesting.  What about those of us that upgraded to the slow dog 6 and unintalled it to return to v5?  how bout tossing us all a bone</review_text>
In an effort to boost their file numbers and appear to be more comprehensive, the creators included many VERY low resolution images that they "artsied" or "roughed" up with a dirty polaroid-transfer effect, or split up into 5 small stagger-stacked slides, which they must have hoped would excuse the poor quality of the original image.For example, if you do a search for "tiger", you will get 165 results, but only 86 will be of the animal, (and not one of 20 images of 10 toy tigers, or 5 images of one tiger-striped chair-cushion and so on), and of those 86, 80 have the crusty effect applied to them.  The other 6 tigers have been taken out of those same 80 images and clipped out of their background to give you a floating tiger on a clump of grass or a tiger head (but have, thankfully, not been "dirtied" up with the transfer effect).  Out of all, there is NOT ONE clean image of a tiger in its environment.Here is another example.  A search for "sunset" yields 247 results.  Of these, 163 have the crusty polaroid transfer effect applied, and 70 are the same images duplicated (much smaller) in a sloppy stack of 5 slides. There are TWO clean sunset images.These are typical results.  Numbers don't mean anything!  This product is stuffed with multiple images of toys, frankly not-so-attractive people from hard angles, and old low-resolution stock photos to achieve 150,000 files. Would it have killed them to include ONE clean, print-resolution image in each category? Perhaps we could have done without 50 of the fake slide images (talk about dated anyway!) in order to get a product worth having around</review_text>
First of all, the many samples I viewed in browsing this software are the same object just turned different angles. There are far fewer images than the number touted. This is a scam in my opinion, but a situation I could live with.But The major issue is that most of the photo images I have searched for my actual use have very poor, actually totally unusable resolution. They have corrupted clarity, Poor pixel quality, are distorted, and unsuitable except for perhaps, a third grader's school project.It was a complete waste of money. It is headed for the first garage sale I hold, and I will offer it for 50 cents with a non-return policy.</review_text>
This product is very nice when it works.  However, I'm having the same problem as the reviewer below me.  When I attempt to export the image - either by saving, draging or copying, Hemera places a transparency over the object, making the product worthless.I gave it two stars because, for the two months it worked, it worked well, however, now, it won't work at all.  And as the other reviewer stated, support is nearly non-existant</review_text>
This product offers much to chose from and I really liked the photos. However, I have yet to get this program to work right. I am able to view the photos but when I go into the the Export Wizard to save the photos, the photo has a transparency over the top of it, instead of in the background. I tried bypassing the Export Wizard by right clicking on the selected photo and saving. This also inserts the transparency over the photo. I called Hemera in Canada and they instructed me to call Encore USA in CA for support. Encore USA said they couldn't help me. Encore's technical support is "limited to crashes, error messages and lockups". I also referred to their website hoping to find help in the knowledge base or FAQ's. There was VERY little about this software and no help to be found. I wasted my money on a product I can't use and that offers no support for issues out of my control.</review_text>
I thought this would be a good product for my computer.  I didn't know that the only way to receive this product is over the internet via download.  During the process the prompts for the internet download ask you to remove (uninstall/delete) all of your known antivirus, spyware, and firewalls from your computer prior to install.  This leaves your computer susceptible when you receive an error message.  I received an error message that prevented me from completing the download.I purchased the software on Aug 3 and called customer support, they researched the problem and even took remote access of my computer to try and fix the issue.  They were unable to do so and then passed me to the second level of computer technicans.  Microsoft guards its secrets well and has varying levels of technical support, those that know the basics and those that know more. they asked me to set up a time span when I would like to receive a call from the "teir II" agents, I chose 6-9pm.  I received several calls over the next two weeks, all of them were outside of the specified time.  I missed several of them because I have a career and a life.When I finally spoke with an agent they again took over remote access of my computer and were also unable to solve the issue.  Here it was, two weeks after I purchased the software, I still did not have what I needed.  I was also unable to surf the web because the download process requires you to delete all antivirus and firewall software.  I called in several times druing the ordeal and the "teir I" agents just told me that I have to wait for the call, "they'll get to it when they get to it."  I was very upset with the customer support, I have no idea how the product is, but the customer support is just horrible.  Go to the windows live onecare home page and search for the "post your own thoughts" page through member accounts, you'll see that I'm not alone in this issue.  I have since purchased other software that cover what Microsoft says it will with onecare.  I did not have one problem with these installs.Please be aware that you might have to purchase technical support if you cannot download due to a problem with your operating system (seperate from onecare).  This costs an additional $35 ontop of the cost for onecare</review_text>
When I first installed the program I was able to access the images, but since that first time I haven't. My operating system is XP and I don't know if that is the problem with the software. I have since then uninstalled it. I did not think this product was very easy to use</review_text>
Im computer literate and regularly use a number of varying programs from Visio to Logic Audio to MS Office.  After picking up Illustrator however, Im frustrated by the lack of intuition and steep learning curve the software offers.  Ive been told that the world revolves around 2 types of people: those who "get" vector graphic programs, and those who errrr...dont. Unfortunately, after 10 hours use and much manual reading, I fall into the later category. I dont plan to give up however and plan to enroll in a course. This decision was supported by friends proficient in its use - but who had difficulty demonstrating the  complex concepts to me. (Indeed, defining the direction of a drawn curve was as intuitive as metaphsyics or nuclear science!)So my advice is this: Be extremely carefull if youve never used Illustrator before. It may be a breeze to those well versed in its use, but to an absoloute beginner its an extremely difficult program to grasp and you may be dissapointed to find this out after youve forked out your hard earned dollars for it.</review_text>
This is the worst version of Adobe Illustrator to be released since version 9. Opens files that I've been using for years and then writes scribbled, unopenable 'saved' versions. Crashes. Can't save for mysterious reasons. Writes "version 10" files with text split into pieces.Such a fine product! Really glad I paid money for it!!I downgraded back to Irritator 10</review_text>
I bought this product after reading the other on-line reviews saying how easy it was to use. I am someone who works with computers daily and this was anything but easy! It was hard to understand and getting someone from their help desk to assist was a joke! I wouldn't recommend this product to anyone unless you're a professional architect/ computer genius</review_text>
This program does not allow you to switch to elevation and view or alter framing details. I'm only using it for a simple garage and I expected to be able to generate simple working plans with basic demensions. Not so. You might as well pick up a copy of The Sims so you could at least have some fun with it. If you want to get rough ideas this might be for you but if you actually want to work from it, forget it. Very disappointing waste of money</review_text>
1. You can't print on anything over 8.5x14 paper.  Useless if you want to review your house to any standard scale.2. I bought this thinking that it would be better than my 1993 version 3.0 of Broderbund 3D Home Architect.  It turns out that this is exactly the same software!I strongly recommend looking for something better</review_text>
I was excited to plan out an interior design project with this tool, but ended up disappointed.  They definately oversell it as an interior design tool.  Looking at the brochure online, I really think they must have touched up the images, because I don't see any way that they could have created them with this product.  As a matter of fact, the website Punch Interior Design software package implies that they did just that.The reason I don't give it 1 star is that the video tutorial section is really great.  I wish all software had that.</review_text>
As is typical with software claiming to be "topo", it is not. Expecting that the buyer of topos will typically be someone looking for USGS quads this software is not as advertised.Since I own the other major competing program (for which you need to buy each state in order to get Quads (and for which I can not seem to find Wyoming)), I was eagerly awaiting this package.  In five minutes I realized Delorme is essentially useless to the backpacker/mountain biker (et al). You can order quads very simply using the package, but at the zoom level appropriate for making an ordering decision the wonks at Delorme decided they would make the map blank (apparently to force you into buying electronic quads at $2.50 a piece).  So, you need to actually know the quad you want before you order it.  Well, if I knew that, I would already own the quad, and certainly wouldn't need to buy an electronic version.  For 2.50 more I could get it laminated.Yes, this is a flame, but it is deserved. Delorme might be great software if you know the quad you want; it is ridiculous software if you are trying to explore and area in order to decide where you want to go (and then download, and pay for, the appropriate map).All in all, a complete waste of money--I only feel it worth my time to write this review so that the suppliers of such software get a clue and discover a more appropriate business model (versus selling blank maps, with a 100 dollar credit for maps that you don't even know will work)Cheers.</review_text>
This computer system, although almost universally accepted, can be beaten in quality and flexibility by an operating system that can be downloaded for free, such as the fedora project (a distribution of linux, a OS which can be changed by anyone for free), or bought from software company supporting these open source project with unlimited customer support for around ï¿½50 ($90) or less</review_text>
Windows XP, and basically any other windows based OS is junk. After using Windows 3.1, 95, 98SE, 2000, ME, and XP, I was getting very sick of the same old boring basic programs.Linux however, has tons of programs with a lot of extra features to it.Spellcheck is one. I have to buy Microsoft Word or some other office program for spell check, and how much?!?! I'll tell you one thing, it ain't free.Linux however, there is spell check, and not just in their word processor. I also found this in their messenger program, email, and even in web browsers, free!The other thing I hate about Windows is "You must activate your copy, and only one copy per computer".With linux, there is no activating, or "one per computer". You don't have to fear changing hardware and having to call in to reactivate, typing in a ton of numbers and answering questions. You can give someone a copy of linux, and they can try it, for free, and for life! It's not 30 days free, or free for only a few people, it's free for everyone for life!As for one who mentioned that Linux releases more fixes than Windows, that is true. The difference between Windows and Linux when it comes to releases is like this. When Microsoft finally gets the operating system done enough, they will release it.Linux will release free their OS/software right away. You can download it right away as it becomes available or simply wait until they fix the bugs.So in other words, let's say both OS's have the same software. Day 5 comes along, and this software pretty much works, but may have some bugs.Linux will release this, and you have the "option" of installing it and trying it out, or wait until more bugs are fixed.Windows will not release this until it is more offical and finished.This is why linux has a lot of patches, they give it to you when they first get it going, and as they continue to improve this, you can enjoy it right away and not have to wait so long.It is also true that Windows can be attacked by viruses within hours, where as linux can take several days/weeks/months.Also, Linux has been proven to give your hardware/computer a longer life span.It can also work better with older hardware so you don't have to be compelled to upgrade all the time.Why not try out linux? It's a lot cheaper, and you may be amazed by how great it really is. I prefer Mandriva 2006. It's a great system.Final note -Windows: Very costly, even more so to get the benefits/featuresLinux: FreeWindows: One per computer, or buy more licensesLinux: One copy to everyone for life, or each person can have a copy for lifeWindows: Boring; basic programsLinux: Several programs, multiple browsers, more than one type of software to fit your needs.Windows: New hardware/reformat PC: You must spend time on phone and answer questions and type in SEVERAL numbers to activate your PC.Linux: New hardware/reformat: Here's your OS installed; you're good to go!Windows: Constantly gets attacked by virusesLinux: Quite a lot saferWindows: Support? lol. Yeah, there may be someLinux: Various sites where you can ask questions for free and get help on your OSThat's just some of the reasons why I love linux</review_text>
The Mac OS, $129 list, often cheaper, doesn't get viruses, worms, malware, etc and probably runs all the software you do on a PC, with the exception of some games. Go to a Mac Store and try it for yourself</review_text>
Sorry to disappoint the believers, but this OS is way overpriced for what it does.  And, it will dominate you instead of the converse</review_text>
This is Microsoft's most stable OS yet, but ridiculously over- priced.  I'll admit, I'm no fan of Microsoft, but I've very few problems with my desktop once I upgraded from Windows me</review_text>
They sent me a product that wasn't legit and wouldn't take it back. Horrible service & I don't recommend anyone buy from this particular vendor! Just a horrible waste of time & MONEY</review_text>
What a complete pain! ..... We now use Macs. However, I decided to take the California bar examination July 2006. The California bar examiners allow the use of laptops utilizing a software program written by Examsoft. Presently, the software will only work on Windows XP. Moreover, the California bar examiners will not allow any Macs, even the newer Macs with the Intel processors which require complete re-booting into Windows.As a result, I was forced to upgrade my Gateway laptop, a fine laptop as far as PCs are concerned, in order to sit for this bar examination. (That, or purchase a new laptop, which was probably the point.) THANK GOD FOR GATEWAY COMPUTER TECHNICAL SUPPORT AS THE MICROSOFT FOLKS ARE CLUELESS:Even though the warranty on my Gateway laptop expired some time ago, Gateway has walked me through more issues during the installation process than I can possibly discuss here. Conversely, Microsoft simply bounces me around from one tech support person to the next until the telephone becomes disconnected. .....I suspect that the marketing strategy is that new software (any new software) will only work with the newer versions of Windows XP or Vista, and since Vista will be such a memory hog, consumers eventually will be forced to dump their PCs which cannot be upgraded, for new PCs.As for how the operating system actually works: a grade of Fair. YESTERDAY, THE MICROSOFT UPDATE WEBSITE WAS DOWN WHICH, ACCORDING TO MICROSOFT'S DISCUSSION WEBSITE SEEMED TO BE A PROBLEM WITH OTHER WINDOW USERS AS WELL. Typical</review_text>
I received the package and read the instructions.  In retrospect there were hints buried there that indicated this may not go well.  It did not.  My installation stalled out and would not complete rendering the computer useless.  I had to take it to a professional to get it going.  Even so, I have had problems with Internet Explorer stopping suddenly, BSOD's.  This is not a job for the average computer user</review_text>
It is now almost a month since I bought the upgrade to XP Prof. for my destop computer running W2K Prof. I have had nothing but trouble. My notebook computer, connected by a wireless next for almost 18 months, suddenly could not connect to the desktop. All network setup and trouble-shooting help did nothing. I called MS and things got worse. Now I have an dditional problem (no sound on my desktop) and the first problem remains unsolved. I have been through three layers of MS technicians, only the last of which spoke English with an accent close enough to mine to be understood. Nonce could fix the problems and they are now "researching" the problem and supposed to call me this morning. During one of the calls, the tech. tried to blame it on my notebook. If any of you are old enough to remember when there was only one telephone company, you'll ercognize the situation. Right now, I would prefer getting a refund and returning to W2K</review_text>
First of all, Microsoft needs to come down on their prices (Not that this will ever happen). I build computers for a living, and I'd say that 9 times out of 10 Windows is the single most expensive piece of any PC I build. That being said, XP has come a long way. Service pack 2 has done wonders for security. I also found it is the most stable version of Windows I've used to date. That's not to say it doesn't have it's flaws. It still lets in it's share of "germs", stops responding from time to time (hangs), and it's very slow to shut down. The built-in CD writing software is TERRIBLE and Remote Desktop is not always a pleasure to use either. However, the biggest problem I've had so far is with product activation. As a PC technician, I'm always testing new parts. The most annoying problem I've had is that after you make a certain number of hardware changes (let's say you replace a video card, a hard drive and add some memory) all within a certain period of time (180 days maybe?) Windows makes you reactivate. This becomes a problem when you have to reactivate twice within this period of time. It makes you call Microsoft, where you have to convince the representitive that you're not trying to steal from them. Then you have to read them a long number (I think 41 digits) and then they'll read another long number back to you that you need to type in. It's driven me to the point of using Windows 2000 again to test my parts, even though this isn't always practical for testing XP compatibility.Overall, I feel that I paid too much for this operating system.</review_text>
There are issues regarding hardware incompatibility w/ specific components of the Toshiba Satellite M45-S355. The hardware incompatibility issues w/ the DVD-RAM drive, the GL910 chipset, and the SoundMax integrated audio drivers are known to both Microsoft Technical Service personnel and their counterparts at Toshiba. I spent an hour of fruitless time on a conference call with technicians from both companies (both of whom spoke what could loosely be descibed as "English"). The Amazon representative with whom I spoke was in New Delhi. I ultimately figured out (on my own) which Toshiba drivers needed to be downloaded (again consuming hours of download time with a 56K modem), and I used an Iomega CD-Rom USB external drive to load the software after about six extremely aggravating hours. I was able to avoid similar pitfalls when attempting to install Small Business Accounting 2006. Don't buy these products unless you absolutely MUST. Microsoft's "technical service" is a euphemism more aptly meaning "technically useless". There is nothing technically professional about the additional capabilities of Microsoft XP Professional. I should also mention that both the Toshiba laptop and the software were purchased from Amazon</review_text>
I assumed, incorrectly, that Adobe's customer service would be professional and quick. I have called three times in the past two weeks and have had to wait, at a minimum, 23 MINUTES just to speak to someone.When I finally got my product, they sent the Mac verion rather than the PC version I purchased. I called again and waited approximately 30 MINUTES to get customer help. I had originally ordered the PC Standard version and asked to upgrade (and pay difference) for the Professional version -- since I still hadn't received the PC version. Customer service stated that they would ONLY ship me the Standard version to replace the incorrectly shipped Mac Version and then I would have to wait for the Standard verison to arrive at which point I could call again, and ask to exchange for the Professional verion - INSANE!!!  Adobe's call center is easily the worst customer service I have dealt with -- and I've dealt with some bad customer service</review_text>
I use PDFs a lot and I must say that quite often I turn to Free PDF software to actually do the tasks that Acrobat fails to do. One area I have always had a problem with is the formatting of some documents in size and sometimes Acrobat simply fails to recognize them and so I switch to the Free PDF software which has no problems doing this and is easier to use.However if you are a pro PDF maker who wants to add sigs and links and notes and chapters and all the other function tags including security tags then I recommend this product hands down as the best one. I just find that it is not always the best PDF software package in the world, but a good one all the same.I would not recommend buying this one just to make standard PDF files alone. If you want to touch up those file then this is what you need to do that right.</review_text>
...for InDesign to not have one basic features. Everyone I know still does french folds, but in order to see double page spreads in InDesign you have to lay them out wrong in the program, then you have to painstakingly go through your document and shift the entire document by one page, layout by layout. This is mortally stupid. At this point Adobe should have figured how a tool like I.D. is actually used in conjunction with a printer, not just assumed the user wants to print what they see on their screen. The oversight is the difference between avergage klunky desktop publishing software and a great layout tool. Why isn't there a button that toggles me between the layout view and priont output? Why do I have to slave over a document like this? Adobe, stop thinking in the abstract and investigate how your software can facilitate printed results.Also who knows how you get an alpha path or clipping path into this? Mine shows me a heavily pixelated, entirely xparent BW image when it supposed to be a cropped color image. What do you want me to do with that</review_text>
The title of this product is a joke.  It should be called "Not Easy CD burning".  Roxio version 5 was much easier than this one is.  It is way too complicated for burning simple CDs</review_text>
First of all, this software performs like someones term project.  Why havent these guys been sued yet?Pros:Nice retail packagingCons:Not testedDoesnt burn all your filesNO supportOverall a waste of moner</review_text>
I recently purchased the software above only to find it does not support my dvd drive  (HL-DT-ST RW/DVD GCC-4482B (1.00)I have unsuccessfully tried to contact roxio support three times.  No response.  I did go through the long list of supported drives and also emailed my problem to Roxio.  Needless to say, I am very disappointed and do not recommend the purchase of this software.I have a new Gateway desktop that came with the above drive.</review_text>
I found this program simple, easy to operate. However, when creating a DVD project I used a narration for my audio.  The narration matched each picture perfectly, when I decided to burn it all of the audio was thrown off.  Do NOT count on any tech support.  They offer an online chat with tech support but do not respond or are not online at all.  You have the option of forking over $35 PER INCIDENT in order to get a real live person on the phone- but it still does not guarantee it will help.  And now, I'm not even able to burn it!!!! I hate this program</review_text>
I used Easy Creator 4 for years. Bought new computers so bought Easy Creator 6. It will not work on 2 E-Machines with XP. It wipes out CD rom drive so that it is unusable. I requested tech support 6/12/06. It's 7/15/06 and I am still waiting. I uninstalled it. I found Easy Creator 5 platinum on Amazon and ordered it. It works</review_text>
This Roxio software has caused me the most bizarre and frustrating experience ever.  First, it doesn't work.  Second, I cannot obtain any support from Roxio to find out why.  They won't give support until you register, the only way to register is to follow a web link that comes with the software, and it takes you to a website that either doesn't exist, or is always down.  Thus, it turns out to be a complete waste of money, not to mention several hours of time.  RUN, don't WALK away from this software and this company</review_text>
this product does nothing.  i put in 30 dvds and vcds and none were able to be copied.  easy dvd burner if u can actually find a dvd that is able to burn.  everything is copy protected...and i hear that over and over again.  there is a reason why this product is so cheap...BECAUSE IT DOES NOTHING AT ALL!  u CANT burn dvds.  you can only take a few files you might already have and burn them on a disk that does not play on a dvd player.  thats it.  dont waste you money on this.  its worthless..</review_text>
Loaded it on my laptop. It says that a compatible device was not found.Went to website, downloaded patch. It said I had the latest patch already.Everywhere you go on the roxio website, it tells you you can upgrade to version 8 for $20 off. It still is more than $50 and if Version 6 doesn't work, why would I throw more money at the problem?I could find no usefull information on the website and no way to speak to someone.I took it back to Best Buy. They said they could only exchange it for the same piece of junk. I went next door to Staples and they said if I bought software that does not work from them, they would refund my money if I bought it back within 14 days. So, I found a new source for software.Pros:It did not crash my laptopIt did not cause the modem to dial international callsCons:Doesn't workno tech supportdoesn't workno tech suppor</review_text>
Acrobat 5 was so buggy that I thought I'd give Adobe a couple of product cycles before upgrading. Should have waited longer. There have been improvements in v7: a better look, better commenting, the ability to add text that actually prints, and far better OCR functionality. But other basic functions are way worse than in v5: some Word documents that were easy to convert to pdf in v5 will not convert in v7, seems to be something to do with font license issues. Installation is a nightmare and repeated re-installation was required to get past system hangs, clashes with standard security software, and endless errors in the automatic update feature. The new product activation makes this even more of a pain because too many re-installations force you to activate by phone. Despite my already low expectations of Adobe, this product is a disappointment. With Acrobat 7, Adobe is, as usual, charging top $ for what any decent company would consider an embarrassing mess even as a beta version.(For reference, my system is Window XP pro, Pentium 4 3GHz, 2.5GB RAM)</review_text>
I am very disappointed with this product.  Using the features of it are very difficult (red eye, sizing, etc.) in addition, digital photos downloaded into Photo Album 6 are of poor quality/clarity on the computer screen. I expected more from it but have found I have less.  I will not buy an upgrade but rather will look for another product with similar and more easy use features</review_text>
I used a bundled package in a new laptop to create a photo album. When trial time expired, I purchase the full package. I could not open the existing album with the new software. The new full package is hard to use and the so called 1000's of templates can not be found. USE SOMETHING ELSE!!!I even e-mailed Corel about this. Its been 4 days, I have NOT had a response.DO NOT BUY!!! I RATE THIS PRODUCE AS A -2 STARS</review_text>
It's to bad I can't give negative stars as this package certainly deserves them. This program is total garbage. A gargantuan waste of both time and money.Seemingly with every menu change, it recatalogues your entire photo collection, on ALL DRIVES, which takes HOURS (like 12+) to accomplish. And, while it will scan and catalogue all of the drives on your computer, don't even think about selecting a folder and expecting it to display the contents of that folder and all of it's subfolders. Ain't a gonna happen... but is will happily go through and catalogue them again for you, but, of course, after waiting hours for the software to finish catalogueing, it doesn't display the contents.  No, that would be way to logical.After realizing that my computer had slowed to a crawl, I checked the memory usage and found that the Corel Photo Album 6 Deluxe was using 6 to 7 times higher than any other program running, and that includes Norton Internet Security, a notorious memory hog! Guess we now know what the DELUXE part is!As far as I am concerned, Corel Photo Album 6 Deluxe is neither intuitive nor is it the "Best of" anything. It is a creeping, bloated dinosaur and a total waste of your hard earned money.</review_text>
I do not like software. It always hang no matter what I did. Maybe this is becasue it has not finished the index process? I had many many photos  in my computer.</review_text>
I am extremelly disappointed with Roxio, the makers of CD Creators; especailly Easy CD Creator 5.   I purchased Easy CD Creator 5, sometime back from an affiliate of Amazon.com.  It was dispatched promptly and in very good condition.  I installed it on my computer running Windows 98.   After some initial problmes it was running fine.A few days back I installed Windows XP professional on my computer, and I got a message that the CD Creator was not compatible with this version of Windows.  It hinted to contact Roxio.  I tried contact Roxio with the help of the link, but found it impossible to send them my message.   They have an automated "Roxann" that is so difficult to understand.  Next they invite you to a "Webticket" and you are supposed to mention your problem on it.   But when you submit your query or complain, nothing happens.  The site just stares at you dumbly!! There is no way to obtain Roxio's mailing address either.  So now I am stuck with this "Easy CD Creator 5" with no help from Roxio?</review_text>
The first version of Easy CD Creator I used was CD Creator 4 basic. It was okay, pretty much what it said it was: basic. I got the upgrade to that from an Ebay auction and it worked pretty good. Later due to lack of support by the manufacturer for new CDRW drives in good old version 4, I upgraded to CD Creator 5 Platinum (The version being sold here.) This too worked pretty good - for a little while. Then the operation was moved over from Adaptec to Roxio, and from that point onward, things have been more thorny than rosy.Roxio will REQUIRE you to register the product in order to download the (ONE) utterly essential update to keep this thing running. Perhaps you don't mind that, but I feel it's a somewhat minor invasion of privacy. Plus you have to keep track  of your password to the website and if you change ISP's you will have to RE-REGISTER. A hassle to say the least. Also , since Roxio took the reins, there are no further updates being provided. Instead Roxio tries to "encourage" (read "browbeat") you into getting the software upgrade for even more money. This upgrade will NOT work on Win98SE, which I still use for various reasons. So IF I were to upgrade the software AGAIN, I would also have to spend the extra money for a new operating system with all the faults and foibles that can introduce with other apps that I need and still use. If you have money to burn along with all those shiny round coasters you are going to be making, I applaud you. I prefer to keep a little cash for retirement.It is difficult if not impossible to get support from any real carbon-based life form, and the website gives little or no support for some of the issues you may face, such as getting "Illegal Request" errors from Direct CD, or inability to format or erase CDRW's that was once possible in version 4. Also, any CDRW's created in version 4 MAY NOT be readable with the new software, or at the least there are some technical issues with this. At any rate, it is not neccessarily all that "EASY" unless you are fairly technically inclined and understand (or are willing to learn) some of the finer technical points in CD recording technology. I prefer not to be bothered with it, I just want to create some CDs.I now find that some functions do not work appropriately at all, especially Direct CD, a program that originally provided the ability to do "drag and drop" writing of files to a Read/Write CD. Now I find that Direct CD is non-functional, and the only CD's I can write are CDR's, and there are problems growing in that area as well. Speed of the CDRW or brand of the recording media does not seem to be the issue. The software simply refuses to work as it once did.It shouldn't be called "EASY CD Creator". Perhaps "IRRITATING" CD Creator would be more appropriate.In Summary: This does not deserve stars. Perhaps a few "BLACK HOLES"? While I once would have given wholehearted supported this product, regrettably I cannot support it with the same enthusiasm now.</review_text>
I spent the last 3 hours trying to get support for this product. Although the site did not reject me it sent me through loops to get an "update" that when run, errored out as soon as it began</review_text>
This program is average to below average in it's abilities.That said, just hope you don't need any Roxio tech support.Why? because Roxio's  support bites!You CANNOT contact anyone online or by email for help;whenever their dis-functional "web portal" [web-based support] system traps you in an endless loop.I needed an couple simples updates for a pc that is NOT ALLOWED on the internet.It used to be you could download Roxio's PATCHES from any pc having internet access.Then burn patch[s] to a CD, or copy to floppy/jumpdrive.Then "sneakernet" the patches to the pc needing them.NO MORE.What happened today was that their webpage was apparently trying to download/patch a roxio product directly on MY pc.[EZCD5 doesn't exist on my pc].Instead of simply letting me download it somewhere, like to my hard drive, vs patchging it directly from their webpage to my pc,[which won't work in my case as I'm not using roxio, nor have it installed on my pc];apparently the morons that did the roxio webpage coding make the download/patch process STOP/END and proceed to send the customer back to Roxio's initial patch download page.When you need a patch, all these endless loops and support gamesare enough to get me looking for a different product/different company.If you want to minimize human contact with customers, fine.But let folks at least download the patches they need in order to keep their pc going.Don't hand over your customer support system [almost] completely to a WEB SERVER.That ignorant arrangement works about as well as when companies try to save a few pennies and get rid of phone receptionists for customer service telephone calls.Then they let customers wade through a 100 layer deep voicemail system to find the answer to a simple problem.IT JUST DOESN'T WORK.If a company won't provide access to PATCHES,even after I have logged into their website with username and password, [so they know is accessing their patches]AND they  don't offer any type ofFTP site  as a download backup  option, thenI sure as heck won't be buying anymore of their products.I see why Roxio bought up CeQuadrat and other companies.[Though I hate to see such quality companies be devoured like that].When a competitor has a better product, why fight to improve your prodsuct's quality/features, when you can buy the other company out.Thank goodness Nero is not under the Roxio umbrella.</review_text>
Despite many attempts and a complete reinstall of Windows XP, my XP machine refused to load Easy CD Creator 5 Platinum, rendering the progam disc and all update discs useless.Probably if you already had the program running in a 98 environment and then upgraded to XP you could keep it running with patches and updates.  So take statements by resellers that they provide update discs with a grain of salt.  If you cannot install the primary program, the update disc is of no use.The program is a good one but you have to run it on a 98 machine.</review_text>
The Easy Language 16 is only useful if you're already familiar with the language you wish to learn.  I've been studying French for months before buying this product and found it to be helpful when I'm getting rusty.  The only problem is that it's hard to make out what is being said because the sound is not clear.  The recorded speakers also don't bother to slow down to give you a chance to understand or repeat what is being said.  This is good cause it's like listening to an actual French speaker and not a robot, bad if you actually want to learn how to pronounce what is being said.  It will also go over basic French grammar but is totally useless if you don't already know basic French grammar.I also tried to use this to learn Japanese.  Unlike French, I'm not familiar with the Japanese language at all so trying to use this product to learn it became a nightmare.  If all you want to do is learn how to speak the language it does have a Romanized version of the words and phrases to make it easier to sound them out.  Unfortunately the basic Japanese grammar and Japanese alphabet are all written in Japanese.  For instance, in the grammar section it has the past, present and future "I am"  it's written in english then beside it it's written in Japanese.  You can't click them to have it sound out for you.  In the Japanese alphabet section all it has is the Japanese alphabet and you can click them to sound them out but you really have no clue what you are sounding out.  So it teaches you nothing about reading the language but the test they want you to take are purely in Japanese.  I do want to learn how to read, write and speak Japanese so none of this would be a problem if it actually taught you how to read, write, and speak Japanese!   So my guess would be that you really have to be familiar with Japanese (NOT the Romanized(Romanjj) version) already in order to use this product.  Because of my experiences with this product I would say get it only if you know the languages you're interested in and use it as a refresher and nothing more.  Since I am familiar with French this product was pretty helpful but if I used this as a starter for the language I probably would have quit.  I'm searching Amazon for better Japanese books. So if you want to actually learn a language look to the books with the language tapes and CD's</review_text>
My boss asked me to get this, so that he check out the Latin portion of it.What a waste!  The only Latin on this CD is *Latin* American Spanish.The interface was underwhelming. I needed to guess at what did what, because the controls are mostly icons. What's worse, there is no  menu bar at the top to help take the guess work out of using the program.Apparently though, the manufacturer did throw in an extra *not* listed on the back.  If you are learning the differences between US and UK English, its there!I gave this one star, only because I couldn't give it no stars</review_text>
I found this title messing around adding things to my wish list.  I only read the blurb on Amazon enough to see Haitian Creaole listed as one of the languages.  Today updating my wish list I took extra time to find out why this was rated so low since nearly every thing on my list is 4 stars or more!  How unfortunate to find out that others before me made the mistake I almost made buying this in hopes of it having Haitian Creole!  Very disappointing!!!!  The makers should be ashamed</review_text>
They have the hebrew backwards!! You are supposed to read hebrew right to left-the opposite of english and this cd has it left to right. I find it extremely confusing. I know how to read hebrew and I wanted to learn how to speak it.What a poor effort!</review_text>
I just bought and installed this CD with the hopes of learning some Haitian Creole, and I, too, couldn't find it.  There is absolutely nothing on the installation CD that mentions either Haiti or creole... except the jewel case which insists it's there.  I'm so dissapointed I haven't actually tested anything else out:  I consider this a VERY bad start</review_text>
I just bought this cd because I am learning Haitian creole, and that's one of the languages that is supposed to be on this cd. When I installed it, I was unable to find anything on the CD in Haitian creole, even though it is listed as one of the languages on the case. So it has been a complete waste of money for me, perhaps if I was interested in the other languages I could give it more stars.It also says in the blurb that u can use any of the 16 languages as the source language, but that is not possible either, u can only chooose a few of the languages as your source. I am very disappointed in the false advertising for this product. If anyone can find creole on this cd I would be happy to stand corrected.PS I contacted IMSI and they say the cd's were mislabelled, there is no haitian creole on the cd, despite the fact that it is listed on the cover</review_text>
Acrobat 5 was so buggy that I thought I'd give Adobe a couple of product cycles before upgrading. Should have waited longer. There have been improvements in v7: a better look, better commenting, the ability to add text that actually prints, and far better OCR functionality. But other basic functions are way worse than in v5: some Word documents that were easy to convert to pdf in v5 will not convert in v7, seems to be something to do with font license issues. Installation is a nightmare and repeated re-installation was required to get past system hangs, clashes with standard security software, and endless errors in the automatic update feature. The new product activation makes this even more of a pain because too many re-installations force you to activate by phone. Despite my already low expectations of Adobe, this product is a disappointment. With Acrobat 7, Adobe is, as usual, charging top $ for what any decent company would consider an embarrassing mess even as a beta version.(For reference, my system is Window XP pro, Pentium 4 3GHz, 2.5GB RAM)</review_text>
If I had $1 for every time a CS2 app crashed and made expend real hours to redo work, I'd have about $10. And that's enough for me to say, BEWARE of this set of applications! Adobe has allowed them to get too bloated, too slow, and the results are that all the programs (but principally GoLive, InDesign and Illustrator, in that order) are crashy and will quite suddenly, forcing you to expend the precious hours of your life redoing work you just finished. I cannot stress how disappointed I am in Adobe, and how distraught I am that we as a nation have allowed the only two competing companies to join, thus guaranteeing that there will be less quality and innovation in the future. In any event, do not buy the CS2 apps, Adobe does not deserve your support</review_text>
Yeah, I know it's the industry standard, and it's powerful, and all that stuff.  But, MY GOD, what a freaking PAIN to use.  It's just plain tedious to draw anything from scratch.  While the interface in CS2 is an improvement, doing relatively simple drawings with primitive shapes and freehand curves still requires much more effort than it reasonably should.  Frankly, I could draw better stuff faster with 1990's-era Macintosh drawing programs.  The drawing issues are compounded by the fact that -- in true Adobe spirit -- this program is incredibly bloated and slow.  It's slow doing EVERYTHING... I've never seen a program so slow starting up.  And every time you save a file (even a tiny drawing with 10 shapes) you get a "saving file" progress bar for a few seconds.  It's also incredibly slow to shut down... frequently taking about 30 seconds.  I'm running it on a Pentium M laptop, and I know this is not a "graphics professional" machine, but COME ON!  Let's get the lead out!  I just get the sense that Adobe pays no attention whatsoever to efficiency or speed.  That bugs me a lot</review_text>
Microsoft Office can be handy to have.  The files you can open, edit and create with it (most notably .doc, .xls, and .ppt) are probably the closest to universal compatibility among all your high quality options. It's (relatively) intuitive.  It has a pretty broad array of useful functions.It's also obscenely expensive, considering the fact that you can get all of these things -- .doc, .xls, and .ppt; intuitive interface; and functionality -- for free.I hunted up OpenOffice two years ago when I decided several hundred dollars was an insane price to pay for the ability to write papers, make basic presentations, or put together spreadsheets.  I was looking for basic functionality, but I was pleasantly surprised; OpenOffice does most of the neat tricks, too.  (Actually, it has a neat trick Microsoft can never replicate: it's open source, so it can respond to the needs of individual users.  You just say "Add this neat trick!"  and someone will likely be able to do it for you.)It is possible that Microsoft Office has some killer feature you absolutely must have that OpenOffice doesn't.  But considering the price differential, I wouldn't splurge on this before checking.</review_text>
Office 97 was a pretty good product. The programs were powerful, had a decent interface (maybe not as good as the Claris products of the early 1990s, but not bad), and came with a ton of features all on one disc. The Office 98 release for Mac was pretty much the same thing. The only thing that really got annoying for me was the office assistant (paperclip) but it is easy enough to turn off.Office 2000 was a bit of a disappointment for me. I felt that the improvements were minimal (aside from a bit more stability in Word--anyone who has ever used Word 97 on a regular basis knows it's prone to crashing) and in fact detracted from the ease of use. One example is the clip gallery, which went from being one of the best organizers ever created to becoming a program that wouldn't have received decent reviews in 1988. Another is PowerPoint's outline feature. I always turned this off because it ate up monitor space and therefore made the actual slide smaller. When you use smaller displays like I often do this is a problem. The menus, which hide some functions until you go to the bottom of them, were also an annoyance. The manual went from being a nice thick book to one half the size.Office 2003 continues making the program uglier. Now there are many tasks crammed onto one little panel on the right of the screen. Again, this eats into the workspace. The clip art system is even more cumbersome, and many of the clips are online only now. The help feature tries to point too much in the online direction as well. Now some people may not complain, but what if you're using a laptop in the middle of the country?I feel that the program is basically an uglier version of the same thing that was first seen in 1997. In fact, the 1997 version was more pleasant to work with and almost as powerful. On my Macs, I've switched to Keynote for presentations and Pages for some of my word processing because the new Office versions on that platform are similar.Some of the templates also look very 1997. Apple's programs are updated on a regular basis, and their templates look very modern. Now I know Microsoft adds some new ones now and then, but they should consider redesigning many of them--such as replacing the overused Arial and Times New Roman fonts with something a little more classy.The program is bloated way too heavily. I can run Office 2000 comfortably on a 486 with sub-1GB hard drive, but can't even get 2003 on it.A final gripe is that Access is not user friendly at all. File Maker is a better alternative, as it is easier to use and friendlier</review_text>
Ok! Being the richest human being on the planet called earth, Bill Gates decided that he's not wealthy enough. So he released this Microsoft office 2003, which I really think is not much different from previous edition. The price is, as usual, very expensive. What's worse is that Bill Gates decided all the pre-installed windows in new laptops and desktops come with the trial version. So mere mortals like us need to spend extra BIG money buying the full version to simply do some basic documents.I can see Bill Gates, being a deified bloodsucker, using $100 dollar bills as toilet paper, and laughing at us who work their butt off just to make enough money to live. SO SHAME ON YOU BILL GATES AND MICROSOFT</review_text>
Microsoft is simply sloppy with their programming!"Open Office" is a better program, is open-source (meaning if you don't want some paperclip's help, you simply don't download that part of it) AND OPEN OFFICE is FREE! It is also compatible with most of the functions that MS Office uses (and is upgraded with new features faster than MS's product, which is a rip-off!)MS's Office 97 was the best of the Office suites, even though it did have it's problems, Spending the money to supposedly "upgrade" to this (or any other Microsoft product for that matter) is simply burning your money!)OPen-source software is FREE, it's perfectly legal, it is open t anyone decompiling it, so if you want to make your own custom goodies, you can, but then there are so many written by so many people willing to share, you don't have to develop your own, as there are already *SO* many freebie ones (and some low-cost additions by some places, but most are free) that if you want whistles and bells, or even a Christmas theme in February, you can get it for OPEN OFFICE! (Not so with this or ANY Microsoft product for that matter)Simply sloppy programming - nothing more, AND you can get a fully functioning and compatable office suite for free legally</review_text>
While Microsoft tries very hard to make Office "think ahead of me," they almost always seem to get it wrong.  The result is a package that consistently annoys me.  It is true that one can turn off the "helpful" hints and otherwise customize the programs so that they are less hindering, however the bloated package will nevertheless usurp your computers resources like nobody's business.  In my opinion, Office '97 was an excellent package, and the versions since then have gone steadily downhill.  As with many people, I use Office at work because I have no choice.  At home I've had good luck with StarOffice from Sun.  While not perfect, StarOffice has read and created files compatible with Microsoft Office very consistently in my experience, and it's a whole lot less expensive.  I am therefore hesitant to recommend Microsoft Office Professional Edtition 2003 to anyone except those who need the most advanced functions of Excel and/or need to use Access database frequently.</review_text>
I bought this upgrade because I thought it would let me share my contacts. It says so on the box, but it doesn't. It works just like the old contacts which you can't share with others except if you export it. No live sharing. Why couldn't they make it so I could put the file on my server? Or on a secure site? Then all my office can work off one contact list.50% or more of the time the business contacts can't be found when you search for a contact. It's like the business contacts is an add in that doesn't work with Outlook. Or you add contacts, save it, email to the saved email address and then go to find the contact later and it is gone.Also, lots of times when you try to SEND, the email won't SEND, it stays in the outbox. And repeatedly you open and hit the SEND button but it won't change to SEND status. Now, if you leave it in the outbox, sometimes that fools the program into letting you send other email. Or sometimes you can FORWARD and SEND.. Geez, what a waste of money this upgrade was. We won't be using it on any of our other computers and we haven't bought if on the new computers we have ordered.</review_text>
Before you donate your hard-earned money yet again to Bill Gates' 'Feed the Multi-Billionaire Fund', do yourself and the world a favor and search for 'Star Office 8' on Amazon and read the reviews there. I use MS Office Professional 2003 in the office, and just cannot believe how badly so many businesses and individuals are being ripped off by Microsoft for this BLOAT-ware.Star Office 8 is under $50 from Amazon and is fully compatible with Microsoft Office, and includes full functionalities of MS Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Visio, and Access. Let me know what MS software I can buy under $100, let alone $50. Hopefully, this is the beginning of the end of the Microsoft Monopoly, and the dawning of the Era of Sanity in computer software.</review_text>
In the last year I have tried this program, PC-Cillin & four sharewares from CNET, and f-ZA the only one that doesn't cause more problems than it solves. The others prevent me from doing wireless printing, slowdown the computer & generate false alarms</review_text>
i bought this item because my husband heard is the best internet security.  Now i regret buying one.  Since ive installed it, IT SLOWED MY COMPUTER, ITS VERY VERY HARD TO CLOSE WINDOW AND WORSE WHEN I DISCONNECTED FROM THE INTERNET I HAVE A HARD TIME LOGGING OFF.  everytime im on the internet,i get mad and upset. its not worth all the stress. i definitely dont recommend this product. now im trying to figure how i can return the product and go back to NOrton</review_text>
Everything has been said about this product. When it's working, you're happy. With my 8 version, almost everything was fine. With the 10 version, it's a bloody nightmare. I'm giving up, throwing my Dazzle DVC150 to the junk and looking for another system to transfer my VHS to DVD. NEVER Pinnacle again</review_text>
I've worked with Pinnacle Studio versions 8.0, 9.0, 9.4., 10.0, and this one.  And they've all had two things in common:1.  When the program works, it's superb.2.  The other 50% of the time, it crashes frequently, and hard.For years, Pinnacle had designed the market's top, novice-affordable video editing/authoring platforms, but for some frustrating reason, they just can't seem to keep the bugs out.  Studio Plus v10.5 is no exception.Lately, the competition in this market has mushroomed, and there are better alternatives available for the same price.  At last, others have emulated the Pinnacle platform while eliminating the work/creativity-killing bugs.My advice?  Shop around.  Google the competition.  But save yourself the frustration and steer away from anything Pinnacle</review_text>
Crashes on every thing I try to do. I've never seen such a poor excuse for a program. I paid 70 dollars for it and am now throwing it in the TRASH.</review_text>
I used Version 8 and 9 and NEVER experienced a problem.  Version 10.latest version is terrible.  Crash and burn.  Don't take their advice and re-install your operating system.  Its THEIR software and not the OS.  Amazon and Pinnacle (Avid) continue to sell this product even though its terrible.  I read it was re-written for version 10 and they CAN'T get it right.  Nonetheless, they still charge full price and for support calls. The upgrade should have been free.There are several good products now so Pinnacle isn't your only choice.  I changed to Sony Vegas and am very happy but it does a have a learning curve.  For super simple try Ulead or one of the others.</review_text>
Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in ...Hold on ... let me start again.Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in editing some fairly interesting ...Dang it! Give me a few minutes here ...Pinnacle Studio can assist ...(Samuel L Jackson-styled expletive) ... how many times is this gonna happen? Start and stop! Start and stop! Enough already!One more time. Now, what was I saying?Oh, yeah ... Pinnacle Studio can assist the amateur videographer in editing some fairly interesting video ... if you can keep it up and running.Got the idea?Just adding my voice to the chorus of those have experienced the frustration of the Pinnacle products. This is a bargain-priced product for which you will pay the cost of long hours of irritation and heart-pounding races to meet project deadlines -despite the software malfunctions.After installing the program, installing the patches, uninstalling the program and patches and reinstalling the program and the patches, I am still experiencing too many crashes.If you intend to use this program to piece together a video of Uncle Morty's birthday party, the family vacation or your neighbor's kid's bar mitzvah, the cost and the ease of this program may outweigh the annoyance of its aforementioned weakness. If, however, your video projects fit under the category of "job description," then I suggest spending the money for Adobe Premiere</review_text>
Let me sum up this software "total junk"Pinnacle will give you one free support phone call for help, then $25 for the next call.They give you free email support, but answer everything but your problem.   They try and blame it on Windows XP, and will have you reload Windows.I owned Studio 8, and it worked fine.   Went to Studio 9, and had a few problems.   Upgraded to Studio 9 Plus, and after a week of trying to make it render my projects with no sucess, and crash after crash, I removed it from my machine.They sent me an offer of their all new 10.5 plus upgrade, Hollywood FX, 3 of their Premium packs, and a hat that says Studio 10 on it.   This said that the program had been rebuilt from bottom up.    This program should be called "Crash after Crash", and the only thing that works is the hat.If you feel the urge to waste $100, and hours of your time, just buy this product.Look at the reviews on Studio 10, and the other Studio products, and most only have one star.   Out of over 100 reviews over 95% had one star.   I found one with 5 stars, but looking at the reviewers other reviews he is obviously an employee, or share holder in the company.   He wrote a 1 star review on a Sony competative product, and 5 star reviews for other Pinnacle products that you would not own if 10.5 worked</review_text>
I've been a user of Pinnacle version 8 (which I loved), and needed to update to a version that could burn dual layer DVDs.  What a disappointment this "upgrade" has been.  Crash after crash.  What is most disappointing is that Pinnacle built in a feed back system so the users could "help" them develop a better product.  This means to me that they knowingly released bad code, and used their customers as guinny pigs while sticking us for a $100.  Guess what, I don't want to help Pinnacle build a better product.  I want a product that works when I purchase it.Lesson learned.  Next time I read a bad review on a product, I'm staying away</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this program. But I was also thinking it would be more comprehensive and include more than just basic words and phrases. Even so, the male and female guides in the program often pronounce the words slightly different which can be frustrating. I learned more Icelandic (along with correct pronounciations) while in Iceland than I did with this program. And besides, anyone under the age of 50 in Iceland speaks English</review_text>
i was charged the full price of 49.95 with no $20 coupon inserted</review_text>
I have owned eleven VCOM products and from now on, they don't have my business. The product touts itself in part as a vital tool when/if your machine crashes. If it does, be prepared to shell out the cost for another complete program. You are told that the program is already installed on another machine and you can't run it-although this occurs after a lengthy and cumbersome installation process. Sadly, customer assistance is no help-emails are unanswered and you can't get through via phone...What you do get from them once you register are constant emails about new products. Thanks, folks. Version 6.0 is also much slower than Version 5. Support for 5.0, by the way stopped abruptly when the new edition came out, despite the functionality of that program.   For the price, the software should work like a major player, rather than a dollar bin special.</review_text>
I would not buy it!  Hard to use. My machine runs slower since the install.</review_text>
An Internet search found complaints about not receiving rebates.  Why would they give you something for nothing?I have had several rebate problems and most of them involved free items or insanely cheap items.This "free" software could cost you $30 if the company decides they don't want to pay</review_text>
Be advised, this Software is for a SINGLE USER, only licensed for one computer. I bought this for Home use after using SS% for 2 years and V-Com said it would no longer be supported of 03/06. I installed it on 2 home computers, it worked fine for 4 weeks, then it popped up a Box on my second computer that I couls not use it because it was licensed on another computer, I needed to buy additional license for each computer. When I tried to use it on my Main computer, it popped up the same message. So now it will not work on either computer. I uninstalled it and sent it back. Just because it's Cheap does not mean it's any good</review_text>
I was using VCOM SystemSuite Pro 6 and it was working to my satisfaction.  But, after I reconfigured my PC to "Standard PC", the software rejected my Serial Number, claiming I was using the software on another PC.  I only own ONE pc.  Technical help claimed the serial number has been used on 6 pc's.  Well, that is totally incorrect because, like I said, I only have one pc and the software cd has never left my house.  They have a Bug in their serial number checking process.  Anyway, they would not help me restore the software serial number because I could not furnish proof of purchase.  They think I am a crook. I'm not, I only want what I paid for to work</review_text>
After purchasing the program thinking it would perform a through check on my Presario running XP Home all I get is a message that SSP6 has unexpectedly quite. I emailed tech support w/ the info, but so far no response after 10 days. There is no # to call for support. Maybe I overlooked something.Also, I submitted the rebate form which came on the package, but was told that the seller was not participating in the rebate program and I need to check w/ them. I did and they said they shipped what VCOM had provided them, which included a rebate form if doing a competitive upgrade.Not very impressed w/ either the software or the company. Would never buy another product from these guys, even when the price after rebate is 0. LOF</review_text>
I agree with others who said it crashes the system. Overall, I found SS6 Pro had more problems than it was worth--even if it were free, it's not worth all the time and effort. Besides all the crashes, downloading the virus/spyware updates via dialup TAKES FOREVER! Each download runs 1 to 1 1/2 hours. BE FOREWARNED.In the end, I returned my copy to VCom, though to date I have not yet received a refund</review_text>
I don't have a problem with the software.  It pretty much does what we need but reversing an error can be a nightmare.  Before I start this tirade, I should point out that the customer service reps were very nice.  But they don't have the infrastructure to provide the most basic level of service (please, read on).  The customer support system for the payroll upgrade on this product is really scary.  (1) They want to have access to your checking account to pay for the annual payroll subscription!!  (2) They DO NOT SEND RECEIPTS!!  I help with the books for a small non-profit and paid for the payroll subscription on my own credit card.  The only receipt I could get was a copy of the invoice, which is not formatted to print correctly on an HP1200 (duh!!).  What is really disturbing is that these people are supposed to be accounting experts!  If you acquiesce to the checking account withdrawal, the only receipt you receive is the line item on your bank statement.  Have they every heard of a "paper trail".  Well you sure won't get one if you purchase the payroll subscription for this product.  I will start looking for an alternative to Intuit because they obviously don't understand some basic accounting and auditing principles.</review_text>
This dictionary is not for the person who English is his second language. It does not have enough sentence examples to let you know how to use each entry word. In addtion, the micro doesn't work well with MS Word.</review_text>
I was thoroughly disappointed.  The first few words I looked up in the thesaurus were not listed -- words like upholstery!  When I went online to see what I might be able to glean from their online site, first Fogware had not sent me a coupon, then I had to deal with bad customer service (I am not doing business with any companies anymore that give bad support) then after I finally got the coupon code they had left out of my box, the online info is exactly what we have in the cd -- so save your money and do not subscribe to their extended services site unless you need a spanish online dictionary also!  VERY BAD!  I am now going to go buy Roget's and check it out</review_text>
This is the worst thing I have ever bought. I bought it because I am having some trouble in spanish in school. I bought it thinking that if I gave a english word it would give you the spanish word or vise versa. But all it does is give you the definition and does not give you the english word.So save your self 20 dollars and don't buy thi</review_text>
Although this dictionary's contents are extensive, the screen functions are relics from the DOS era.  They are laborious and clumsy.  To find a word for difinition, it has to be spelled perfectly, there's no list of proximations to the word entered.  Changing a word selection is also clumsy especially in the thesaurus when the cursor doesn't show up in the entry slot. If someone knows of a better software, I'd sure like to hear cause this thing sucks!!  Maria McGowan</review_text>
The definitions and thesaurus cross referencing are very good. The user interface is quite honestly shameful. Software companies got away with this years ago, but there are now accepted standards for windows user interfaces (e.g keyboard short cuts are missing). Integration with Word 2003 is weak. Numerous bugs and exceptions and very slow</review_text>
This product could put user/customer's life at risk. The mapping software navigates user turning into a one way street and takes you to a very remote off-road. This is the worst product that I have used in my life.</review_text>
The only redeeming quality about this GPS system is that it's cheap.  I used it on a 1,000 mile trip on the east coast the week after I got it.  The navigation is poor. I found that I often had to look over to the laptop screen because I was "off route" so often due to the poor maps. The system repeated the same annoying problems that I see in other feedback.1) The unit would show me being off the road even though I was on an Interstate. In this case it would continually recalculate the route and diretc me to take exits to get off the highway and circle around.2) It directed me to make turns onto one-way streets in the wrong direction.3) It could not locate a POI that turned out to be a few hundred yards away4) It often did not know the correct side of the road for my destination5) It doesn't provide a chime when it's time for a turn.  It will tell you the turn is a half-mile ahead, but that might be the last time you hear an instruction.6) In one case, it got me to my destination (at least close enough) but couldn't guide me back to my starting point.The GPS receiver seemed to acquire and hold the satellite signal well. But the maps are poor, as is the verbal instruction - it sounds like a 1980's computer generated voice.If you're looking for a trustworthy guide in unfamiliar areas - this ISN'T it.This is going back asap.</review_text>
I rarely write reviews but I decided to write this since I had this urge to let everyone know that this product is just plain bad.  The review by "Reviewer: RC Lansing Mich" has listed all of my frustrations and I will not go over them again.  But the rating of 4 stars that he has given does not agree with what you will read in his review.The summary of this product is that it is "highly unusable".  You will be tired of using this on your first trip that you will not feel like every using it again.  Yes, you can "manage" you way with this product.  However it is not worth your time and money.And last point that struck a nerve with me about the ols maps database ... the company came out with a plan where customers can send them updated maps, based on locations they have travelled, not covered by the original map database ... come on!</review_text>
I have used MS streets and trips 2005 and 2006 for over a year. It has some map errors that I wish were updated. I read that The Delorme Street Atlas was far superior, so I bought it. It only took one day for me to find a mountain of problems. Not only is the mapping way out of date (Many years) Microsoft Streets and trips 2006 Maps are far more up to date. On many occasions told me to turn the wrong direction on roads even when the road doesn't exist in that direction. It doesn't even know the name of some very old roads Displays..."Unknown Name" While driving on very old established roads it tells me to turn onto a road that is actually an elevated overpass that I am driving 30 feet below. The program actually wanted me to get back on the freeway by making a U-turn from an off ramp to an on ramp. I have used Microsoft streets in all of these same areas and it is much more usable. The Delorme is very confusing and frustrating. I'm sending it back for a full refund</review_text>
There's a reason why this stuff is significantly discounted. This is definitely one of the worst products I have ever bought. I did not do much research. I think the data may be in there, but I could not learn how to make it work. The interface is horrific - unusable. Don't do it</review_text>
I was expecting a lot more from these two CD's. It teaches you a few items of food, basic words like "Hello", Please" and "airplane" and even teaches you to ask "Where are the suitcases"... but then that is about it. I was really hoping for more... much more</review_text>
The description of this product on the Amazon site does not match what I received. Like another reviewer mentioned, the product was actually shipped from the UK so it took longer, and several features listed as being in the product are not there, specifically, exporting/saving of loops is not allowed, and there is no library of 1000+ loops included either. It seems to me to be basically like a demo version. Also, even though it was advertised as being new in the box, all I got was what looks like a (used) CD with no manual or CD key - so much for upgrading later! I am returning it. The SKU should be removed from amazon or the description should be changed to fit what is actually being sent out</review_text>
I received this item today and was surprised1) It was shipped from overseas (UK)2) It came with only one CD instead of two like a previous reviewer thought3) No paperwork - it came in a clear case with no artwork, info, etc4) Sonic Foundry sold ACID to Sony in 2003 (according to Sonic Foundry's website) and SF no longer provides support5) I can't get this to register online, which seems a little dodgy, but other than that, it seems functional. No huge library of loops, either. Can't really say I got what I expected</review_text>
In installed this product on a Dell Optiplex GX110 (admittedly not the latest, but still a very standard machine) running Windows 2000 with 512MB of memory. In spite of spending literally hours with the software I was unable to get it to produce an outline or dimensioning of a wall being drawn by dragging the mouse, as clearly illustrated in the accompanying video. Without this feature it is virtually impossible to efficienctly produce exterior or interior walls. Multiple emails to Broderbund have produced autoreplies suggesting that I refer to their Website for help. This site is essentially worthless for all but the most fundamental problems (like not being able to read the install CD).It would also appear that this product is picky about the hardware it supports and also the version of driver. Be prepared for possible frustrations with this product, with little support from the manufacturer. I cannot report on other features of the software because I was never able to produce even the walls of a structure</review_text>
I've used CAD programs written in the 80's that are better than this.   I'll go back to Drawing Board 1.0 over this thing.  Not user friendly.   I can hardly draw a few walls without it crashing.  JUN</review_text>
3D Home Architect is a complete crock. I have attempted to use it many times. After hours of reading and playing with it I am still unable to perform the most simple task. I own V1.3 of this software and it outperforms the current version by light years. I also spent lots of time trading emails with Broderbund in an attempt to obtain either additional product support or a refund and I got nothing. So henceforth they will not see another dime of my hard earned $. Sorry</review_text>
I trusted that this software would do what it claimed to do and was so let down by its lack of performance that I am dumbfounded and left speechless.  During backup process I selected about 15GB of info to backup, spanning 4 DVDs.  Everything looked fine, except for TWO (2) simple errors that I received, indicating that those related files may not have been copied/backed up properly.  I figured no big deal, 2 files/errors out 15GB, I could handle that.  Based upon the false pretenses that my critical info was backed up properly (simple pictures, videos, mp3 files and Financial Files to include previous years tax files), I then proceeded to slick my drive.  Remember, only 2 simple, benign and almost inconspicuous errors during the backup process.  Everything looked great.During the restore process, I then received numerous errors, each of them requiring me to click 'Yes' when asked if I wanted to proceed.  I got tired of clicking Yes around the 100 or so mark and decided to click no.  When you click 'no', EVERYTHING is undone; there is no 'ignore all' function so I had to sit through every prompt and got tired of it and decided that proceeding with 1000 files and answering yes would involve too much pain for me.  I then selected a smaller group of files to have restored, only the 'My Documents' folder but ran into the same situation.  Eventually I ran a test on a small folder to have restored and still ran into the errors but pressed through.  Hardly any of the files were received error free and those that had issues were never restored.  My guess is approximately 2/3 or 3/4 of my files were not restored and of course none that really mattered made it.I had the latest update applied to the program, so that should not be the cause.  I would have done better to slick my entire hard drive without going through the backup process as I would have been at nearly the same place but without experiencing all the headaches, frustrations and an investment of hours, no DAYS of my time.The program has been recently purchased by Microsoft for inclusion in the Vista OS, I imagine.  It will do well as a Microsoft product, as it fails to deliver upon its promises</review_text>
All I wanted was a way to identify some files, remember which ones so every time I wanted to backup, I would press "go" and the backup would start. AlohaBob was too "smart" for my use. First, it has this intelligent file finder that finds what is likely to be backed up.  I indicate that I want to select my own files (which it lets me think I can do). Then thinking it would bring me to browser window -- no, no, no...it still needs to waste time doing its indexing as if I had selected the "smart find". I then manually select my files (great!!). In trying to save the "template" of what files I wanted to backup, it requires that I make it a reoccurring backup with selected backup frequency (YUK!!). I want to back up when I get to it (about once a month, not when it wants to -- I am backing up to a DVD which I need to put in the drive).  OK, so now I am over that and the backup begins - GREAT!!!  Upon returning into the application a month later, I can not select my saved "template" to "run now", it will run when it is scheduled to run :(  So...I need to repeat the whole process just to get the same files as last time backed up.  I exchanged emails with the company and they understood but were not going to "add" the features I described.  Oh well - it looked like such a promising product.  Now I need to find another that satisfies my requirements</review_text>
I really dislike this software.  I'm the type that likes to customize everything and this program just is not made that way.  First, when you initially select files and folders, your disk choices are "C:" or "ALL".  I have several disks and I want to pick and choose, but this program makes that really difficult.  Then you have to pick a destination where the files will be backed up.  Choose carefully, because you won't be allowed to change it later!  And if you want to do incremental backups, be sure to schedule it before you do the initial save, because you can't do it later.  Basically the entire job, future backups and all, must be defined completly at the beginning and can never be changed without completely starting over.</review_text>
Talk about junk! No search capability, mislabeled cds, some cds won't run - in short, YUK!</review_text>
800,000 images without keywords - the only useful parts of this collection are the classic and traditional .tif's that you can take into illustrator and turn into vector.  The high res images aren't, the clipart is less than microsoft office online quality and I've gotten far more use out of a 50,000 image collection b/c they took the time to keyword and catagorize the collection.If you like to look thru a book and put in one of the 32 disks and then find the image - then this collection is for you.  If you want to have any sort of search capabilites, look elsewhere</review_text>
I'm holding on the phone right now trying to get support for this product.  There is no 800 number for tech-support, so it's a long distance call.  I have had the same issue for over a month and still have not been transferred to a tech support person.  They offer only email support, but don't write back.  If you call them on the phone they tell you a support person will call you, but it never happens</review_text>
This game was a little too hard for my tastes. Despite the fact that I played at the junior level I managed to get killed shortly after starting out. I also had to restart the game to figure out what my room number was because once I left the room I couldn't find my way back (all the corridors look alike). So far I've fallen down an elevator shaft, gotten caught breaking and entering, been crushed by an elevator, frozen to death and been hit over the head...I've got to ask is this really appropriate for children</review_text>
I just installed AutoRoute 2007. There is a feature in AutoRoute where you can display various places of interest on the map. In this version, for some installations you can not hide restaurants. This has been reported on the Microsoft UK AutoRoute community website. I loaded the program on a second computer with the same result. Both systems run Window XP Pro. This means for certain cities, like Paris, at certain magnifications, the map is completely cluttered with small green squares which indicate the location of a restaurant. MicroSoft only indicates that they will enter this bug into the work request for the next version of AutoRoute. They also say earlier versions were not affected. You may want to buy 2007 but check out your ability to show/hide all of the items of interest right away and be prepared to be dissappointed. I am going to try finding AutoRoute 2006 for sale</review_text>
My desktop CD-ROM refused to recognize that the CD was in the tray. It did recognize other CDs. My desktop is a HP Pavilion 2000 with Windows XP HomeVersion. My laptop did accept the CD so I know that it is not the CD. I purchased the product for use on my desktop, not the laptop.I would appreciate instructions on fixing the problem</review_text>
this software is useless.  it is a slow and a system resource hog.  you can download dozens of free apps that do a better job than this for free</review_text>
I wanted a simple product with a good red eye removal tool.  This program does not do well with fixing red eye.  Software did not come with a manual. I am computer literate yet I found this software not easy to navigate. I found HP Essentials which is a free download from the HP website to be a better program.</review_text>
I bought the software ( Digital Image Suite 2006 ) before I bought my camera - to be ready to process the pictures I was going to take.A BIG MISTAKE.I bought a Canon 30D camera and record my images in RAW format (*.CR2).UNFORTUNATELY, not all Canon .CR2 RAW files are the same.  So, even though the software says you can edit .CR2 RAW images, it depends on which camera made the image.Here is complaint number two -If you use Microsoft's Customer Service/Technical Support you will be routed to India - and they will just give you an answer that is vaguely related to your problem.After emailing several times and getting nowhere you will find out that you can't write to their Washington state headquarters unless you have the name of someone in the address.So, basically, Microsoft is the largest technical software company in the world with the worst customer service and no American technical support.Now, for the final complaint.  There is no link or method to get updates or upgrades for this program!  So, if I want to use a Microsoft software package to edit my photo images then I will have to buy a new software package - isn't that wonderful.</review_text>
When printing cards it leaves a large border around front of card graphics.  The cards do not print anything like they are shown on box display with front of card display taking up the whole card. When I contacted tech support I was advised that in order to correct this problem my printer must have a borderless printing option.  My printer does not & I have been using another major greeting card software for about a year and half and never had this problem with that program. There is nothing on the outside of box under the system requirements that states this.On the outside of the box it says you can return for refund if not satified within 30 days and that the details are in the box.  There are not any details in the box and when I contacted the company I got run around in circles stating there were two companies involved with the software and was never given information on how it could be returned.  I am stuck with it</review_text>
I tried unsuccessfully several times to install it.I contact their alleged support. They sent me what they deemed a "fix". The fix was awful. It caused my computer to crash and Print Shop would never work.Broderbund used to be a good company but I've had nothing but problems with their software of late.They need to rethink their products, their support, and their company focus.They are lousy at this point.They obviously don't give a dang about quality, support, or their customers</review_text>
Do not order this.  Tech support from broderbund is basically non-existant.  One sorry product</review_text>
On the front of the box it says it can be used for Professional photo editing and has 20,000 Professionally Designed Projects, when I received the box it had a disclaimer that the photos cannot be used for products for re-sale, I purchased this product to do a work at home video and spent all morning evaluating the different software's and now I find out it is totally worthless to me. I went to there website and it says allow 4-6 weeks for a refund! I am going to turn them into the FTC for false advertisement</review_text>
I wanted to use this product to tape sporting events, as part of a promotions unit I belong to. I had used Videowave 7 which was OK and produced a more than adequate product, but would on occassion crash to the extent I would have to reload the software. I thought I would give PE 3.0 ago, since Adobe products generally have a good reputation.Well, it goes to show that you can't just rely on reputation. The program lets me down horribly when capturing the video from the camera. THe camera records DVD video (VOB files) straight to DVD. When I capture these files into the PE program, all moving images within the video become pixelated with lost resolution to the point of being useless. I have tried various other ways of capturing but always the same result. There is nothing to be done from that point...for me this program falls on the first hurdle!! It is unbelievable to me that a professionally released image processing algorithm could corrupt video so badly, and frustrating that I actually paid money for it...a first year undergraduate could have provided a better effort.I have subsequently gone through the motions to produce a video, and to be honest he layout of the settings, ease of applicaiton of various functions is quite good and better than Videowave 7 IMHO. I was able to produce quite nice edited products with intro, text and audio overlays very quickly. Still this isn't much use when the video itself had already been digitally butchered.If you are videoing things that don't move you may well like this product. If you are videoing dynamic scenes, give it a miss. Big disappointment</review_text>
If you own a newer DVD camcorder that is manufactured by Panasonic, Hitachi, and others that records your movies in a .vro format you can not use this product.  You will have to buy an additional program that will cost about $40 to convert the .vro format to a avi, wav, or mpeg format.  If you own a camcorder that records in .vro do some research before you waste $80 on this program</review_text>
This is a very capable program that has too many nuances. For just a simple DVD burn it is far to complex. Definitely for the advanced user, I am sorry that I spent the money</review_text>
I really thought that office was better proir to the whole XP upgrade, but that I will leave to other discussions.This product is your standard Microsoft office products. I am fairly sure that most have experienced their products. There are no surprises and the added bells and whistles aren't worth the upgrade unless your are a VBA programmer.Now, having gone through all of this, I DO NOT rcommend that you purchase this product, but purchase the Student version. Same product - HUGELY different price.</review_text>
Yes, I love Microsoft Office. It's incredibly user friendly, it has wonderful features, most of which I don't even know how to use, and it's spelling and grammar checking features are the best of it's kind. I've been fortunate enough to have been a student up to now in my life and therefore did not have to buy Microsoft for my personal use, the school would always buy one for me. And of course there are always illegitimate means... but I'm not advocating piracy here.However, I would be the last person on earth to consider using Microsoft Office if I had to pay $350 for it. It's an insane price. consider the alternatives:Open Office: Does everything MS Office does, some things even better. I love how you don't need to buy or install anything extra to type mathematical formulas in Open Office. The best thing about this, however, is that it's FREE!Google Docs and Spreadsheets: This one is even better. Not only is it free like everything else from Google, you can COLLABORATE IN REAL TIME with  anybody else on the internet to write your word documents! Nothing beats that, it's just the most wonderful thing that Google has done</review_text>
Before you donate your hard-earned money yet again to Bill Gates' 'Feed the Multi-Billionaire Fund', do yourself and the world a favor and search for 'Star Office 8' on Amazon and read the reviews there.  I use MS Office Professional 2003 in the office, and just cannot believe how badly so many businesses and individuals are being ripped off by Microsoft for this BLOAT-ware.Star Office 8 is under $50 from Amazon and is fully compatible with Microsoft Office, and includes full functionalities of MS Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Visio, and Access.  Let me know what MS software I can buy under $100, let alone $50.  Hopefully, this is the beginning of the end of the Microsoft Monopoly, and the dawning of the Era of Sanity in computer software</review_text>
Font manager is not user friendly.  There is no logical indexing or grouping of fonts.  User is forced to hunt and peck</review_text>
Tough to upgrade if you have an earlier version on your machine.  Also, poor layout of controls make clicking on wrong button really easy.  They still have not gotten it right</review_text>
This year, instead of renewing my subscription to Norton system Works 2004, I thought would be a good idea to bring it up to date. I purchased Norton system Works 2007. The 2004 version worked fine for several years, while the 07 version could not be installed on my XP professional PC. The Norton "consumer firewall" worked perfectly. They make it very hard to get effective help (unless you want to pay them $9.95 per call). Several sessions on their complementary "live chat" system proved useless. In the end, efforts to resolve the problems simply wasted an otherwise perfectly good weekend. I returned the product to Norton for a refund. Their return procedures indicate that I will wait six weeks to get my money back. Just wonderful</review_text>
NSW 2007 (or 2006) premiere is useless when it comes to VISTA...and considering it comes pre-packaged with EVERY PC known to man (desktop or laptop) this is unforgiveable.Norton AV has an update but that is a far cry from the ~$100 price of SystemWorks that MUST be uninstalled according to MS VISTA.MAYBE with the 2008 versionTruth be known, System works has saved my aZZ a number of time since the 2003 version but now it is useless</review_text>
Systemworks continues to grow, taking ore hard drive space and messing with more stuff on your computer, and I'm likely to buy an alternative next time I update.  Note it stops working entirely if you install upgrades to your computer - a new hard drive, motherboard, or processor and Symantec requires you to spend a fortune on another copy.  I like the basic functions, but there's too much baggage to recommend this product anymore</review_text>
This is a terrible suite.Read the fine print very carefully:  It will not work on RAID configurations of any kind.  It will tell you that in the install (thanks a lot...kinda late?)I found its support on recovery disc of USB hardware unstable.This is a very unstable, even errant, set of programs.  It also tries to take over a lot of system elements</review_text>
I've a Norton user for many years.  I 'upgraded?' from NAV 2005.  This product was a pain to install.  I had to uninstall Zone Alarm, which isn't noted anywhere.  I've never had to do that before.  The installation process required rebooting multiple times.  In the past it had been an easy process.  Not anymore!  I will not buy Norton in the future</review_text>
While installing Norton Antivirus 2007 XP, a Norton message flashed that I must delete Webroot for MSN. I did it, and it resulted in crashing the session.Tried first the paying phone support and gave up after 2 hrs wait. Then ried the online chat. The wait went on for 9hrs, started #245 in the queue and by now in lline at #59 I realized this was not the Norton I'd used for so many years, I ordered Kapersky anti-virus.</review_text>
I've had Norton Anti-virus since 2002 on my 2002 Dell machine which meets teh program requirements.    Its gotten so slow as to be really annoying to use.It takes 30+ seconds to open a 2 page word document.  When Norton is updating the virus file, the machine slows to a crawl, instead of downloading quietly (and a bit slower) in the back groundIts slowed the machine to such a great extent that we don't use sleep mode anymore because when the machine is woken up it can take 10 minutes on a DSL to update.Its so slow that I am trying Kaspersky 6.0.  I don't know if thats better or worse, but since I don't go to "dangerous" sits or perfom lots of downloads its got to be better than teh current state.The way I look at it - with Norton Anti-Virus my machine functions 100% of the time as if its being slowed by a virus.  Anything is bette</review_text>
Used Norton antivirus the last 3 years. getting product in tax software promotions.  No problems until I installed 2007 6 days ago, when my system became really slow and then I was unable to access the internet.  Since their customer service phone number is not in the User Guide but buried in their website, I was thankful my husband's laptop was available. The first rep became exasperated when his scripted suggestions did not resolve my problem after 1.25 hours and tersely told me he was sending me an email file that would solve my problems.  I had identified it was the Worm Protection causing the problem so I turned that off, accessed the file and ran it.  My computer updated twice with no change - if the Worm Protection was on, I wasn't going to be able to access the internet.Worked up my patience and called that evening, only to hold for 48 minutes.  Finally got another native of India who spoke English worse than the first guy. At one point, we were waiting on a restart and I asked her a question about the computer being slower with the 2007 version and she responded, "OK, yes".  Long story short, I hung up an hour later with a link for an update to the 2007 product which I was assured would solve the problem and an email address for her manager. During these two calls, the software was uninstalled, reinstalled, and tested and I spent several hours using the online support.  I updated the product and it worked for a couple hours.  Then I was right back where I began, unable to access the internet unless I turned off the Worm Protection.I started the day with 360 days remaining on my subscription but once I updated, the protection center now says my subscription is expired. When I check my Norton account online, it shows I have almost a year remaining before expiration and all their tips to update the proection center have pathetically failed.Sent an email to the management address I was given, but of course, haven't heard anything.  I am uninstalling this product and will never use Norton again.</review_text>
I tried to like this product.  As previous reviews have said it has significant design limitations.  If you only need a 2D floorplan there are better tools for the same money or less.  The object libraries that come with the tool - furniture, fabrics, etc. - are really lame.  This limits it's value as an interior design tool.  I did not attempt to return it so I cannot comment on their return policy</review_text>
This lame program is completely limiting.  You can not even type in your own text.  You are supposed to use the few quotes they want you to use.  It is not at all user friendly either. I am so sorry I purchased this</review_text>
This is a good product, except it keeps shutting down when I have my outlook or when I have a web page open.   My main goal for an antivirus would be to run when I search the web or get in new emails!   What good is it if it shuts down when these are open!   It did find a trojan on my first scan.  This was one that Norton missed.  I will be getting NOD32 soon.  Sorry this product did not work for me! It was very easy to use</review_text>
Feeling more than a bit fleeced by McAfee's overpriced "subscription" renewal every year, I decided to give Kaspersky a try.  Installation went smoothly and everything seemed fine for 2 or 3 weeks.  Then one day my computer would not boot---just stalled on a blank screen right after the Windows XP splash screen.  When trying to boot up in safe mode, a list of the drivers currently loading scrolled down the screen.  It stopped at a file called kl1.sys and hung there forever.  A little research at work showed that this was a Kaspersky file.It may be just a coincidence that my system suddenly went kaput shortly after installing the new antivirus program, but I doubt it.  Attempts to use a recovery disk failed.  A trip to the local computer shop revealed that the data on my hard drives (which were in the inscrutable RAID 0 format) could not be recovered (unless I wanted to ship them to a recovery shop, and nothing on them was worth that much).  So they're going to reinstall windows, I'll have to do reinstall a shipload of software when I finally get my computer back, and, yes, I'll lose all the data that was on there.  (Gee, good thing I backed up all the kids' photos---well, most of them.  Thanks, Kaspersky!)Anyway, perhaps my attempts at recovering the OS caused the worst of this.   Whatever the case, I believe the boot failure was caused by either the Kaspersky file being corrupted or a virus.  Who knows.  Kaspersky is to blame in both scenarios.  I do know one thing: I am not going to tempt fate by loading this program on my computer again.And Kaspersky has yet to respond to my e-mail.  I got an automated "we received your e-mail" response, but nothing more, even though they state that they usually respond within a day or two.  That was over a week ago.  If in fact their software is in no way responsible for my computer flaking out on me, then I still do not apologize for the one-star rating, given their horrible customer service.If you decide I'm insane or that this was just a fluke, at least do yourself a favor and make a decent boot disk for yourself before installing this product.  That might mean the difference between losing data/spending $$$ and just being inconvenienced.  And don't expect much assistance from Kaspersky should things go wrong.</review_text>
This software does not provide even the basic red eye fix.  It turns them a light shade of grey, maybe. It is horrible.  This to me renders it useless.It is for the most basic of users.  There are no real manual functions to speak of, and my free software does a better red eye and also lets me do red eye manually when they cannot detect it.It has some neat functions but since it could not provide the most common need correctly,I would say do not buy.  Seller was great, product is poor.</review_text>
It isn't very user friendly.  I have other software that is much easier (Adobe Photo Shop).  This one will take some time and effort to get used to and work with.</review_text>
On install the 1st problem encountered was that it replaced  my pictures folder, with another containing only "sample picture", yep  it took out a folder on install with no request or user action to do so. Regardless of how it works as an image editor such behaviour precludes its further use.This program seems to be unsupported by MicroSoft, least their support site won't let you mail them on it,  so when it does hack up your file structure. SO program cost me $15 recovery effort on pictures, over $50. Just wonderful.</review_text>
Caution: Giving this software to your enemies will gaurantee that they will become mortal enemies, if they are not so already. 1 star is overrating this "product". I am only writing this review to satify some sort of altruistic urge. This software isn't worth a second more of your time. Just click a link now. Good bye! You are still there? OK, read on. I write computer code (C++, Java, C#) for a living and I could not get this software to work correctly. Starting up the "main console" application (read: service) kept turning off the Firewall (service). I could turn on the Firewall - but only if the main service was off. Brilliant! Well done guys on this festering sore of a pile of software. Glad I got my $50 back with the rebates, they should have paid me at least $100 for the wasted time. I spent an hour with their help, chat (which was slow and ineffective) and another 30 minutes tweaking the registry, all to no avail, but lots of frustration. I'm looking for another Firewall/Virus solution now</review_text>
The positive about PCcillin is that it seems to work okay.  It scans email and the firewall works okay.The negatives:- It supplies a lot of warning requests.  This would be good, but they aren't explained in an easily understood dialog so you end up answering yes to permission requests without always knowing if that's the best choice.- Even though it supplies 3 license keys the program is a little buggy and sometimes loses the keys.  If it loses the keys it disables the ability to update or click the customer service live chat button.  The process of restoring the key on the computer isn't too hard, but requires a bit of assistance from customer support.- Customer service is slow.  Sometimes I've been lucky and gotten into support chat right away, but sometimes I've had to wait 40 minutes or more.  The support personnel don't seemed to be trained technicians, but just phone support people reading through a manual with canned answers.  Getting to the right answer can take a long time and a lot of trial and error.I have used PCcillin for about 2 years now.  The latest version definitely isn't as good as it's previous versions.  I wouldn't recommend this product</review_text>
After using this product for Mac for over 10 years.  I'm done.  The price keeps going up, the "tax-help" within in the program keeps diminishing and the customer service is almost non-existent.The server meltdown this year was the last straw.  Their servers weren't too busy to let me pay to efile.  But, apparently they were "surprised" by the number of people that they allowed to pay for their service.  Baloney.  I'll use a pencil and paper next year before I give Intuit another $100.</review_text>
This software now constantly tries to get you to upgrade to a "better" package - the schedule C for small business.  I used to like TurboTax, but it has really gotten to be a pain.And finally, I spent two days trying to e-file, always getting a Server busy message from Intuit.  This is AFTER they got my credit card number and $34. to file the fed and state tax returns.  So I had to hand assemble the return and make the trip to the Post Office.  Intuit lobbied the Gov to let them keep this big $$$ plum, and then screwed it up.  They had this same problem last year, and it is WORSE this year. Time to call all our representatives and get E-File FREE from the IRS.  It saves the IRS money, far more than it costs.  Why is Intuit allowed to suck this much more from us after making big profits on the package</review_text>
I use turbotax every year and I would E-file also. It says I can E-file for $16.95 and it even says that's all it will cost on one of the last windows.  Then right before it is about to transmit it says $16.95 for federal plus $16.95 for state plus 2.5 percent what I owe to some "third party" company, thats $25 for each 1,000 you owe.  If I'm paying some third company to transmit my return than why am I paying turbotax to do it also?So ok I'll print it out and send it in. It wants to print out every worksheet and statement for a total of 53 pages.  It no longer gives you the option to just print the pages you need.I am now cornered into paying the extra $90 to efile or go through the torture of printing out 53 pages in which I need only 5 or 6.Dirty trick.It makes the total cost $130.  It would of been cheaper and more efficent going to a good accountant.Other than that the program has worked even easier than ever before</review_text>
After years of e-filing fees being included with the purchase price, it would have been more forthcoming for TurboTax to put a large sticker on the front of their box alerting buyers to the price that they will pay for e-filing each return.I lost the value of my entire state return - and then some - through e-filing fees: $44.95 (plus tax) for the program, $16.95 (plus tax) for each return e-filed (I filed two) and a little bonus fee to the company that handles the [credit card] transaction (that fee is never quoted in the program and I will have to wait for my credit card statement to find out what that is).  In addition, anyone who chooses to have the fees deducted from his/her refund has to pay an additional $30.The product does what it says.  But, for the cost, and less-than-honest way in which the change occured (it almost seemed deceitful - hence the single star rating), I would have preferred to have given my money to my friendly neighborhood accountant.People expect change, even if they don't like it.  But, suprises that cost customers money are never welcome and drive customers away.  Surely the marketing/advertising gurus can think of a way to alert the customer of a significant change such as this and even put a "positive" spin on it.  "Filing fees only $16.95 [per return] - less than the cost of a tax professional . . ."No more TurboTax for me</review_text>
Turbo Tax is less than impressive in handling stock and option transactions. It seems to view short sales as errors, reporting that the date acquired is later than the date sold. It does not appear to have a provision for tagging a short sale. It does not appear to have a provision for properly dealing with dividends on stock held for more than 12 months, but covered by disqualifying call options. Its screens for schedule D and D1 are awkward - it would be much better to have one large table screen for all transactions, with tags to set short term and long term tax application, from which D and D1 could be formatted for filing.</review_text>
I have used Turbo Tax for the past 3 years so this year like a drone I purchased it at Amazon. Great price by the way. Well I receive the product and try to load it and find out as of July '06 it isn't compatible with windows '98. Now I have to send it to Turbo Tax for a refund. Its great that they are doing that but they should have put something on the front of the box. After a 45 minute call to Turbo Tax they finally agreed to credit me the difference of $20 for the purchase of their online software. The online software was the same exact program I purchased from Amazon but they charge $20 more...go figure. It sounds fishy and deceitful to me. I will never buy their software again!</review_text>
I have been using TurboTax since I started working full-time after graduating form college. This year TurboTax really drops the ball:1) I didn't have any ESPP transactions for a few years. Tax year 2006 I had some, and that was when I realized that nowadays they force you to use TurboTax premier for ESPP calculations. The last time I had ESPP in 2000 or so, the deluxe version at that time could assist you to calcuate ESPP transactions with wizards. Now you can't with deluxe version.2) For first-time married-filed-joinly couples, they have to do a lot of work trying to merge their filed-single returns from 2005. The deluxe version simply does not handle this at all. Even if it helps you transfer the 2005 returns, they don't merge the data properly. For instance, if both couple have short/long-term capital loss carryovers from 2005, the deluxe version does not do that for you. Same for state/local taxes paid/refunded. Worse, if even if you try to correct it, sometimes you can't. There is obvious bugs, and I have to choose override from the menu to directly update the forms.3) Nitpick: when you choose to print out the every forms, by default they print out all those only for federal taxes. I have to go to the State tab and choose my state, go back to the print menu, to print state tax forms.I am not sure it that may be because this year is the first year I use the Mac version of TurboTax (I use PC versions before). But I really do not have a good tax preparation experience this year. Next year I may consider to switch</review_text>
The product performs inconsistently. It failed miserably when it tried OCR on a page printed in comic sans, for instance, mistaking a's for g's, and @'s for a's, etc.  In short it was worthless for scanning in something as simple as a list of names and email addresses.It's "OK" when doing some fonts. And generally manages to figure out where the images are.  The interface is supposed to be simple, but is counter-intuitive, and confusing to learn.Scanners are "iffy" -- may work, may not, so make sure you test in the 30 day trial period.Support?  Forget unless you want to pay.  Not even a single support call is included in the package.I will NOT buy or upgrade with this company again unless they are willing to provide at least a minimum of a couple of support calls or emails.I've had almost all the versions before this, and to be honest like this one less than what was before.If you want to try it, buy from a source that will honor the 30-day money-back trial period. You may need it</review_text>
I bought OmniPage 15 yesterday morning as a download, and have been trying to activate it ever since. After several calls to customer service, forty minutes on hold to speak with a tech rep (who emailed me two links that don't open), I'm no closer to being able to use this program. It seemed to work okay in the few intro uses allowed before you had to activate to continue, but even then it kept wanting to reload with every page I scanned in.The product might be a good one--I'm not a fair judge of that--if only you can get it to work. As others have pointed out, tech support is expensive. If my experience is any measure, it's also worthless.Customer service is unresponsive, unpleasant, and unprofessional. In one call to Customer Service, I was asked if I typed the letters in the serial number as capitals and the O's as zeroes. When assured that I had, several times, she replied, "Then I can't help you--call the tech department," and abruptly hung up. To add irritation to insult, in the forty minutes I was on hold with the tech department, I listened to repeated assurances that a "reepersentative" would be with me shortly.Not recommended.</review_text>
Both versions of Scansoft cause my installer to have problems. Mainly it tries to re-install Softscan every time I start up Softscan. Also It has started to try and reinstall Softscan if I try to right click on a JPG. There is very little to no chance of getting any help from Scansoft (Nuance)to debug this problem. Save your money and buy some thing else</review_text>
Omnipage is a buggy piece of software which is prone to throwing errors and mysterious crashes (often occuring at the end of a lengthy process).  Nuance provides no support and when you attempt to contact them they want $9.95 for an email question or $19.95 for a phone question.  You might expect this from an inexpensive piece of software but for the cost of Omnipage you would expect some support.  I recommend finding something more reliable from a company that provides some measure of support</review_text>
The real headache began when I attempted to "activate" the program.  I spent hours trying to activate it, to no avail.  I got messages saying that the serial number was invalid and a host of other problems.  Now, I would just like to get my money back.  I have used ScanSoft's stuff in the past and have been pleased with it, but, for whatever reason, OmniPage 15 has become, for me, an expensive nightmare.  After having spent many hours trying to activate it, I still have not succeeded.  Their support leaves a lot to be desired.  For one thing, they keep "bankers hours" so don't expect to get any help on the weekend or after hours</review_text>
I've been using a Mac for the last 10+ years and I had assumed that Windows had gotten better since Win 94.  Boy was I wrong.  It amazes me that the entire world runs on this awful excuse for an OS.</review_text>
I brought Microsoft Windows XP Home Ed.SP2, to use on my Mac BookPro as a guest O/S. The software works fine on my Mac BookPro, the only downside was as soon as it was installed I had to update the software with 98 Security updates. For the software to be new right out of the box, it took up a lot of space on my harddrive with the Security updates, and the updates on my Mac BookPro have only been 6, since the day I brought my computer, compare the difference in updates to see which software has a lot of problems.</review_text>
I had to work with a pc and windows because of my profession......architect..  My firms have always used architectural desktop.  Unfortunately, it only is compatible with a pc.  NOW  !!  finally I purchased an exquisite iMac.. and when need be, I can run architectural desktop on it in windows to get a few things done..    Apple vs PC ?No comparison.... and my iMac is so sexy it makes me smile.. so kill me.</review_text>
Other than the substandard security; the endless hours you will spend trying to clean out spyware, protecting against viruses, etc.; and the fact that Microsoft has built in it's own spyware to notify them when you are connected to the internet, it's pretty good. It is a good evolution of their graphical interface and quite intuitive.If you are concerned about your ability or willingness to protect yourself against malicious attack from internet scumbags, buy a Mac. As you face the upgrade to MS Vista, you're going to need to upgrade your CPU, so you are essentially at a crossroads.Good luck</review_text>
RIP-OFF  RIP-OFF  RIP-OFF  RIP-OFF  RIP-OFF  RIP-OFFMicrosoft Windows IS A JOKE WE ARE ALL OUT TO STEEL THEM BLAND WE PAY $200 FOR WHAT? TO BE BELITTLE WHEN WE HAVE TO REINSTALL IT I HAVE 5 COMP.AND I HAVE 5 BOXES OF Microsoft Windows XP Home Edition FULL VERSION with SP2 ONE FOR EACH PC OVER $1000)</review_text>
My last Roxio product was "Easy CD Creator 5." When I switched to a Mac I naturally expected "Toast" to be the Mac version of this product. I am extremely disappointed to find that the crippled video editing features in my (many years old) version of CD Creator is miles ahead of what they include with the most current and up to date version of "Toast" which I unfortunately own. It allowed me to edit video clips, create several levels of customizable menus, customize the size of compression, and burn to a DVD which played on my standard DVD player. Toast can create one uncustomizable  menu level, has NO editing, and locks up every time you drag a file into it. They (in the product description) say it reads mpegs but it's more like it freezes every time it sees an mpeg. It doesn't even read every mpeg reliably. The only thing I can find that Roxio adds to Toast that isn't in my old version of CD Creator is more enhanced MP3 and music features (which isn't what I bought it for). I may have been better off using "Parallels" in combination with CD Creator. I am sorry but compared to Roxio's CD Creator (which is basically the same price), Toast seems to have been designed by total IDIOTS. And I always thought that Mac software was better for working with multimedia</review_text>
While I am sure the product does what it offers, this is the second version of Elemeents that I have not been able to load on my computer.  That's where the fun begins - Adobe's support is dreadful.  Their website is unusuable - other than constantly trying to sell you additional products and services - and they have no human support on weekends</review_text>
I have usedPhotoshop 7, and likedit.I beleive,Adobe has made the PhotoshopElements 5 unnecessarily cumbersome in termsof downloading,saving,etc</review_text>
I bought Adobe Elements 5.0 because I thought it had more features than Microsoft Digital Image Suite, and it probably does. Getting the Adobe software to work is the trick. I even bought two books to help me learn how to use Adobe and I still can't get it to work right. I should have stuck with Microsoft, it is much easier to use.</review_text>
It's just too complex compared to Print Shop 21 and as far as I can tell it has very few added features.Ray Gawronsk</review_text>
TurboTax has what looks like it would be a geat feature -- the ability to import data from your financial institutions so that you don't have to enter all of your stock sales by hand.Some of the cost basis (how much I bought the shares for) was empty, so I had to go in and enter them manually.  No big deal, just took a few minutes.However, when I went to e-file, the program had flagged these changes as "overrides" to computed values, and refused to let me e-file the return.  Equally bad is that if I just leave the fields empty -- as they came from Charles Schwab, then it looks like I got the stocks for free, and have a huge tax bill (that is incorrect).So, after many hours of trying to see if I could change the field so that it would not be flagged as an "override", I determined from other upset users of TurboTax in the forums on intuit.com that I was out of luck.  I'd have to print it out and mail it in.As a special reward, TurboTax doesn't even tell you what attachments you need to include on the return that you are now forced to mail in.  The help screen says that what it prints out will tell you what to include in the return.  That's wrong.So, the main reason I got TurboTax was to e-file.  Now, I get to print it out, find out all of the crap that I have to attach to the return, mail it in, then wait for weeks to months to get my return.Thanks, Intuit!!!!The saddest part is that H&R Block had sent me a free copy of TaxCut before I bought TurboTax.  I should have used that before I spent $30 on a piece of crap like TurboTax.  Won't do that again</review_text>
We purchased this to make sure we didn't miss anything re: stock options.  The program kept including a ghost set of options of a different type, though they were not entered twice.  It took me quite sometime to get them deleted.  It also said we had to pay estimated tax next year-which isn't true since we overpaid (as we have always done).  Too many errors for a tax program</review_text>
I bought the Mac version of TurboTax Premier, and I installed it on my Mac with OS 10.3.9. After doing my entire return, I clicked to e-file and received a message saying, "Could not load attribute," This error box gave me the options to continue (which just took me back to the e-file page, which led me to the same error message) or connect to Intuit online support. The Intuit support site said, "This error occurs when attempting to file electronically.  If you are connecting through a router, try bypassing the router and filing again.  If the error persists, it may be necessary to file by paper.  We are currently working to resolve this error. . . . To be notified as soon as we have an answer, click here to sign up."I don't have the technical know-how to "bypass the router." I also figured that if Intuit hadn't solved the problem by March 26 (the day I was ready to submit my return), they probably weren't going to, even if I were willing to hold onto my return until I'd received word they'd solved the problem. So I ended up mailing in my return. If I'd known up front that I wouldn't be able to e-file, I probably wouldn't bought the program.</review_text>
Isn't this a Mac product? I thought Mac products were supposed to be (A) stable, and (B) easy to use.  This product is stable, (once I upped my RAM to 2GB) but at 512MB it brought the system to a crawl.But as far as ease of use--I'm not a dumb guy (although my kids may argue the point) but this product is really a victum of itself. It is too hard for the "Express" audience and is really intended (in my opinion) ONLY for profression Final Cut Pro users.  In other words, if you use Final Cut Pro at work, and want something on your home-Mac, the Express version is a great value. You already know it and people have paid you to get used to it.But if you're a iMovie user, Pinnacle Systems Studio user, Adobe Premiere Elements 2.0 user, this product seems like I'm trying to fly the Space Shuttle.How do you output WMV with this product? You can do it in any of the PC-based products, oh, and they also output Quicktime so why does Apple have a hangup about WMV?I recently asked in an Apple forum "How do you do Picture in picutre?"  I got a great response from an experienced user.  "It only took a couple of minutes, just do these 6 steps..."   Great, in Premiere Elements or Pinnacle, I click on the PIP icon and its done.  I didn't have to do 6 obscure steps.The product is also one of those old fashion "Million Windows all over the place" applications. You try to minimize the thing by pressing one of the tiny little minimize buttons (like all Mac apps have) and it closes only that window of the app, like the preview window, not the timeline, not the browser.Bottom line... if you already use, know and love Final Cut Pro, this is a low-cost way to get a similar product on your own PC (although the Academic version of the Pro version is pretty affordable too).I don't see the point of this product unless its just to provide a low-cost entry into Final Cut Pro for people who use Pro for a living</review_text>
This is among the most disappointing Symantec products!!!  When one tries to log in to the infovault, the login box is often empty! There is no way to submit the information.  It is also impossible to get a straight answer from Customer Service. BRING BACK THE OLD PRODUCT, PLEASE!!!!  Have been a Norton customer for years....this one is just not great!!</review_text>
Norton old password manager worked much better.  It is a pain to use especially if you use the same password for serveral different websites.  After using it for a couple of weeks, most of the time not working properly, the final straw was that it suddenly stopped recognizing my Infovault password.  Several emails to Norton and nothing but worthless repsonses.  Hours wasted trying to get help from their website!  Even when I just wanted to know if I unstalled the product would password manager still work, no response.</review_text>
I purchased this product with the hope that it will help me protect my computer without too much overhead and interference. The password manager is quite useless. In more than half the times it did not enter passwords. In cases where it entered passwords, it took about 5 seconds to do so. It also asked me if I want to store passwords repeatedly for the same site.It interfered with the operation. It did not let me go to sites like paypal and charles schwab. When I contacted Symantec support, their response is to disable the Phishing protection when I want to go to these sites.My quicken started having problems. I had to restore old backups and it took me 2 days to finally figure out that it is Confidential that is causing the problems. I would have given this s/w 0 stars if it is possible. Now, I uninstalled the software from my computer and have no intention of re-installing it.I can't believe that a company like Symantec releases software that is so buggy and unusable</review_text>
This is a terrible product. I could not even load the program onto my machine. I had the same 2006 version and had no trouble loading that one.I sent the product back and requested a refund to my credit card. I cannot recommend this product and if you take a chance and order it I hope that you have better luck then I did</review_text>
It's time to switch to any product BUT a Symantec one: what was once the best security software company for PC users is now the worst.It was time to upgrade my Systemworks Premier to the 2007 version, so I checked out the '07 features online. But where was Password Manager? Hell, I have 187 passwords and logins I DEPEND UPON Password Manager to fill in -- at least 30 of them a day. After an hour on the phone with allegedly 'English-speaking' Symantec CSR's in Bombay, the story I got was that customer surveys prompted them to 'drop' Password Manager. Not being stupid, I said, 'let me guess, Symantec's going to roll out a stand-alone Password Manager to extort another $40 from me'. 'Oh, no, sir, no, no...'And here it is: a $[...] rip-off, nothing but Password Manager -- not so cleverly disguised as 'the Vault' -- along with other features IE7 provides for free, and marketed as a 'new' online security program.Symantec seems to put more effort into playing marketing games with their customers than they do into making the programs they sell WORK correctly. Norton Anti-Virus is a MESS; it's once-a-week Wednesday night updates are now a joke: launch your attack, release your new virus on a Thursday morning and you'll have millions of NAV subscribers at your mercy for at least a week. Three times in the past few months, NAV has failed to stop an attack -- after several years of never failing. Systemworks too seems to be causing more problems than it solves (I'm continually rolling back to undo 'fixes' One Button Checkup or WinDoctor creates, after the 'fix' crashes my system).Goodbye, Norton, hello McAfee -- or ANYBODY else. This rip-off -- deleting Password Manager from Systemworks only to regurgitate it as this bug-filled mess called Norton Confidential -- is the last straw</review_text>
This product caused my IE 7 browser to hang just about every time I used it.  It causes internet pages to load very slow.  This product scans every internet page before it will load the page.  Many of the features that this product boasts come standard and FREE with the new IE 7 (such as phishing protection).  This product is NOT compatible if you use Norton System Works</review_text>
I recently purchased this software and had to uninstall it.  In my case, I was unable to get into my Quicken account, which is password protected.  One of the features of Confidential is an "Information Vault" which stores all passwords.  I was prompted to enter the Quicken one as well, but chose not to as I felt this would defeat the purpose of having a password set up in the first place.  After that, when I would enter the Quicken password, my machine would just hang up.  The only way I could get in was by opening it in safe mode.I believe that this product sounds appealing on the surface, but when you get down to it, it promises more than it can deliver.  I also think that when it comes to internet security, the best solution is to take reasonable precaution.  If you respond to an e-mail requesting your account numbers and passwords, a software package is not going to save you.I purchased this product based on my previous experience with Norton products and have been quite satisfied with their performance.  Thus, I was extremely disappointed with this product</review_text>
As others have noted, this product prevents AOL from loading on my machine - it just stalls (AOL is using a connection via Cable). It also "automatically" registers itself with Symantec and starts the counting of the 1 year subscription unless you cut of internet access. I removed it from that machine (a Toshiba Laptop) and installed it on my backup Dell (an older Pentium 3 866mhz). Both were running XP with the latest updates.  It slowed Internet Explorer to a crawl and locked it up when I attempted to first write this review.  It also slowed overall performance, when not in the browser, though this seems illogical.  I uninstalled it (it was the only Norton product on the machine) and it left Live Update installed until I manually started the removal of it. Fortunately everything is back to normal after removing all.  This is truly dangerous software for those with at least my type of equipment:  Stay away unless you have very poor browsing security and a machine that does not choke on it</review_text>
I purchased this updated version 1/5/07.  It does not print correctly, and technical support assured me that the developer is "working on the problem" and a "fix" is soon to come.  This is March 1, and no update is available yet.  This program is UN-USABLE and I am very unhappy and would not recommend "as is" to anyone.  I have the 2005 edition and was very pleased with it.  This is a large embarrassment to the Hallmark company</review_text>
I bought this software to print my Christmas cards and much to my dismay, it did not print properly on my HP inkjet printer. I tried various settings with the same bad results and finally had to contact tech support via email.  Here is the reply:"Thank you for contacting Hallmark Technical Support.We apologize for any difficulties that you may have had with our software.This is a newly found issue with the program.  The developers are currently working on an update that will correct this.  They said that the update should be out around Christmas.  Please routinely check for new updates by going to the Help menu and selecting the Check for Updates option.  When an update is available, you will be informed and it should automatically install the update."This is a "printing" software so when it does not print properly, it indicates that the software was not tested properly or simply the publisher expect the users to be beta-testers!  If some other features that did not work, it may be excused, but this bug is unexcusable!I am sure the software developers will have the software bugs fixed, but at the meantime don't be a beta-tester,  buy someting else. Humbug!</review_text>
I am a novice at web page creating and I am OVERLY glad I tried the free web trial (of course I lied about my address and my first born etc. that you MUST give to just get the so called "FREE" trial) this is the WORST web page editor for not so with it people.  It does not look anything even close to what frontpage had and again I am highly disappointed with it.  Where are the themes, web counters and the other simple to understand components ? I did try Namo Web Editor and for people like me, it is very good.  This may be wonderful for those of you who are very web page saavy but again if you are a novice don't get this or uprgrade to it, you will be HIGHLY disappointed</review_text>
I hate to be rude but I have been building with FrontPage 2002 for years. It has so many templates and features but I thought it was time for an upgrade. I am thankful  that the original FrontPage is still running on my laptop or I don't think my latest sites would be up yet. Sorry, I don't mean to be mean. It may be like other programs that you can get training or have to take a class to do the things that FrontPages just does automatically. I'm sure it is fine as a stand alone creator software but to call it an upgrade, I don't know.</review_text>
i pruchased the 3 computer product.  I installed and have been in email tag with norton support ever since. My computer will not shutdown after installation. They have no idea why.  I have been through the same protocols over and over again for over three weeks.  I was finally told that installing version 7.02 would fix it for sure.  I did and it did not.I was also told that unlike other products such as webroot, when you buy a three ciomputer pack, then expiration date is tied to installation on the first computer. If the three computers do not have the same installation date-like mine -i had 2006 installed on three computers which were put on at different times-you can lose the value of the subscription.  When I called Norton customer service -i get the reply that what can you expect we gave you a bargain-about 70 on a three computer deal.  The service was rude and not helpful.  I asked why it did not say anthing on the box or in the manual and was told that was my proble,</review_text>
WARNING!! This was the worst experience I ever have upgrading software from the same co. I have Norton Ghost, Partition Magic, and 06 Internet Security on my laptop. After instructed to remove 06 IS, I installed the 07 Antivirus. Afterward I kept getting a pop-up Runtime Error msg and the product will not work. I went to the support site and follow the instructions to use their Autofix tool to completely remove all of 06 IS and LiveUpdate. I did so and reinstalled the Antivirus. STILL GOT THE SAME @#$%^ ERROR! I went back to the support site and was told to remove the old IS and upgrade to a new LiveUpdate first. I did so and reinstalled Antivirus. STILL GOT THE SAME @#$%^ ERROR! I called support and waited 30 mins. Finally was told I needed to pay $29 fee for live help. I returned the product and vow to never buy from Symantec again. I purchased CA Internet Security and installed without any problem.</review_text>
There is no excuse for Norton not advising of the incompatibility of this antivirus software with popular firewalls such as ZoneAlarm before installing the software, especially since previous versions have been compatible.  Once opened, returning the product can be a problem, perhaps that it what Norton is counting on</review_text>
I've been a loyal Norton anti-virus & utilities software customer since the stone age, but like several other reviewers, I'm deeply disappointed that Norton Internet Security 2007 is incompatible with ZoneAlarm Pro, Sunbelt CounterSpy, and Microsoft AntiSpyware, and even more deeply disappointed that I had to crack the shrinkwap to find that out. Once upon a time, Norton  was the epitome of well-designed, thoughtful, customer-centric software, but they've degenerated into outsourced hacks trading on a well-established name. I'll be returning Symantec's software if I can, and buying ZoneAlarm's A/V package instead</review_text>
When I tried to upgrade from 2004 to 2005 I ran into a problem because I didn't have Flash 7.0 installed. Actually I had a later version of Flash (9.04) but of course Quickbooks couldn't handle that. Here's the fix: go to the Adobe site and download the uninstall program from them. Uninstall your flash player and then Quickbooks will then proceed. Good luck. Jo</review_text>
I bought this software at the recommendation of my accountant.  Well, after trying to use it for two years now, I'm ready to burn it. It's a great software for people who do their business by the projects, but it's not good for retail sales.  Everything has been a hassel, especially trying to set up the daily sales so I can record detailed inventory of my daily sales.  Yes, I noticed they did come out w/a new version for specifically for retail sales.  After I already invested in $300 in software and $100 in books just trying to learn this system.  What a waste!</review_text>
WHAT A BUNCH OF MONEY GRABBING IDIOTS!  IF YOU ARE CONSIDERING BUYING QUICKBOOKS, DON'T!!!!!!!  I HAVE NEVER HAD SUCH A HORRIBLE EXPERIENCE WITH A PRODUCT.  THEY TAKE FEATURES AWAY, ESPECIALLY WITH PAYROLL, IF YOU DO NOT BUY THEIR PRODUCTS.  THEN WHEN YOU CALL TO ASK WHAT IS GOING ON, THEY TELL YOU THAT YOU HAVE NOT PURCHASED THEIR SUPPORT PROGRAM AND THAT THEY CANNOT HELP YOU!!I HATE QUICK BOOKS.  THEIR IS NOTHING QUICK ABOUT IT AND THE SO CALLED SUPPORT STAFF ARE A BUNCH OF LIARS!!</review_text>
I have never ever used an application that was totally designed to get more and more money.  Every other page is a sales page and after paying $300 plus for the application and another $200 for the payroll, now I have to pay if I want their help.  It is a good tool but the company mission is to make more money, no longer has anything to do with their customers.And this customer will not be one next year</review_text>
Purchased this software because I got a deal with a special price break.  I have a very small business, so a purchase of several hundred dollars needs to pay back quickly.The set up took a lot longer than I had anticipated.The customer service was no help - couldn't answer my questions.  I ended up spending 6 hours to get everything right - another day wasted.I've got myself stuck with this now and will use for a few months since I've spent the money, but I'm going to look for alternatives in the meantime.  If this is "Quick Books,"  I need to find "Lightning Fast" Books somewhere</review_text>
I purchased quickbooks 2005; 4th upgrade in 10 years.Unlike earlier versions, this one is confusing and painful to use.Simple things like making deposits has to do through contraptions.One of the reasons I upraded was to use Online banking; it's a complete disaster. It doesn't download the complete trasaction details, reconcilliations are very difficult.You will be doing twice the work to use it.Once my transfer to the bank was aborted by a message saying you are low on memory and though Quickbooks sent the transaction to the bank, it didn't mark it internally, so on the next login, it sent the payment again!!! It has cost me $1509 of double payment that I am still trying to get back!How you pay a bill is totally messed up, There is no way for you to mark that a bill was paid online unless it was done through quickbooks online connection. (Bank's billpay can't be used!!)It's very poor in organization, you can't have 2 accounts #'s with  a vendor (still in 2005!!!).It has introduced obscure concepts as items and classes, which have no real definition and no "default" use and stop every transaction.One of the biggest thing Quickbooks has done to hurt their customers is the payroll. Technically you can do it yourself, but they hide that information and scare you in every step that you should (must) buy the $299/year payroll service (old tax-tables).In all the documenation, not once do they mention that you can do the payroll directly and this is how.Compared to the earlier products, this is a huge cost. By that reckoning I would have paid ~$2000 for the previous version of quickbooks!!It's definitely cheaper to buy a basic version of the software and use an accountant to do the other work and you will be betteroff. Don't waste money on Quicken services or premium products, they will bleed you to death on your way to a mental asylum</review_text>
I'm still waiting.  Amazon says this item usually ships within 24 hours.  I ordered on Oct. 27; its now Nov. 8 and it still hasn't shipped.  Where is it</review_text>
NO TECHNICAL SUPPORT THAT'S WORTH ANYTHING!  PROGRAM DOES NOT WORK PROPERLY! VERY USER UNFRIENDLY! OTHERWISE I WISH I WOULD NOT HAVE PURCHASED IT! NEED SOMETHING THE AVERAGE COMPUTER NUT CAN USE EFFECTIVELY</review_text>
What a terrible upgrade.  I'm going to uninstall it and go back to 6.  Even though I specifically told it to leave my file associations alone, it changed every one of them.  It's a nightmare.  I'm still trying to get Nero disassociated with certain file types, to no avail.  The backup program is awful, slow and much more difficult to use than the one built into 6.  Overall, Ultra 6 is a much better product.  I'm going to uninstall 7 and send it back to Nero with instructions on where they can associate it</review_text>
The computer that I bought June 2006 came with Nero 6 OEM version.  It has worked very well.  I finally got around to clicking on the upgrade icon and ordered what I thought would be a serial number to unlock some features.  It turns out that is not available, and I have bought the Nero 7 Ultra version, which required a 195 MB download. Having dialup, I was not pleased.  I asked for my money back.  No response.  I faxed BBB complaint with copies to Nero offices in California and Germany. The office in Germany responded with email that they do not do refunds. Los Angeles BBB has been unresponsive.I finally got the download from a computer with broadband. I uninstalled Nero 6 and set restore point.  I installed Nero 7.  It worked!  But it was agonizingly slow.  I don't mean the CD or DVD writing per se was slow. When I eventually got it going that gave me the full speed of my hardware. However navigating from each click to response felt like it was in a 486 and not an Athlon 64.  I think other programs were also rendered more sluggish in opening files.I uninstalled Nero 7, and just to be safe I then used restore point from before I installed it. I reinstalled Nero 6. What a relief!  There may be some fancy features Nero 6 OEM lacks, but it's worth it to have the computer working at reasonable speed. If I want to rip a music track to a .wav file (a feature lacking in the OEM version), it's easier to reboot to linux and run K3b than put up with sluggish Nero 7 Ultra to do it.A product and company gone bad; Nero 7 is definitely not recommended</review_text>
I'm in the midst of auditioning LCD panels and the local ISF certified guy wants $350 per panel to calibrate them. I like TV and everything, but there's just no way that I am going to spend $350 on TV that I might possibly keep.Still, the store settings on any two panels have two problems. First, they are amped up beyond compare as the TV vendors compete to be "who's the brightest" on the lit showroom floor. Sitting in my living room, they are far far too bright to watch. Second, they display colors totally differently. It's just hard to compare to 2 sets that are calibrated so differently.Now the TVs that we are looking at cost a pretty penny, and it seemed that a couple of hundred dollars to inform the decision was a good idea, just like the hundred dollars for an HDMI splitter seemed like a good idea. The splitter was a good idea, the Spyder TV Colormeter not so much.I calibrated 2 panels with this product. Two things are true about the calibrations. First, they do not look at all the same. The Sony panel has red shifted flesh tones while the Sharp looks cold and sterile. Second, they look way way worse than before the calibration. After 20 minutes of watching Casino Royale, it was time to revert back to a toned down version of the factory defaults for each.At first I thought that I had not followed the instructions right. Maybe it was not dark enough. Maybe the sensor was not positioned right. Having done the process several times, I can state categorically that while the colorvision Spyder TV may not deliver good results, it is consistent in its delivery of bad results.I simply cannot recommend this product</review_text>
I have the same problem that Xrayman does.I was wondering if I had a faulty unit since it was an "opened" item and slightly discounted in the store where I bought it. I guess I'm not the only one who has this problem. My TV is a Plasma, for whatever that's worth. And I too found that the SpyderTV did not set things correctly. Color was much too saturated, and contrast and brightness were not correct. The only thing it did do was correctly choose the color temperature, which I do think is better than what I had it set to, so I'm now using SpyderTV's recommended color temp. But I reset everything else back to the settings I had already achieved by eye. I am going to try it out on an old CRT television and see if it works any better on that.My plasma isn't new, and I would recommend that people do not use this product on a new plasma.  It requires you to put a bright white square up on your screen for far too long.  I had to run through 15 color temperature settings, letting SpyderTV take a reading on each one, while leaving the bright square up.  Took at least 7 minutes.  That will temporarily burn the square into a new plasma screen.  ...and might throw off the remaining measurements that have to be taken</review_text>
When I first received the product and installed it I had a few configuration issues (not unusual) but now, after 8 months of service, they are telling me I need to purchase an upgrade ($69.99) or I will have no virus protection.  I contacted Customer Service (what a misnomer) as no one was available to actually speak to me and the automated system was like one of those automated phone loops you enter when trying to contact any company.  I finally gave up and an now shopping for a newer and more reliable antivirus and protection system.  I did not get a full year of service, got jerked around and have lost all faith in this software package.  I wish any other users good luck</review_text>
Great software! Until You have a question or a problem that is. Then You get the run around BIG TIME! ZoneAlarm says they didn't sell it to me so they can't help me. They send me to Broderbund for help. Broderbund then sends me to Encore for help and they won't help me either. ZoneAlarm states if I didn't buy it right from ZoneAlarm then they don't give any support.It comes in a ZoneAlarm box, says ZoneAlarm on the CD but apparently it isn't ZoneAlarm??? (According to ZoneAlarm that is)!!Buy it elsewhere, or end up helpless!!!</review_text>
I have used the Zonlabs Firewall for several years. It works fine. I can not say the same for the Security Suite. The AntiSpam function does not update definitions and ZoneLabs Tech Support know they have a problem. They are working on it but no date for a fix.Do not buy this software until all the bugs are fixed.</review_text>
I do not have any recolection of purchasing this product, nor can I find it on my computer or in any of my hard non computer files. I have always ordered a hard disk back up of all purchases from Zone Alarm. There is no hard disk no Computer file. I am about to raise you Know what about this charge on my credit card. I will challenge it if I do not receive for what I am being charged. I will also ask My credit card Co. for a new number to prevent future charges from these folks. In the future I will use a third party encryted method for purchases on the internet.  rehadik@netscape</review_text>
I was reading the high reviews of Zonealarm so I went to their web site to get more information, and only about 2 pages of their entire web site would even show up. Makes me wonder how hard it will be to get tech support from them. Going back to Panda..</review_text>
It's been 10 days since I registered with Zone Alarm and I still haven't received the license key. I wrote many emails and called customer service and I got no help or solution. Think twice before purchasing this product</review_text>
I really like the Rosetta Stone product (although it is over priced).WARNING: Rosetta Stone (Fairfield Language Technologies) will NOT replace a CD if it is lost, stolen or damaged unless you bought the product DIRECTLY from them (and then they charge you $30 for a replacement CD).  I had the misfortune of purchasing from a local bookstore and someone had stolen the disk from inside the package.  In this case I can get my money back from the store I bought it from but since you can't backup the disks you had better be VERY careful to not lose one</review_text>
Many repetitions are necessary in order to acquire a second language or a third, but the monotony of this program does not keep your interest for long, is so boring and offers not variety at all. This program will take away the excitement for learning another language even for the most motivated individuals, and will not help to acquire fluency because it does not equip you with the tools to construct language on your own.It does not contain essential grammar instruction, it is an error to suppose that the same grammatical rules of your language can be applied to other languages (French is not a translation of English, or Spanish, or any other language). Grammar becomes essential especially when you are trying to construct correct structures on your own; this program claims to help you learn "naturally" but leaves huge gaps by neglecting grammar, culture, conversational structures, and clear understanding, not natural!For adults translation is necessary when trying to internalize the concepts, adults already have an understanding of language and are equipped to learn differently than children, sometimes even faster. I do not believe that "learning a second language like a child" is an accurate statement to describe this program, children are immersed in the culture, everything around them is the "real deal", not repetitious pictures and recordings. Children receive verbal and non-verbal input constantly, and adults have greater cognition than children do.Looking at a picture while you listen a recoding might give you a vague idea of what it means, but there is not accuracy. It is very unlikely that you will internalize a concept that you do not fully understand. Rosetta Stone approach might be very effective when memorizing vocabulary and simple sentences, but I could achieve the same by purchasing flash cards for a fraction of the cost of this overrated, and overpriced program.</review_text>
I've used the past few versions of Acrobat and this one is a disappointment. Navigation is a pain. Instead of the familiar window and arrows at the bottom of a page Adobe's engineers have moved navigation to the top of the page and have only a single arrow.The whole look and feel is most unMac-like, more like a windows application. I suppose if I wanted to take the time and energy to study the user manual I would find the application friendlier but I don't expect to have to re-learn to use an application when I upgrade. If you're thinking of upgrading, my advice is don't</review_text>
I purchased the standard edition of X3 primarily for 3 reasons: 1) It claims to have the ability to convert pdf files into WP format, 2) It claims to be able to organize your e-mail files through the use of WP Mail well beyond the capabilities of Outlook Express, and 3) It claims enhanced use of WP for word processing.What I found was a product that met only one out of three of its claims.  In baseball, batting .333 will put you into the Hall of Fame.  In business, fulfilling one of three claims will put you into bankruptcy!While the pdf converter is a rather good tool, WP3 Mail is unstable (and this is from their tech support department).  It destabilizes your use of e-mail to the point of making it virtually unusable in terms of reliability.  I imported older e-mail from outlook express when I installed the WP X3 software, only to later find out that the system crashed regularly.  I could not get at my older imported e-mail, and could not find a practical way to reverse the importing back into outlook express.  What really irked me was that their tech support was worthless in rectifying the situation.  They merely responded by saying they were aware of the problem and "may" release a patch to help sometime in the future.  Ahhhhh!As to the alleged improved "word processing power", I have experienced more bugs then appear in an Animal Planet Channel special on insects in the Amazon Jungle.  Unwanted page formating changes occur when I click my mouse on the page I had just finish reformatting. Undesired line spacing would appear on pages.  The list goes on, but who has the time to be more detailed.Do yourself a favor and avoid the product.  If you need to upgrade, check out the latest version of MS Word, you will be far more satisfied I'm sure</review_text>
I upgraded from Wordperfect Office 12 to X3, but have returned the upgrade to Wordperfect.  The much touted ability to import PDF files is so poorly implemented that it is all but unusable.  In addition, the Wordperfect Mail component will not load data files while my antivirus (ZoneAlarm) is running in the background.  Corel Technical Support takes no responsibility for the incompatability.  Do not upgrade unless these issues are addressed</review_text>
Generally like the program. Hoped it came with a CD to practice in the car but was wrong. It is totally PC based. I'll let you know in about three months if I can actually conduct business in Deutsch.</review_text>
I can't for the life of me understand why Rosetta Stone has garnered such good reviews (although I see a few negative ones here, so I feel validated) and seems to have such an outstanding reputation. I find it practically worthless, and it's expensive to boot. I'm sure that my experience with the German program would apply to Rosetta Stone's other languages as well, as they all taught via the same method.I've been learning German for about 6 months and besides Rosetta Stone I have used Pimsleur, Rocket Languages, and have taken private instruction. Obviously, private instruction is best. But this review is about software, and Pimsleur is best. But Rosetta Stone has more bells & whistles, which is perhaps why people think it is so good. But it isn't. For example, nowhere in Rosetta Stone do you actually learn how to say useful things. Nowhere do you learn how to say "Hello," "How are you, "What's your name," or even "Where's the bathroom." Instead, you will learn how to recognize such useful phrases as "The woman and the boy have a ball on their heads" or "The man is under the donkey" or "These two fish are from the same species" or "The blue triangle is bigger than the red square." Ridiculous!! And note I said "learn how to recognize a phrase." This is the biggest weakness and disappointment with Rosetta Stone. It really doesn't get you to talk at ALL. You are not required to utter a word. You see four pictures, and the speaker will say (in German) "The boy is drinking milk." Now, if you have already heard the word for "boy" (Junge) and three of the pictures have no boys, you simply click on the picture with the boy and presto, you're correct! This multiple choice way of learning is not effective for learning a language! (There is a "practice speaking" mode, equally useless, which I mention below)With Pimsleur, which is an audio only program, you hear conversations that will impart essential words and phrases. And they are repeated (and asks you to repeat) in such a fashion that it sticks. For example, it was weeks ago that it introduced "How much do I owe you?" yet I still remember it. (Wie viel shulde ich Ihnen?--No, I didn't cheat and look it up!) Pimsleur is brilliant in the way it gradually builds your knowledge and abilities. Of course, it isn't perfect as it doesn't explain the grammar. But neither does Rosetta Stone, and Rosetta Stone is worse because with Pimsleur there is also an English speaker who explains some things, while with Rosetta Stone you are left to twist in the wind. That's why software language learning programs should be seen as supplements--supplements to classroom or private instruction.What are the bells & whistles on Rosetta Stone? You get to do a lesson in a variety of ways--seeing pictures with audio (the speaker), or pictures with audio and text, or audio only, for example. There is also a feature where the speaker on the program says a phrase, and you repeat it into a microphone and can compare your voice signature to the speaker's. But I found that this didn't work well at all and wasn't worth the trouble. And again, the phrases weren't useful</review_text>
I have many (too many) Rosetta Stone softwares for language learning, however after purchasing "Tell Me More" software I will never go back to Rosetta Stone. It is true that you can learn a lot of vocabulary with Rosetta's program but that is about it! Rosetta's software is very illogical! Honestly, do not waste your time and money with this program, check Tell Me More and you will be amazed</review_text>
I found this product to represent extremely poor value for money.  I purchased the product based on all the marketing hype and testimonials.  However, I have since come to the conclusion that these guys must pay people to write positive testimonials.This product only covers the basics (levels 1 & 2).  Then they try to rope you into paying even more money for their intermediate levels.I have since purchased a cheaper 'Tell Me More' package (for Spanish) and have been highly impressed with the scope of it.  They have packed so much more value into their package.  And it is a complete package - all the way to advanced level.I think it's really disgusting that Rosetta Stone get away with selling such a seriously inferior product at such a highly inflated price and people still buy it.  I think it borders on being a scam</review_text>
I have been using this product now for almost a year. The only reason I insist using it is because I feel really bad for wasting my money. First, this is not worth $300 bucks.There are only still pictures and sound. No movies or any fancy graphics, so why the price? Second it is very repetitive and it does not advance in a very logical way so that you recognize the grammatical structures behind the ever changing sentences. Third, the sentences that you have to repeat over and over are not practical at all. You keep memorizing thins like "the boy is under the airplane" or "the ball is on the boy's head".Initially I thought, well this is because it progresses very slowly which is not necessarily bad. But then I took a look at the last lessons; you just keep repeating useless senteces like these without real things used on a dialogue.I cannot recommend you another course because I spent so much in this one that I do not want to try again and get disappointed. Don't be fooled by the wonderful reviews like I was. This is definitively NOT worth 300 dollars. It is not even useful for basic converstion. I have learned much more from simple travel books and cassettes from the library.Ah, and if you think that by repeating these structures alone you will understand german grammar ..</review_text>
Being a PC user for many years (since 1985)I have come through all the versions of MS operating systems (does anyone out there remember 3.5!) MS has also piggy backed this "robust" office product for 20 years.  Their upgrades are seldom anything more than a better looking toolbar.  This is no exception, but this time I like the tool bar!  As to ease of use, I use PowerPoint and Word often and my spouse uses Excel.  If there were an easier product available we would buy it but then Windows XP would kill it on sight and Vista would stop working altogether.  Why does MS think that everyone but those working in a professional since (hence Office for Professionals) needs all the junk they subject us to?  Do those guys in Redmond still think adult users of the PC like "cute" things like little doggies wagging their tail or a friendly paper clip to help you answer your every question!  I am tired of Beta testing MS products for so many years but as a PC user I am stuck with them and until someone else can come up with a better system, other than Mac, we are all stuck with them.</review_text>
Office 2007 may seem ok at first.  The menus are all ok for me to use, so I don't have to build menus from scratch.  But after installing the trial, I found numerous complaints that would make me want to trash it if I had it.1)  Word doesn't want to integrate with Outlook very well2)  Everytime I want to send a mail message I accidentally click on 'Paste'3)  The flags and categories for Outlook are annoying and just add to the time spent administering email without helping me more than Outlook 20034)  Along with all of the other Microsoft products I've tried in the past month, it hangs, corrupts its own files, and generally takes up too much memory.I'll stick with Office 2003, which doesn't have nearly as many flaws.  There is no reason for me to upgrade.I'm also back to IE6, Money 2006, and will not upgrade to Vista.I've lost volumes of emails because I can't downgrade my Outlook files.Good Job in alienating your customers, Microsoft.  (so what's new?</review_text>
Normally I might wait to install a new software upgrade, but I just got a new laptop and thought it would be best to use Office 2007 with the new Vista operating system. I was wrong.You would expect that a multi-billion dollar company like Microsoft could put out a powerful and bug-free piece of software. But after a month of using Office 2007, you get the distinct impression that this software is not ready for public release. Microsoft should be ashamed.I don't know the root cause of my problems, but I have to stress that I am running a clean install of Office 2007 on Vista, so there shouldn't be any software conflicts or issues.So what are my issues? The list is long:-- My biggest concern is that MS Word constantly hangs and stalls. It can making editing a document very painful. I suspect the problem is when I put images or Visio diagrams into a document. But that is something the old MS Word was able to do without an issue. Oddly, if I have a colleague open the document and save it out in Word 2003, the problem goes away! What?! It's killing my productivity.-- When ever I cut and paste from an old document, Word hangs for 15 to 20 seconds. And often the formatting and margins in my new document go haywire. I keep having to spend a ton of time fixing things. This never happened in the old Word. This is another time killer.-- Every few days, Outlook 2007 starts telling me that it cannot display my email folders. Uh oh! I have to completely restart my computer to see my email again.-- Outlook 2007 breaks many graphic emails that people send -- they look like a mess. It is because Outlook 2007 does NOT render HTML correctly since it uses the Word engine, not Internet Explorer to display email. I have no idea why Microsoft did this, but they have got to fix it.-- Many of the issues in the old Word 2003 still haven't been fixed. If you place an image, it can often be hard to get it to appear correctly. Why can't they solve this one?-- While most Office programs have the new ribbon interface (which I like), some programs like Visio 2007 do not. So you have to remember how to use two interfaces. Couldn't Microsoft find the time and money to update ALL its programs? Give me a break.-- On a few occassions in Visio 2007, my files have failed to save correctly. At first I thought this must have been my fault, but it's happened to me a few times and can't be a coincidence. A few times I've gotten an error message and lost my work. Ug.-- Word and Excel 2007 use a completely new file format. So anyone you send a document to has to have 2007 installed (which isn't likely the case). To get around this, you can save it down to a 2003 file format, but then you end up with two files on your hard drive -- one in the new format and one in the old format. What a pain! Also, there definitely seems to be an issue with Office 2007 opening older Office 2003 files. Could be the cause of many of my problems, but there is no way I can avoid using old files. They should have worked harder on compatibility.There are good things about the new 2007. I do like the new interface design and the new features in Outlook 2007 are amazing for organizing tasks and sharing your calendar.But I don't think it's fair that Microsoft released a product so full of serious, serious bugs that have cost me hours and hours of extra work. I didn't spend hundreds of dollars on a beta product and don't think the public should have to suffer. Surely they can afford to do better!</review_text>
Unfortunately, it seems once you have downloaded NAV 2007, your whole computer will not function properly. Internet Explorer malfunctions, and I also received a blue screen (fear of crash) stating that what ever program was recently installed, I should reinstall it. I did so, but the problems did not go away. I called Norton, they told me to run in safe mode without norton. My computer was back to normal, so it was Norton causing all the problems. I unistalled it and went with another product, after spending the $60 and many hours with Norton help desk. Don't believe me, do a search on any search engine, and you will see the many problems and no apparent solutions for this program!! Up till now, I have only used Norton, and never thought twice when buying the update. I'm now moving on to another product</review_text>
I'm responsible for 10 computers at our organization. Last year we purchased Norton Antivirus 2006. It was such a resource hog that it stopped our older computers (550 Mhz) from working and I had to uninstall from all computers. After reading reviews that said 2007 was leaner, I tried to install this on 6 computers. Only 1 install went without problems. Installing on three other computers took 3 days, and I'm still not through with computer 5. Sometimes the program won't install. Once it crashes during install, it leaves behind broken code that prevents reinstall unless you use the Norton uninstall tool, which removes ALL Norton products. So in addition to uninstalling and reinstalling Antivirus, you also have to reinstall Norton Ghost or any other Norton products. On the computer I'm still fighting with the install went smoothly, but during the update the program hung up and now I can't open Norton Antivirus. Even worse, when I open a Word document, the Norton Antivirus starts scanning the document and freezes the computer.  What a nightmare</review_text>
I did a little research after trying to install this product and found that Symantec is no longer rated very well for Anti Virus.  One site that states this is Consumer Reports (they are towards the bottom of the ratings).  It has become major bloatware and its stability isn't what it used to be.  Maybe this is why Peter Norton sold his interests and bailed out.  I am far from being a novice, but this thing gave me a fight the whole way.  So on with my saga.First, this product was supposed to be for Windows XP and 2000 Pro.  Even the box says this.  But when I insert the CD in a W2K Pro machine all I got was an error box showing the error icon and the OK button.  Real informative.  Going through the back door I try to install without going through the CD autostart program.  Now I get a box that says it requires XP 32 bit.  So that leaves out 2 of the machines I bought this for.So I go to a machine running XP.  First one loads OK, but it says it is incompatible with my firewall (ZoneAlarm) which I happen to trust a lot.  Then on the second machine it goes through the install (which takes 45 min) and then runs the autoupdate and hangs halfway through.  I finally had to abort it after it sat there an hour (I was hoping it was just another slow moment).  Rebooted and the program was no longer running.  Starting it up myself resulted in it failing to load.  Now I'm stuck, it won't allow me to uninstall nor reload it again.  Had to obtain a removal tool from their web site and it promptly removed every Symantec product on the machine.  Maybe this was the writing on the wall?By now I'm a couple days into the drama.  Meanwhile, the first XP machine that loaded fine did another automatic update and guess what.  It locked up half way through.  Now it will not run and had to be removed the same way.So I am now the proud owner of ZoneAlarm's Internet Suite.  It cost less than the NAV (both 5 user versions), and loaded much faster.  Ten minutes and I was done, where it was an hour into NAV when things worked and it loaded.  I am taking this up with Symantec and trying to get a refund.  They can keep it.  I've been less satisfied with every upgrade and this one finally broke the camel's back.  Maybe I'll try again someday if I come up with a new camel, but they don't grow well in Seattle.ADDED 3-12-2007:   I have also noted that after removing NAV that things I could not explain before have been cured.  For instance, the web site [...] would not load many of it's pages correctly, they would show the text coding instead of html.  Now that I am NAV free, all of the pages on this site load with no problems.  Hmmmm..</review_text>
Norton is still the 800LB. Gorilla of Antivirus software, but I think more and more people are realizing that bigger does not mean better!The old days when Peter Norton made an excellent antivirus program are long gone, and these days Norton is just a mass produced product of Symantec's.Customer service is through an Internet Database, and you must pay over $40 just to speak with someone even when Norton lets you down and lets a virus slip in.  The biggest problem is that this program is a huge hog of system resources.  It is no wonder that the ratings are so poor on Norton these days. I bought Trend Micro's PC-Cillin and have not looked back.  There product is less expensive and includes free phone support, and they have received all sorts of awards for their product</review_text>
Quickbooks "sunsetted" my previous version, forcing me to buy this horriblle, buggy software.  It lacks many of the features that I liked from my previous version (2003), runs much slower, uses 10 times as much memory, and is full of bugs.  I regularly need to run Windows system restore when all of my company data disappears.  Avoid this product at all costs.  Time that I used to spend on more important business functions is now spent trying to get this crappy software to work.  I have used Quickbooks for 12 years, and 4 editions, but this will be my last Intuit product.  I wish I could give it 0 stars</review_text>
I've tried to be a loyal Quickbooks Pro user for 5 years now and at first this company provided a competent accounting product that was decent after you learned its idiosyncracies. But each year you will be forced to update ($$$) or your tax tables will not be accurate, and each year some of the capabilities will be lost and you will have to pay for them to be restored ($$$), each year the program will be more expensive to update($$$). I am not an unreasonable business owner and I don't mind paying for good service, but Intuit has turned into a unethical, money grubbing monster. They sunset and disable your software every time you download an update,  forcing updates and buying previously provided services (payroll tax tables, e-mailing invoices, printing 1099 and W2). This is especially true at year end, becuase they know they have you in a tax/year end crunch. Now they are even doing unauthorised billing of new services (last year they started charging quarterly fees for tax tables--this year they charge a mandatoy $300 payroll update as well as a $100 software update for the program itself.) Furthermore they charge your credit card without permission under the ruberic that its the same as the quarterly tax table fee. Honestly, consider some other program! This deceptive practice of software disabling and data blocking, combined with the dubious practice of sunsetting software every year has grown intolerable. I hope they get the class action suit they deserve.</review_text>
I regret having purchased this product.  I have not been able to use it for two months, after finally giving up trying to get it to work.  I have a very nice laptop running Windows XP Home, and encountered many problems.  I tried all of the avenues available to me through QuickBooks, online, via email, and on the telephone.  I spent nearly 25 hours overall trying to get the numerous issues taken care of.  Here are just a few:  The program would not convert my Quicken data; random script errors when you try to access help topics within the product; the phone # provided in the payroll demo is invalid; None of my info was viewable after bank download - it spontaneously failed to download my bank account info, after having successfully downloaded it for about two weeks.  I spent 2 & 1/2 hours on the phone trying to resolve just this one issue.  Part of the problem lies in the fact that I was unable to speak to a customer service person who's first language was English.  Each time I was on the phone, the customer service person seemed to continually ask me to re-describe the problem, then he/she would seem to be typing the info into the computer and waiting....then eventually telling me some solution to try, then eventually telling me they did not know what the problem was.  Not helpful in any way, though very polite. I'm sorry to say that this is a terribly designed, convoluted, over-complicated, non-user-friendly item which I would like to toss over a cliff.</review_text>
I have used a lot of software, but I do not remember using much that is as difficult to use or learn than Quickbooks.  I have learned it over time, but there seem to be several functions in it that could be done in fewer steps.  I would not upgrade unless I absolutely had to.  The program is usable, but I am not interested in investing a lot more money in it.  It works for my small business, but I could still probably get by with Quicken, as I do not write checks on it.  I do kind of wish I had stayed with Quicken.  The most annoying thing about the program was that I was going credit card data downloads in Quicken, but when I changed to Quickbooks, it would not let me download data from my Quicken credit card, it wanted me to switch to a Quickbooks credit card, or ask permission of all my credit card providers.  I appreciate the security, but since both programs are made by the same company, this just seemed like a scam</review_text>
This is a great programme with Windows XP but be aware that it conflicts with Vista,the latest version of Windows. An upgrade is recommended by Nuance,the manufacturer to OmniPage at double the cost of Textbridge</review_text>
I purchased this program with the intention of entering a bunch of typewritten pages into my computer.  The document that this program produced from newly typed material was so full of errors that I simply had to re-type.  It would have taken longer to correct than to re-type.  When I talked to Textbridge about these problems all they would tell me is that the program was not meant for such use and that I should buy one of their other programs which had good optical character recognition capabilities.  In other words, they know the product is not any good and they are not willing to stand behind it.  The program is useless for optical character recognition work or anything else</review_text>
This product simply does not produce accurate results. It skips entire lines, words on the same line, and misreads even the most legible characters. It came bundled with my scanner, so at least I did not waste my money on it. Don't waste yours</review_text>
I have been a faithful Mia fan for 5 years and have bought all the other games for my two kids. This game is a big disappointment. The language game is virtually unplayable in French. I am fluent in French and went to a French language university for nine years. I could barely understand what the characters were saying. If this program is intended to teach kids a second language, it would be more likely to turn them off the language instead. This game definitely does not cater to anyone who does not already have an understanding of French</review_text>
I can't even comment on the actual System Works application because I never got it to run - it ruined my system right after install!  Once I installed it, it asked for a reboot, then came back wtih "Load Error!  Press a key to reboot..." which just lead to the error message again, and again, and again.A chat with tech support (after an hour wait) revealed that there are problems with the GoBack files, so I had to create a bootable CD, and do all kind of things which I haven't been able to do yet since my burner software doesn't have Image capability - necessary for creating this bootable cd.Don't buy it, don't install it, don't use it - uninstall everything Norton/Symantec and never go back.  I'll be lucky if I ever get my computer working again.....Thanks Symantec!!!!</review_text>
After over a year and a half including renewing for updates I've now discarded Norton SW 2006. it was problamatic and a waste of money. It conflicts with Partition magic another Symantec product and will not work with many MS updates. My system is now operating trouble free since I've uninstalled NSW. Previously my computer was eratic and crashed frquently</review_text>
I have uninstalled SystemWorks 2006 and will not be going back to Symantec products. I had three problems:1. On initial install of SystemWorks in January 2006, the "GoBack" module wiped my hard drive. This was annoying and not easy to fix.2. I reinstalled (and had to reregister) without the GoBack module and used the software for several months satisfactorily. A few annoyances: CleanUp consistently (every night) deleted cookies and autofills I wanted to keep, so despite my entering them as exceptions in the options table, they kept disappearing.3. I wanted to move to a faster hard drive. After following the Norton Ghost directions explicitly (and getting a "successful" message, the cloned drive would not boot up. I therefore went back to my old drive. SystemWorks required me to reinstall (and reregister). In December, after renewing my SystemWorks subscription for $49.95, I successfully cloned the disk (using EZ Gig II). Again, the only software that did not work on boot up was SystemWorks. I called customer support and was told that the server would not allow me to install on more than 3 computers. I explained the circumstances but was told "there was nothing to be done," and that I would have to buy the software again. I chose not to.I have completely uninstalled the entire program and am now enjoying faster performance from the operating system and quicker boot times from Word, Photoshop, etc. The protections I was getting from SystemWorks are being covered by AVG AntiVirus (shareware), Registry Mechanic (shareware), SpyBot (shareware), and DiskKeeper ($30), and Microsoft's Malware Guard (free).I have been using Norton/Symantec products for over 15 years. Never again</review_text>
Installed this on my laptop and desktop computers.  One installation was late in 2005, the other was in 2nd quarter of 2006.  Both have tried to fail.  The laptop will no longer do automatic updates.  I can manually download and install the updates, but it is a bit of a hassle.  The desktop will no longer download the Symantec updates at all.  I attempted several uninstalls and reinstalls, won't do it.  The only remedy is to take both computers to a computer shop and needlessly pay someone to fix the mess this junk software has made on both computers.  Because of the problems, I've run into several problems, mostly related to .cab files when I attempt downloads.  I've switched to AVG and Zone Alarm - both FREE and they work</review_text>
I recently tried to update my Norton Systemworks.  Halfway through the update, I got a message telling me it was unable to uninstall my old Norton Systemworks.  I tried to back out of the installation at that point, but was unable.  I called the Norton company, spent an hour on the phone with a tech, only to have them tell me it was my computer.  I assured them that I was just using my computer, which was fine, and now it doesn't work.  They told me there was nothing further that they could do, and that I would have to call a computer service company.  I found out that the uninstall process corrupted my operating system, causing me to lose everything on my hard drive, and requiring a new operating system.  I have run into other people who had exactly the same problem, with no help from the Norton Company.  I will never again buy a Norton product.  I only wish I could get my money back from them.</review_text>
I've been a loyal user of Systemworks (also "Utilities" & AntiVirus) for many years, frequently buying upgrades as I moved through various Windows OSs.  The latest verison (2006) has been a big disappointment.1) The "integrator" repeatedly crashes (and "must shut down").  I was told to reintall (it took 4 hours).  Tech support (email) was slow and barely intelligible.2) The full scan now takes over 8 hours on a modest sized system.3) The utilities have not been substantially improved in 5 years4) The rebate (for upgrade users) came in the form of a debit card, not a check.  (What a hassle!  I don't want any more "plastic"!)5) Turning the Norton protection off substantially speeds up my PC.  What the heck is going on back there?During the next year, I'll be looking for a new Anti-Virus support product.Cheers, Joh</review_text>
I "upgraded" to NORTON'S 2006 Version of Internet Security and Virus Protection software online. Included was Norton SystemWorks. I have used Norton anti-viral software exclusively for several years without any major problems. And yes, I always remove my previous version, before adding new software. Even though my internet connection is via private satellite antenna, it took almost two hours for the product to download and install.  Then when I rebooted my laptop (a new high-end Sony Vaio with Windows XP), it froze up during startup. I won't go into all the hassle involved, but after THREE removals and downloads over a period of several weeks, it became apparent that there was something SERIOUSLY wrong with NORTON'S 2006 Product. It caused crashes on almost a daily basis, and updates always took an excessive amount of time. Customer service was no help at all, and the company refused to refund my purchase price. I've since switched to a different brand of anti-viral internet protection software and have had no more problems with my computer. After this experience, I will NEVER use NORTON products again. The only reason I gave this a 1-star rating is because it's the lowest rating available. It should actually be MINUS 5 STARS for the aggravation and time and money wasted</review_text>
I've been a digital artist for 5 years and always loved and supported PaintShopPro and Corel products. I have to say I am very disappointed in the new version, PSPXI.No problems with the download, but the program crashes easily, you can not drag and drop as fast as in 9, basically is slower in everything you do. I am a photographer, and looked forward to the new photo features, which work, but for panoramas and complicated work others than one photo forget it. Just hangs up and so slow you could go have dinner in between.I have searched the net and support wise, the upgrades and patches have not helped. Corel is not solving the problem and maybe they can't. This is not a PC problem which they so want us to believe. I have plenty of memory and speed on my PC. It may be something involving how the XI stores it's cache. Not sure. But the changes are not workable, sadly.I think there are some corrupt files or driver problems that Corel desparately needs to fix and supply us with, or they will find themselves out of the PS market. This is not just me talking, it has happened to alot of loyal fans. Because it could be the better than Photoshop if they fix it.  If you really want the program, download the free trial first and or try the X or 9 version, especially if your PC is an older model.</review_text>
I buy this dvd from Amazon and try to play it but my desktop can't read any data on the dvd, like it's blank. So I send it back for a replacement and it has the same problem. Both my desktops can't read any data on the dvd but my laptop can play it fine. Next I contact Git Corp and they say burning software can conflict with it so I uninstall Nero and it still wont work.Git Corp says they don't know what the problem is and passes it to their developers. I haven't heard back from them. All 3 comps run XP, 3 different dvd drives, don't know what's wrong! I have no problems playing the Avengers, Spiderman, or X-Men dvds</review_text>
Picassa, part of the Google suite of programs, is both better than this program and free! What more do I need to add? The user interface of Picassa is easier to use and more responsive</review_text>
Despite generally good experiences with Microsoft products, Windows Live OneCare seems to have resulted in very poor performance on a brand new Lenovo PC running Windows XP.  I removed it and performance has improved back to where it was, now running McAfee for virus scanning etc</review_text>
Summary:I wasted a lot of time trying to make this work, and I eventually went back to other products.In theory, integrating virus checker, firewall, spyware, and data backup into a unified suite (like MS Office with Word, Excel, & PowerPoint) makes sense.  However, this software package seems poorly made; it did not work very well for me.Hardware, OS, & primary software used:1.  Dell Lattitude D620 Laptop with 2GB RAM, Windows XP, MS Office2.  Dell X1 Laptop (thin/lightweight) with 2GB RAM, Windows XP, MS Office3.  Dell Dimension Desktop with 4 GB RAM, Windows XP, children's gamesPrior virus/spyware products:Lattitude & X1: NortonDimension: freeware provided by our ISPTheory:  Since Microsoft makes the OS & office applications that get infected with viruses, their product should be better integrated with the OS.  There will be synergy by integrating several related software applications.Lesson:Well, after a series of terrible experiences, I hope others will benefit from my wasted time:1.  Instead of loading most of the program from the CD & downloading small updates, this seems to load only a small part of the program and downloads huge files.  This made me feel that the product was shipped unfinished.  You had to do this separately for each machine since it hides the downloaded files then deletes them prior to finishing the installation.  This took a better part of an afternoon.2.  I purchased a 3-pack license.  Installing and activating the software on the 2nd & 3rd machines required a series of very annoying steps that involved logging into their website with broken links.  It finally required a phone call.  At least, the phone support experience was good.3.  The product promises to minimize performance impact, and improve overall performance.  On the Lattitude & Dimension (powerful machines), there was no difference in performance, but we could notice a slightly slower performance with the X1.  This was later verified when we uninstalled the MS Windows OneCare and replaced it with another product.4.  The product has difficulty updating.  It opens a small message box that asks you to click to update OneCare, but that takes you to a webpage that only works about 1 in 4 times.5.  Except for the first time, data backup always has several errors that I have to manually fix.  This has very rarely happened with other data backup software I've used.6.  Some applications, the firewall asks everytime for permission to connect to the Internet although the application is in the list to always allow this connection.</review_text>
This is a simple drawing program, much like Paint. Don't be mislead by the colored picture on the cover, it only does black and white. And it has no help in drawing Manga figures. And it is a stripped-down program, at that. The documentation is for the full program, so you can't do much of what you read in the manual and help files. Save your money, this program isn't worth buying</review_text>
Before using ColorVision Spyder2 my monitor was calibrated with the free Adobe Gamma program installed as part of Adobe Photoshop. My monitor looked great and the photos I printed looked great too. The colors were spot on. After using Spyder2 Express my monitor looks worse. My monitor appears dim, the color temperature is too warm and colors look green and dull. If I had known it was going to ruin my already great looking monitor I wouldn't have wasted my time. My hope was that it would make my monitor look better, not worse. I am not at all satisfied with this product wouldn't recommend buying it. Instead try Adobe Gamma or look for other free monitor calibration software tools online</review_text>
I'm an amateur photographer and I use Photoshop CS2 for most of my digital editing.  I decided I needed a colorimeter based on the recommendations of many books that I have read on digital editing.I had to download an update of the software program before I could start using my Spyder.  This procedure alone took several hours because I kept getting "error" messages.  I can't count how many times I unloaded and reloaded the program.  I was eventually able to run the program, however, every time I calibrated my one year old Emachine CRT monitor, it left me with an orange color cast on my screen.  I worked with ColorVision technical support for many frustrating hours.  The technical support person I was working with was very pleasant and really tried to help me.  They even mailed me a new sensor because they thought the first one was defective.  Unfortunately I was unable to get the orange color cast removed from my monitor.  After several weeks of trying to get the Spyder2 Express to calibrate my monitor, I gave up.  I just didn't want to spend any more time trying to get it to work so it was returned.  I really wanted it to work.  I'm back to using Adobe Gamma.</review_text>
I had some difficulty with the product loading the default profile, then the product asked later for a re-input of the serial number, which I no longer had.  No big deal, contact customer service, right?Contacted customer service via email once, got no response.  Sent a second email, and got a response asking a follow up question, since then nothing, no response, nada.  All follow ups ignored.Perhaps this product will work for you, but for me, it ultimately went into the trash because of Colorvision's refusal to respond.  Don't support this product, they won't support you</review_text>
The product is so so, there are others that do the same thing for a bit less. But Colorvision thinks it owns the worlds so when it comes o support - you are screwed. Between putting you on hold for ever, not calling back etc.</review_text>
Unlike versions up to No. 6, this version require authorization. This means that a single use version can't be loaded on multiple computers. Adobe informed me that this was not a bug and wanted me to buy multiple copies eventhough I am only using one computer at a time. This version forces you to take off the old legal version in order to install. When I found out that my legal version couldn't be used, it forced me to reinstall version 6, this took almost an hour to install, reboot, un-install and reinstall the orginal version. Why is Adobe the only company that forces this? Their program installation don't even skip from one set of four numbers to the next. They force you to type the dashes between the numbers.If you have multiple computers stay away from anything above version 6</review_text>
Worked okay until I installed XP Service Pack 2.  Now I can no longer scan using my Brother MFC-9700 and Paperport 9.  It has been a long time since Service Pack 2 was released, and Scansoft has left everyone who bought Paperport 9 in the cold.  I could not care less if they now come up with software that is compatible with SP2.  This kind of treatment of customers makes it clear that they do not deserve our business.  Don't take my word for it.  Google the issue, and you'll find out that there are a lot of dissatisfied customers.  From now on, I'll avoid Scansoft</review_text>
I was very excited to get this product.  It scans well, files well, is very sexy and promising.  Then I decided to Search for a few files based on my Keywords.  Oooops!  It won't search!!If you don't know already, PaperPort offers you only one free tech support call.  After that it's $20 a pop.  The rather surly technician I reached had me re-install my program.  Okay, but it still wouldn't search.  Then he told me to un-install Windows Service Pack 2.  Uh uh, no way.  Nada.  That's when I asked for a refund.I bought MyCab for $40.  Tech support is marvelous, within one hour over the Internet.  The only thing it doesn't do is scan within the program, but then I can do that, can't I?AKNapa, C</review_text>
I have used both Paperport 8 and Paperport 9 Deluxe for over a year so I am qualified to report.Both pieces of software have some form of severe incompatibility with Windows XP Pro.I cannot really get version 9 to operate.  Everytime I try its like cold molasses.  Click...wait....wait....wait...wait...and then lock up.I'm very experienced.  I've been working with PCs since 1991.  Every other piece of software I've loaded works very well...except for Paperport 8 and 9.In theory Paperport 9 should be fine because it converts all scans to PDF which is more or less a universal file format.  However theory is a lot better than reality.Support is nonexistent from ScanSoft.  If you pay the $19.95 per incident, you still do not get a solution.The ScanSoft forum is always either not working (another bad sign) or it's full of people complaining about the software and lack of support.Unfortunately there are not a lot of alternatives, but doQments looks promising.Avoid Paperport unless you have money and time to waste</review_text>
I needed a document management system. After looking for software, there only appeared to be Paperport.I had read somewhere that the software becomes incredibly slow with a large number of files. I guessed a large number meant 2500+ at least.This concerned me, so I called pre-sales at ScanSoft, and asked if it was slow with a large number of files. He was not sure! So he told me to call technical. I called technical, and it his responses were very slow and sounded like he was reading them out to me. I asked if he was reading the ScanSoft website and he said yes, so I hung up. Obviously I read their site for an answer, and did not need to be paying international call charge for someone who seemed less knowledgeable than myself to read it.I got the software. Basically all the software consists of is windows explorer and scanning software. It worked well, and I thought OK, expensive for what it is, when Windows Explorer and scanning software (usually free) would nearly do most of it, but THEN after around 560 PDFs, it started running VERY slow.I thought it was my machine so installed it and the PDFs on a new Vaio 1.7Mhz, 1 gig laptop. Same problem. If you click to view the PDF then hit the return back, it takes 12 seconds! So if you view a document, it takes a good few seconds but then when you hit back to the Paperport Desktop to continue it takes 12 seconds!!! Completely unusuable!If you have less than 500 files, it is maybe expensive software, but for more than 500 do not waste you money. It runs so slow you can not use it. I wonder how ScanSoft get away with it - surely they should have tested it internally with thousands of files</review_text>
I got my DVD a few weeks back and discovered I could not read any of the files form the 1990s. I tried on several computers I have in the house and came to realize that the DVD is defective. I contacted Gitcorp about the problem and they informed me they would send me a replacement disc.Problem is that after nearly four weeks there hasn't been any DVD and repeated attempts to contact Gitcorp has resulted in no reponses.Update, after continued emails to Gitcorp, I finally got a replacment DVD. They didn't even ask to see the original bad DVD. So my rating of this product would go up if I could. If you buy the product, check it closely, and get in touch with Gitcorp as soon as you find any problems. They can be very slow about responding</review_text>
This is the stupidest game I ever saw for sale- my kids laughed at how poorly the graphics and story were. What a complete waste</review_text>
The game is called Fritz and Chesster. Fritz is the boy. Chester is a rat. That girl you see in the picture, her name is Bianca. She never actually plays. She just says things like "Well done, brave knight!" and asks stupid questions. At one point poor Bianca points out that the queen is the strongest piece, and Fritz makes a comment about his mother chewing out his father. The tone and context are extremely anti-woman, in my opinion. He also counters by saying that boys are smarter.It seems like the makers of this game were really threatened by the fact that you have to call the most powerful piece "she". To take the queen down a notch, they refer to a group or queens as a harem. To demonstrate how this powerful piece moves they have the queen run around picking flowers as fast as she can. A male voice says, "Off you go," in a tone which one can only assume is meant to accompany a little pat on her behind.</review_text>
I agree with reviewer Mr. Dietz.  I was eager for my child to learn chess and we bought this new on Amazon for $24.99.  Put it in and loaded it in.  This game is so confusing and there are no instructions at all. No help menu either.  We wasted at least 2 hours on it before I ejected it and apologized to her.  There is nothing here to learn chess from</review_text>
I was looking for an intructional CD to help my daughter to learn chess.  I read the reviews and endorsements and thought that this was what I was looking for.  WRONG!First of all, the CD comes with no instruction book and you're left to try and figure out what you're supposed to do by yourself (good luck). I've spent over 2 hours on this thing so far and I still haven't seen one thing that would help my daughter to learn to play chess.I've emailed their 'help line' hoping to get some answers and never heard back from them.Save your money and your sanity and don't buy this CD.</review_text>
The product was easy to install but there was a trick I noticed.A day after installing the software I ran full scan. To try the sincerity of the software, I downloaded  same free trial. To my chagrin I was told my computer has about 420 problems and could only fix about 15.My question now is are all these gimmicks</review_text>
I am a software tech. I first "free trial" V6 online-1. Finds 131 errors, but will only fix 4 (must buy full version!). SHEESH!2. Buy full version with 20% off coupon (3 computer lic, for only $9.95 more- their web site).3. Does NOT remove left/overs..., from old uninstalled pgms. (Fix-it Utilities "6" safely did- read my review).4. Then they only support updates... for 1 year- auto-renew! RIP-OFF!I got a refund, and will NEVER use them again</review_text>
Be warned, this product does not support all advertised features on all phones.  Right out of the box I found it did not support 2 of our 4 cell phones.  Of the phones that it did support, the only sync features available were photo downloading and calendar sync.  The ability to transfer other data such as movies, contacts and ring tones were not available for my particular phone.  Without all of the advertised features are available I consider this a complete waste of money</review_text>
it will not work in my Windows XP.  I have repeatedly asked for help;no one answers.  Finally, I was told to look it up on a databank.  If you have nothing but time on your hands maybe this is for you...but if you work for a living, you've been had by this company Encoreusa</review_text>
After using TurboTax couple of years and then using TaxCut for last two years (2005 and 2006 returns) I concluded that TurboTax is much superior software. TaxCut's only advantage is that it is cheaper. If you take out price from the equation, TaxCut is inferior in quality.- In 2005 TaxCut software there was not PDF output of all the forms. This was pretty silly because after couple of years if I want to access my tax return I am not going to install TaxCut again in my computer and view by return. I would rather have have my tax return available in some widely acceptable format like PDF and then access/distribute whenever I want (I don't keep my documents in hardcopies). So I wrote to H&R Block. This year they added that saving return in PDF file feature available. But unfortunately, this is far from being perfect. It excludes number of important forms - example, IRS form 8853, California Adjustment Schedule 540CA etc. Instead of that it saves numbers of useless worksheet (without any data entered in those worksheets), same form multiple times.- Most annoying thing about this software is updating incorrect data. In one form I entered wrong data. While reviewing it I found a problem and went to that specific section to update. But in calculation TaxCut still showed old incorrect number. I just could not make it to use new corrected number. Eventually I had to restart a new return from scratch - just to have an dollar amount corrected.- In many section useful Helps are missing</review_text>
We were big fans of TaxCut, especially after Turbo added spyware ..... THIS YEAR'S TAX CUT has irreguarities that are costing ($$) me ......... for example, you file your college student's return and check the box that she/he will be an exemption on the head-of-household return & then comes the surprise, head-of-household can't file their return with that college student as an exemption, despite checking the proper boxes! ....... for example, it can't caluculate railroad retirement benefits ..... for example, it tells you that your return is a-okay, you pay $15, then it tells you afterward that of the glitches and wants another $15 to refile! ........ good-bye Tax Cut!</review_text>
H&R block does a much better job marketing software than writing it. I used the on-line version, had trouble registering so chose the option to begin entering data and register later. After about an hour of painfully slow entry, sometimes just one item per page, most of the time looking at "LOADING, PLEASE WAIT" I had to keep an appointment so tried to register and save. No luck, repeated attempts to register gave unidentified error, and I could not save without registering. Finally just left the computer on and left; when I came back TaxCut had timed out and lost all my data. By the way there is a screen which looks like you are accepting the terms of a software agreement but if you read the fine print you are agreeing to let them sell your e-mail to other companies. Even if you select NO you will get frequent e-mails from H&R Block. I will save time and do my taxes on paper forms this year. When a company can't get something simple like this right, it calls into question everything they do</review_text>
Two weeks ago I attempted to do my taxes on this software.  However, it couldn't complete the hybrid car tax credit portion so I could file.  I had two weeks until the update was available.  I downloaded it just now and entered the new questions regarding the hybrid and was told I had a credit of $3,100.  However, it never added this number to my total tax credits.  All customer support could come up with was "Start over from scratch, don't even import your information from last year's Taxcut".  Never again</review_text>
Microsoft continues their legacy of software that doesn't work. I've been using Windows since the very beginning and 2000 professional and windows xp was about the only solid operating systems Microsoft has released. You would expect this so called upgrade to further improve upon this, instead it is many steps backwards. BTW, I have a 4400 AMD, 3 gigs of ram, and can say that Vista is SLOW SLOW SLOW. Be prepared for everything to run slower than it did on XP. Cool interface, about the only positive thing about Vista I have found so far. Searches are also much faster, but hardly a reason to upgrade. Be prepared for Windows Updates after installing Vista that actually cause once working drivers to stop working. I'm tempted to go back to XP, so needless to say a big waste of time and effort.</review_text>
In short: too expensive, all eye-candy, no driver support from third parties, and the licensing model makes a re-install impossible without a telephone call to Microsoft to verify that you are not stealing their software!I upgraded my Dell desktop system from XP media center to Vista Ultimate to "fix" several problems I was having with XP. I found this to be a bad decision. I first installed the 64 bit version of Vista, but found that there are virtually zero third party companies that support 64bit Vista! No drivers, no working printers, USB devices, No internet security suites, etc! I then decided to upgrade to a larger hard drive. The Maxtor utility transfer utility did not work with Vista at all! It totally produced an unbootable system that the install CD could not fix. I then re-installed the 32 bit version of Vista Ultimate included in my upgrade box using the same license key. The on-line activation said that I already had this key in use and the only choices were 1) buy a new copy, 2) type in a different license key, 3) use the telephone to call Microsoft. I called Microsoft and found that their automated assistant could not help and was transferred to a person with a semi-strong accent who asked if this was the first installation and then asked if I was using it on the same machine (yes, it's the same machine). He then read a very long activation key to me that I had to type in. I find this totally unacceptable.the 32 bit version has better third party support, but it's not great yet. I'm using a lot of beta drivers that I had to search hard to find. The changes in the OS are mostly eye-candy from the end-user's perspective. I find the new licensing model and policies assume you are guilty first, and then makes you prove it. In doing so, Microsoft is burdening the bulk of their honest customers with a lot of effort to just make their software activate. Jack-booted policies like this will result in me buying from Apple next time. At least Apple treats me like the honest customer that I am!</review_text>
I have thought well of every operating system since DOS 3.1.  This is without a doubt the worst system I have ever seen.  Not only is it NOT graphicaly intuitive, it is incompatible with most all of my 32 bit software.  Trying to use Quicken will crash the computer.  It is going to cost a bundle to upgrade all of a person's softwarein order to use Vista.  The only thing you will get out of running Vista is a lot of headaches</review_text>
It's not because it's so slow that I hate it, it's because Microsoft has decided that I'm too stupid to know what I'm doing so they've decided to protect me from myself and won't allow me to even look at what's on my hard drive. Every mouse click now takes 3 or 4 clicks for the same thing. It's so confusing to look at my documents folders, I can't figure out what is where. I can't view web pages on my own site because they aren't in the security frame of safe. All my USB WiFi devices don't work on Vista and the only ones available are extremely expensive. My cousin bought a Vista installed laptop and with customer support couldn't get it connected to his WiFi router at home because of security issues, so he took it back and got one that has XP Media Center on it for less. I was given a full, licensed copy of Vista Ultimate and I will not install it on any of my computers. If MS stops supporting XP and I have only Vista available in a PC, I'll buy an Apple</review_text>
VISTA is appropriated named.  VISTA defines something great to look at.  If all you did was look at Microsoft Vista it would be the perfect operating system indeed.  Unfortunately Vista is a computer operating system that was designed to be used and there is the problem.  Vista is so secure and so over burdened with layers upon burdensome processor power robbing layer of sheer garbage it is rendered totally completely and utterly useless.Vista will take the fastest XP computer and turn it into a slow worthless pile of trash.  Vista is so slow it takes me back to the days when I used to walk away from my IBM AT computer get a cup of coffee and walk around the building.  What makes Vista worse still is Microsoft Office 2007 the absolute pits in word processing.  Add Office 2007 to Vista and you won't be productive at all but dang won't it look pretty. If you just want to watch your computer make pretty colors and areo-glass catch yourself some goofs watch Vista.  When you want to work and be productive turn on your XP computer.  Windows 2000 and XP work hard while Vista Hardly Works at all.  Vista is garbage don't buy this dreck!Everything you try to do on Vista is not allowed.  Almost every peice of equipment you run on Vista needs to be updated to so called Vista friendly versions.  The messed up Windows explorer to the point to where it is beyond useless.  The problem with Vista is that Microsoft had taken all the wizards and helpful features far as they could in XP.  In Vista they had to try to top a operating system that pretty much did what you asked of it with little fuss.  In Vista the software code writers were just changing things because they could.  Vista makes nothing better or easier.  In fact Vista is built in a manner that almost seems to go out of its way to make even the most simple compater related tasks unpleasant needlessly long boring and tedious.In a word TEDIOUS IS THE BEST SINGLE WORD TO DESCRIBE MICROSOFT WINDOWS VISTA.  VISTA HAS SUCCEEDED IN BRINGING THE ENTIRE COMPUTER EXPERIENCE IS PAINFULLY NEW LEVEL OF THE PURELY TEDIOUS THAT HAS NOT BEEN DREAMT OF BEFORE!  I just wish I could give Vista no stars or more honestly a negative star rating.  I won't be buying Vista for my current systems and even when I get a new computer I will not be using Vista is it comes pre installed.  I have my own old trusty XP disks and I will reinstalled XP the last useful usable operating system Microsoft made.XP is the goofy kiddie skool like interface is ugliest operating system Microsoft ever made but while it was an ugly duckling it did work pretty well.  Vista is by far the prettiest operating system Microsoft has ever made but it is pretty and dumb.  Vista is over burdened with programmatic junk has a way to high opinion of itself.  Vista is so much more secure because all the dumb security features make the operating system unusable.  Any computer you make unusable is the most secure because you can't do any productive work on it.  Vista makes your computer experience endlessly tedious and makes your computer system a must see door stop.  The philosophy of Vista seems to be that a good computer should be seen but never productively used.  Vista is a great system for that  well monied executive that wants to look busy while doing nothing productive</review_text>
i had a problem at the end of the process in that the program indicated no errors, but when you went to print the return, the message stated that there were errors on the return.  i contacted turbo tax directly, but they had no explanation.  they simply said that they had received a couple of calls about this problem.  that was it</review_text>
Turbo Tax is fine. The linking into Quickbooks Pro (QBP) is limited to only the most recent 2 versions of QBP. So if you have an older version (older than 2005) you have to buy the new QBP to have Turbo Tax lift the data out of QB. Now Intuit will only sell a new version of 2007 - NO MORE UNGRADES. "For the consumer" they will tell you. BS, I will be changing accounting platforms as soon as I can find a replacement. This is the problem with software oligolopies! An Open Source replacement is much needed for both Tax prep and accounting.</review_text>
Several years ago I used DeLorme's Street Atlas with a USB GPS receiver. The software worked but the interface was lousy. This year I tried Microsoft's Streets and Trips 2007 and was surprised to find that it has an interface that is smoother in some ways than the Delorme software, but still surprisingly clumsy. And the help is possibly the worst I have seen in a Microsoft product (that's saying a lot). Here are some of the problems:1. Street & Trips is expecting a GPS receiver that uses a **COM PORT**. Are you kidding me? In 2007??? The Delorme Earthmate 20 (usb) will work if you use the delorme com port emulation software, but why is this necessary??? (And it was not trivial to get it to work.)2. The handling of pushpins (identifying spots on the map), favorite places, and the like, is extremely clumsy. (Although, contrary to another review, you don't to re-enter the information each time. You just save the file and reload it.)3. Directions are sometimes not so great. Why would you instruct someone to "turn left" if you don't know which direction they're pointing (e.g., when you're stationary in a parking lot)? Much better in such cases to say "head NE" or some such. Freeway exits (at least in So. California) were often not handled well. (One freeway entrance was identified as a "local road", which at the time proved quite confusing.)4. Why doesn't the software automatically recalculate directions to put you "on-route" once you're off-route? You can push F3, but why is this necessary?5. I never got the voice providing driving guidance to work. The online help was useless. I'm sure someone can jump in and tell me how to do it, but it should be trivial.6. In general, the software has the feel of a bunch of modules written independently and thrown together. I'm not a reflexive anti-microsoft bigot (I bought this software after all), but I find that much MS software is bad precisely because it feels like it's cobbled together without much attention given to integration. It's shiny on the surface but the shine vanishes once you really start to use it.Given this experience, I will probably give the Delorme software another try next time around.</review_text>
I've used MS Streets and Trips for years with minor problems.  This year I upgraded to a Windows Vista Laptop and wanted the latest software for it.  I have a GPS and I use a Pocket PC PDA so I need Pocket Streets.After I got home I read the fine print on the box.  It list support for no higher than the Windows XP OS.  But, so far the program is running fine on my Vista machine.The laptop has no serial COM ports and S&T 2007 won't detect a USB port. The description of S&T 2007 which includes a GPS indicates it uses a USB port but apparently it needs the included USB adaptor.  I could not locate where I could purchase such an adapter.S&T 2007 no longer ships with Pocket Streets.  Nor could I locate where I could download a copy.  I can (for now) use my old Pocket Streets program because 2007 does EXPORT Pocket Street maps.Finally, within two miles of my home the map list an airport and runway that was shut down in the early 90's.  The main highway a few blocks from me has only 3 exits in 2 miles yet S&T 2007 list over a dozen intersections which means when I get directions I always end up down a dead-end road.I've purchase many versions of Streets and Trips and this is the first time I felt I've wasted my money. Open software can't be returned from where I purchased it.  I guess I'll have to start researching other software packages.</review_text>
This might be the greatest mapping program in existance, but I would never know. Very user unfriendly. There is no instruction book provided with it (or available that I can find.) The help function is very poor and doesn't provide adequate instructions. If you just need basic mapping functions save your money and use one of the free online websites</review_text>
The benefits may be great, but the exercises are so boring that it is way too much effort to do them on a regular basis</review_text>
Comment made by the user after about 30 minutes. Begged me never to make him use it again</review_text>
I paid top dollar for PS7 and thought it was time to upgrade to CS2.  After I installed CS2 I discovered that I could not crop any photo without having my PC crash.  Every time it crashed I looked at the defrag utility and I had fragmented files all over the place.  Then I defraged the hard drive and went back to CS2 and tried to crop the same photo again.  Again, my PC hung up and was unresponsive and the defrag utility said I had to defrag.  The only thing I did was to crop one photo in CS2, and that was enough to make it necessary to defrag again.  I uninstalled this piece of garbage from my PC.  It does not work, and I don't care what Deke McClelland says and I don't believe what he says, either. Save your money.  These rip-off artists at Adobe are nothing but thieves.  Yeah, they ripped me off for $153 but you know what?  At least I have my integrity, and that's more than you got, Deke baby.</review_text>
The new  look is very nice.BUT, when you install, you have also to keep the previous version (in well behaved software, automatically the previous version is cleaned... not here).The system of validation of License through Internet for the physical machine is fine, I just hope that I will not have a disk crash and then waste time to be authorised to re-install a product that I rightfully paid (and at such a price).Well, make sure you:- do not try to de-install 5,5 after the install of CS2 (or bye-bye the license)- have a clean and robust backup of your installation....I am not sure I will make the next upgrade....</review_text>
I should have ordered thru Amazon to avoid the confusion, since they state the vercsion needed, but where I ordered from did not mention the 5.5 version requirement, and on the box cover, THERE IS NO STIPULATION ABOUT THIS, only a generic statement that a previous version is required. How hard would it be for them to print on the box what versions will and will not work??????Adobe Customer Service would not budge, so I am returning the product. Of course, Christmas is ruined for the person I bought this for, and I am out shipping and handling charges. Thank you Adobe. Obviously, I can't recommend anyone buy from Adobe at this point. It's easy to see why warez are popular when companies are this foolish</review_text>
Although it says that this works for ALL versions of Photoshop it does not upgrade from Photoshop Elements.  I spoke with customer service and they would not give me the code to unlock it</review_text>
I purchased Turbo Tax after reading the reviews here...someone had mentioned a glitch, but someone else mentioned a work around.Bottom line, if you can sit down with all your records and do the whole turbo tax from start to finish in one swoop,  you're fine.But if you need to start and stop while completing the schedule 2 business aspects of your tax return, get ready for a huge problem...it doesn't let you back in!  I went to their website where they had both a work around, and a report that if you update your turbo tax (very easy) the glitch will be fixed.  Not so, it did nothing for me.  Then I tried the workarounds...I got back in once but the next time I tried to use the work around a few days later, it did not work.I ended up having to call an accountant 1 week before the 17th and thank goodness I was able to get an appointment.Also, if you have a business and don't understand some of the tax workings, like depreciation, it is very difficult to translate your former accountant's previous year's work into the new turbotax. It's not set up that way, so you need to know what you're doing.  I have a college degree and a lot of stick-to-it-ness, but I could not figure out and be sure that I was entering things correctly.  And then, it didn't matter anyway, as I couldn't get in to change anything in the end.Finally, make sure you save, save, save as you go!  While doing my turbo tax and having spent a couple of hours already, I logged into their website to get some support.  When I "X"ed out of the internet page, it closed my turbotax screen that I'd opened on my computer.  Guess what?  It was all lost and I had to start from the beginning.  That was before I was even impacted by the "glitch" later.  This program does not remind you to save when you close, or ask you if you want to save, so be sure and save all the time!So, good luck to anyone who tries this.  For me, it was a huge disappointment and I am returning it to Amazon for a refund due to the glitch.  I honestly don't know how they can sell something with such an obvious problem.</review_text>
Turbotax is okay if you only have a 1040A to file, but anything beyond that it quickly becomes a real pain in the nether region.  Not only that, but if you have complications with trying to file, good luck.It looks as though I will have to pay to have my estate taxes filed.  Ttax is worthless</review_text>
Everything the negative reviewers say is true and MORE. Please note the following as well:1. If you are a college student taking a class online that uses Blackboard software, Vista will prevent you from posting to the class discussion board and answering any fill-in-the-blank or discussion questions on TESTS! To fix this download the FoxFire browser (free) and use it to access your course. Because Vista uses so much memory and is already so huge, they had to drop quite a few little programs that software needs to access in the Operating system.2. HUGE MEMORY AND HARD DRIVE DRAIN.Look at this comparisonWindows XP Professional    Size on drive 1.5 gig    Memory requirements 128 MBWindows Vista    Needs 15 GIG To Load. Does not say how large the program is but I wouldn't think its small!!! Memory requirements 1 GIG!If you check the DELL website you will see that they recommend that you have 2 gig of memory to use Windows Vista. That is a few $$$ worth of memory just to run the operating system while openning a program. Try running a game or doing animation with that kind of a sink hole in your system! The less memory you have available, the slower everything, including websites will load (no matter how fast your internet connection)What is worse is that to fix what is wrong with it (ie replace all those small programs your software expects to find in the operating system), they will have to ADD patches that can only make it bigger and hungrier for memory!This is the most pathetic excuse for an upgrade that I have ever seen. I would expect some lawsuits before this is over! DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT</review_text>
I wanted a new computer, so a couple months ago I ordered an HP computer that happened to have Vista on it.  I thought, "oh great, I'll get the newest OS as well"... major mistake.1. Didn't work with my perhipherals, including my scanner and an HP PRINTER.  For god's sake, the COMPUTER'S AN HP, why won't it work with an HP printer!?  If they knew the drivers for perhipherals weren't ready, why the did they release the OS and force us to buy it?2. Annoying security feautres, constantly asking permissions to install software.  Just like the Apple ads-- a total joke.3. After struggling with the damn thing for 2 days, I decided to try to install old trusty xp on it... $200 later, guess what?  You CANT INSTALL an earlier operating system!  Booting from the CD doesn't work either, you get the blue screen of death.  Maybe some tech geek can do it, but I'm done wasting time with this thing.4. All that agony, for what?  The "fancy" interface?  Who cares what it looks like, I just want to use my damn scanner!  I'm sure all those slick effects suck up RAM and resources, for what functional purpose?  Just to look more like mac?5. ... Speaking of which, I am now switching to.  Goodbye windows, after 15 years of struggling with your crappy software, I'm done</review_text>
My computer was running fine until I tried to upgrade.  First it took almost 2 hours to install at the last 3% it found a error and was going to roll back.  Well it never did.  It erased everything.  It went to a dos prompt. Called help line and it took 3 hours to just reload.  When it was done, I had no files or any of my programs on the hard drive.  Not only that but he said I had to install again to register.  It takes forever to install.  Took forever to get in touch with someone, they were in Nova Scotia, and I still do not have a working computer.  I have to try and get a recover program to get my files back.  I recommend staying away from this product for upgrades.</review_text>
You can bet those people gaving Vista a good rating here, work for the company.  It's a piece of JUNK.  If you have a good working XP, or anything else, please don't buy Vista.  I bought it a month ago already installed on a good HP computer.  I've worked on it from sun-up to sun-down for a month and still, all I've got is a pile of junk.  And, it's so slow, that you have to take a coffee break while it's gathering up a program to run.  Don't buy their One-Care either.  I've owned Windows since "98".  I'm considering re-installing my old HP/XP.  It's still here in the closet</review_text>
This was horrible, I installed this and within a 24 hour period, I was slammed with pop-ups and SPAM....And good luck trying to remove it.  Very dissatisfied customer</review_text>
I just bought this yesterday, and though the product description here on Amazon says it's compatible with Windows 98 and Windows ME, the packaging says "TaxCut USB Drive is compatible with Windows 2000 and Windows XP."  All our taxes for several years have been done on a Windows ME computer with a USB port.  Now what?  HELP!</review_text>
I always thought the laborious interviews in turbotax were pretty ridiculous, now I've seen the opposite. Taxcut online seems totally not thorough, such as just asking for total of certain things, and not asking if special circumstances apply, which you don't miss at all until you have one of them. I had almost completely finished my taxes and got to the business use of home. I moved half way through the year. I couldn't find where to add an additional home office listing. "Nope, can't do it" said support after an hour long chat session of mostly waiting, "you'll have to use another product." So today I start from scratch and pay the $99 ransom that turbotax is charging small business owners. I encourage the competition to get their shizzle together next year.s:</review_text>
The system requirements for this product on their packaging says nothing about Mac support and requires Windows.  H&R Block didn't support Mac's last year and they've only given half-hearted support this year.  If you own a Mac then TurboTax is your best bet.</review_text>
Unlike years past, H&R Block (founded by a guy named Bloch) decided to charge $16 for each e-file, Federal or state.  Only one version, "Premium Federal+State+E-file" includes a "free" Federal e-file and state e-file; but that version costs $70, so there's no free lunch at all.  Seriously, $16 is a lot to pay for e-filing.  There are websites that give you completely free e-filing; my favorite is TaxAct (at taxactonline dot com).  With TaxAct, you get the complete Federal plus state package for $7.95, which includes e-filing.  Or you can use their standard package to prepare Federal and e-file for free, with *NO* income restriction!I don't work for any of these companies, nor any tax-related company, nor any such entity.  I just don't think it's right for H&R Block to charge customers such a ridiculously high fee for e-filing, whereas people can e-file for free elsewhere.  BTW, if you use Taxcut to prepare your return, you'll have to use H&R Block's e-filing service if you want to e-file; you can't just take your file to another website and expect that website to do it for you.  I used TaxAct in the past and they are very dependable.  You can find reviews of TaxAct products in major magazines and on major websites.Good luck</review_text>
I worked hard on a VCD project for work using Photo Explosion. I didn't think it was that easy to use, but it was okay until I got ready to burn.  Got a little error message that said something along the lines of "You don't have Nero burners!" No kidding, but there are four other burn programs on my computer. Nothing but Nero would do.  NOWHERE on the box are you informed of this.  It says, and I quote, "Burn CD slideshows you can watch on tv!" Needing more software is never mentioned. As far as I'm concerned, this product makes fraudulent claims.  I will never buy another one of their products</review_text>
Very limited photo touch up. When it comes time to burn you might as well have customer service on the phone. Pretty much a total piece of crap!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
This is the worst company I have ever dealt with. They offer 30 day trial on this product, I wasn't happy and mailed it back to them in 5 days of purchase and I'm still waiting for the refund. I have called them 3 times, it has been almost 4 months now without a refund. I would never buy a Nova product from this company again and I would recomend everyone going somewhere else to get good customer service</review_text>
This software messed up my computer big time.  It does something first of all, to Microsoft word.  Word does not work properly after installation of Photo Explosion.  It then went into different areas of my computer and screwed it up.  At first I only suspected it to be Photo Explosion.  I had to have my computer sent back to HP.  When I got it back I reinstalled Photo Explosion and the same thing happenend.  BE CAREFUL.  Product has BIG PROBLEMS - WHICH WILL GIVE YOU BIGGER PROBLEMS - I GUARANTEE IT.</review_text>
The editing portion of the software is completly separate from the CD portion of the software and does not store in the same file. CD's can hold upto approx 500 photos but the softwware will not accept more and allow you to discard down to burn 500. I was told by Nova Development that the merging of photo shows was not being supported by the company since the CD writer was a free add on to the program. The box and program info did not indicate that. I offered to purchase the full program but it is not available anywhere</review_text>
Lacks transitions between slides of digital pictures. Makes the slideshow somewhat flat. One good thing - can put music and also is quite fast in creating a VC</review_text>
Once again, Microsoft has proven they can churn out some new schlock overnight, filled with bugs, with limited usefulness. The greeting card section was the most amusing to me- it prints out great looking cards with upside down text beginning at the bottom of the inside of the card. In short, the cards section is buggy and you can sink hours trying to maneuver around it and look for solutions online. I make pc cards all the time and I can say this program sucks. The help section answers nothing, but MS will gadly charge you $35 per question for support. Some huge sections of MS Works is just made up of links to internet sites that one can find easily by using any search engine; I call this fatuous redundancy. The loading for some parts, like the calendar, is slow even on a very powerful computer. This is one of the most useless and shoddy programs I have ever used in my ENTIRE life. It is a waste of space on my pc and will be used rarely if at all. It's hilarious they are charging around $50 for it. This is a $9.99 bargain bin kinda thing. Don't buy it. My pc came with it and that's the ONLY reason it's there.</review_text>
Having just paid [...] for this product, I expected the word processing component to have at least the basics.  Wrong. To me, the ability to easily format a business or legal document with "page x of y" at the bottom of the page seems pretty fundamental. Well, Works 8.5---unlike other Microsoft word processor versions or programs---does not provide that choice. Without this basic a "feature", you might as well simply use Wordpad.I cannot comment on other abilities this program has or doesn't have, or, on the spreadsheet or database modules, because I simply don't want to spend any more time on this.Recommendation:  Go to OpenOffice.org and get Open Office for FREE</review_text>
TaxCut is easy to use but the explanations are not complete, nor written in a way that is easy for laypersons to understand.  Many terms of art are not defined at all.Most disturbingly, when you first sign up for the product the price is listed at $54.95 for both state and federal filing,  but after you have already done all the work and are ready to file, the only options listed at checkout time are $29.95 for federal and another $29.95 charge for the state filing.This bait-and-switch is apparently widespread and common for H&R Block, unfortunately.  I called and complained to customer service and they refunded me $5.  I told them that I thought it was certainly unethical and probably illegal, and they were inviting a lawsuit with this deceptive practice.Finally, the program crashed several times while I was using it.   Although the data was always saved, it was quite obnoxious.  I run a high-performance, well-maintained Mac PowerBook, so I'm not accustomed to having things run so poorly.next year I'll go with TurboTax.</review_text>
I have used Taxcut and TurboTax on and off for years.  TurboTax tends to have less problems.  This year Taxcut was incredibly difficult.  First it would not properly import the data from DeductionPro.  Then the tier one tech support gave me outright incorrect information.  Finally tier two support gave me the link to the custom patch that allowed me to import the data.  Also,  when I received the Taxcut email that the IRS had accepted my return I logged on to Taxcut to check status and get my declaration control number.  Taxcut would not recognize that I had efiled and would not check for the dcn.  I had to call support for about the 5th time and after some time on the phone they discovered they could access the dcn and gave it to me over the phone.  Because of these delays I have still not finished with the state return.  I don't know if I will buy this product again.</review_text>
One thing you will find reading through many reviews is a dissatisfaction with the state filings. This is my own experience and this may be the last year I use TaxCut because of it. First of all, it would not allow me to e-file my state return but didn't explain why. I later discovered that for most states you apparently can't e-file a partial year return. Then when printing out the state return it told me I had to also include a form that was mentioned nowhere else in the program. I later found out that Taxcut does not support all state tax forms! I then had to get that form and fill it in manually, and then discovered I owed less than before because Taxcut had incorrectly calculated my capital gains. AND there was nothing on the missing state form that could not have been completed with data the program already had.TaxCut also advised me I could save $1000 off my fed bill by contributing to an IRA. So I opened and IRA and contributed $4000. When I went back to TaxCut and entered the details it told me I wasn't eligible for any tax deduction. I was ready to be tied up! This software is seriously dysfunctional.I'm guessing by this stage you get the idea. Bottom line: I will be looking elsewhere to complete my tax returns next year.Oh, by the way, if like me you were unable to efile and you paid for the efile option, you can get a credit from H&R by calling 1-888-4TAXCUT option 2,2,0</review_text>
I am by no means a computer idiot, I audit computer systems security for a living. I have had to contact customer support (webchat) at least 3-4 times during the first 30 days of installing the software. The install was on a brand new system (Windows XP Pro), with all of the Microsoft patches and service packs and little to nothing else installed.First Pest Patrol would crash numerous times a day until technical support walked me through a complex workaround to prevent an Active Protection error window appearing over 100 times every 10 minutes (which you had to click to clear each one). Second, the firewall would tell me I was not authorized to visit certain webpages until technical support walked me through a complex process of deleting certain files created by the firewall and resetting the firewall after a process involving safe mode. Third, Pest Patrol never would run a thorough scan. I'd receive two separate errors that either said a fatal error occurred with the Pest Patrol GUI, or that system resources was not available. I contacted the customer support and they told me that yes, sometimes Pest Patrol doesn't work at all unless you use MSCONFIG to disable all startup services (systems.ini, etc) reboot, run Pest Patrol, then use MSCONFIG to enable the startup services. It was a canned reply during a live web session, which means that the operators were probably used to giving since it likely occurs to many people.I haven't tried out the third solution yet because I wanted to remind myself to write an Amazon review.If you are looking for simplicity, or don't know much about computers, look elsewhere. Otherwise you will be in for one major headache trying to implement several technically involved workarounds. I'll give it two stars, since it didn't cause my dog to choke, explode my house, or cause irreparable damage to clothing (which is my one-star).</review_text>
After installing this software in to My PC. Some functions of my keyboard stopped working. Even some multimedia buttons disappeared. After that I had to concatct HP to download drivers again.Even after installing the drivers, it did not start working as beore till I uninstalled this third rate software from my PC. After uninstalling every thing got fine. I will not recommand this soft ware to any one</review_text>
The program crashed during Setup. When I finally got it installed, it crashed my machine every night until I uninstalled it.</review_text>
Found the registration number difficult to read. Had to have customer service tell me that they run into this all the time! The I's look like 1's. Tried it again! I got it to load. My computer slowed down significantly! Certain sites I could not access anymore without re-configuring the software. I have used Norton. MCaffee or whatever, and other suite type security software. This one was the worst. I would not recommend it. I got a well deserved refund</review_text>
I was lured to this product by a rebate which made it free. The manufacturer Computer Associates burned me for the rebate and will likely do it to you too. As for how it works no trouble installing like others have mentioned but it slows my computer to a crawl. After a while you will shut it down and then you can resume surfing the net at normal speed</review_text>
I purchased this program for my personal and home business tax return but it did not include all the forms needed so I had to buy another version from them. H&R TaxCut included all I needed and was 1/2 the price</review_text>
This was the most user unfriendly Turbotax I have ever used.  The Schedule C imported misinformation, had to keep forcing in the correct info. And I just found out my State taxes were received showing I owed a completely different amount than what I had electronically filed.  I have used this program for years, but after this, NEVER AGAIN!!! Let this be a warning to others</review_text>
I used TurboTax Premier last year & was so happy with it that I told everyone to buy it this year.  What a fool I was.  This years program was a nightmare.  I will never purchase it again.  Every time I needed to go back to check something, I had to go backwards through each page until I reached the page I wanted.  Then to go forward to where you originally were, you had to retrace all your steps a second or third or fourth time.  It got to the point I quit going back to check.  It took hours this year and I am still not confident the results were correct.  I may take it to H&R Block just to see if I need to file an amend.  Next year I will try a different product.  ---One other thing, navigating the State portion was so difficult.  There were hidden pages in something called "quick zoom" or some such thing.  I could never figure out where I was.  Thanks for the headache Turbotax</review_text>
I had the exact same experience as another reviewer. ....loved it for years...changed formats...no confidence. At the last minute I had to use an accountant. The accountant cost me $650.00. $50 more than what I was over paying in taxes using this software. A disaster. It doesn't look like it was importing data correctly, state navigation really was painful. I buy this software to try different senerios (Joint or single)...but this year it wouldn't do that. Probably because they worry too much about getting paid for every user and not enough to assist people who bought the software.To my mind the software is crippled</review_text>
I have used Turbo Tax for at least past eight years and always have been very pleased with it. This year however some "genius" decided to change the entire format and approach and I found this year's version to be terrible. Very confusing now when used to be clear and simple. Hard to even download, confusing up dates, difficult to find numerous frequently used items (estimated taxes paid in previous year, capital gains/losses, state taxes paid, and more). The running total of taxes owed in upper left hand corner came out different from final taxes supposedly owed.I have zero confidence in this year's program doing my taxes correctly so will have to have an accountant do return for first time in many years. Have recommended Turbo Tax to many over the years, but would strongly recommend against buying this year's product. A perfect example of how to take something good and make it lousy by messing with it. Suggest you save your money and either go to an accountant or use another firms software, this one stinks</review_text>
I bought this product based on independent reviews by consumer and PC magazines.  The product's performance was OK, but customer service was a headache.  The serial number on the CD that was shipped to me came up as "invalid" when I tried to install the software.  I had to call customer service, who gave me two more serial numbers before the software would accept one as valid.  Now, one year later I want to upgrade my software to the current version (to save $$ over a new purchase) and guess what?  My serial number is invalid and in order to upgrade via the Trend site I will have to pay more than what Amazon would charge me for a brand new CD.  I will most likely switch to ZoneAlarm because of the hassles involved in registering and upgrading this product</review_text>
If I could give less than 1 star for any Trend Micro product I would. It gives too many false positives when you don't even have a virus. You are going nuts trying to find where the virus is and there is not even one there as Trend told you there was. Avoid this like the plague and save your hard earned money. It's a piece of crap.</review_text>
My subscription is expiring in a few days and this suite is impossible to renew.  They are trying to force you into 2006 security suite for the big bucks and buggy software.  2005 works fine until I have been thru the runaround 3 times with e-mail customer support.  I won't pay for their telephone customer support, trend micro will force me to buy another brand because of this.  Shame on you pcillin</review_text>
When I click the "update components", I'm continually told that "the feature is still initializing, please try again later". This will happen even if I've had the program open for hours. I've contacted trend micro, followed their instructions for a workaround, but that still didn't help</review_text>
So far we have been unable to use this product in the way we want to use it.  We contacted tech support, but after one call, we will be charged $19.95 for each call.  I have been disappointed in the product and the company</review_text>
Very awesome program for adults and chidren,lots of information on the kids encarta.My son is in first grade and he needed to find some information on money from around the world he did it all himself</review_text>
I'd be happy to write a review if I could ever get a working copy of this program. Three different computers and not one would the disc install on</review_text>
This software only got one star because I couldnt give it a zero.  It never worked on my Windows XP computer.  I couldnt open the program, couldnt close it, couldnt get the sytem to shut down.  After a hard shutdown, Windows would not start.  Tech support couldnt figure out the problem.  I uninstalled Panda, reinstalled Norton and system is working fine.  I would not recommend</review_text>
I bought this 1 week ago at a local Staples.. The box makes it sound like the solution to all your problems.. It also says they offer tech support 24 X 365..Sounds great.... the problem is..it will not install on my computer. I keep getting a message to remove NORTON ANITVIRUS before I can install Panda. I removed NORTON and it no longer can be found thru control panel, remove software or thru a search of my hard drive.PANDA still will not install. I keep getting the same message. UNINSTALL NORTON.So I tried to contact tech support per the box. I found out they offer tech support 24 x 365 via email. I have sent 3 emails in a week and have received no response.Bottom line is I have a product I cannot use.. TECH SUPPORT does not exist. It deserves 0 stars in my book. Spend your money somewhere else</review_text>
As a teacher I use Word, PowerPoint, and Publisher when working with students AND engaging in professional activities (presentations to organizations, etc.)  I have been using Office 2002, and thought I should upgrade.  BIG mistake.  The ribbons of icons are frustrating to scroll through, especially since I previously just customized the toolbar so everything I needed was immediately available.  I'm still trying to figure out how to type in Chinese, although the Spanish and German are working fine.  Additionally, they've come up with a truly ugly color scheme for their ribbons/icons/etc.  As a previous commenter noted, making changes to the basic template creates extreme problems, and I also was unable to get the darn number bullets to renumber.  It took me almost twice as long to write a test as usual, and I ended up doing manually what used to be done quite easily using the toolbar.The designs in Publisher are now very difficult to see and differentiate.  In previous versions, you could see the stark differences between different designs.  In the current options pages, everything is so soft, both in line and color, as well as being so small, that it's hard to tell what you're looking at.But the truly big disappointment is PowerPoint.  Their new selection of slide designs has all the appeal of rotting road kill--I would be embarrassed to give a presentation to a professional group using what is available in 2007.I have reinstalled my 2002 programs.  I feel like I just wasted all the money I spent on this suite.  My suggestion?  If you absolutely have to have a PC because you do a lot of word processing, stick with Word 2002 or 2003.  If you need to do presentations/brochures/etc. for your business, get a Mac and avoid this problem altogether</review_text>
They changed everything!  In an effort to make it more user friendly, they've rearranged most of the controls.  Menus are replaced by headings.  It is difficult to accomplish what were easy changes before.  Some of this will likely improve with use.WORD 2007 is constantly trying to think for you, auto formatting as you type.  However, it often isn't thinking what you are, and making it obey your commands is frustrated by the new headings.  Particularly frustrating, when I "right-click" on a list to restart numbering at "A" (ie. after roman numeral II on an outline), WORD 2007 flatly refuses.  My research paper is now formated:I.   HeadingA. subpointB. subpointC. subpoinII.  HeadingD. subpointE. subpointF. subpointIII.  HeadingG. subpoint etc....etc...This is ridiculous and inexcusable!  I also had to individually superscript 130+ footnotes.  Somehow, in changing the font from the Widows default "Calibri" back to "Time New Roman," the footnote setting was altered and I have yet to determine how to restore it.  However, if I open a new document it is fine, but I really don't want to retype a 30+ page research paper.POWERPOINT 2007 works well enough, compared to the older version.  They have added a few bell and whistles, but nothing that gets in the way.If you have to buy a new computer you're likely stuck with the new MS Office 2007.  But don't buy it until you have to.  It is NOT an upgrade from the previous two versions</review_text>
This is the worst thing since the Office Assistant animated paper clip.  Forcing the "ribbon" on the user assumes that the user likes icons (I don't -- what's wrong with words??), and fills too much of the screen real estate.  Nothing is where it should be.  And what arrogance on the part of Microsoft to provide no alternate views, no "classic" view, just these piles and piles of inscrutable icons.  Another oppressive, giant waste of my time and money at the hands of Microsoft.</review_text>
I bought the software some months ago.  Noticed some problems with my PC in subsequent weeks. Didn't put 2 and 2 together.  Last week however, I'd come home - no icons on screen - no ability to Ctrl-Alt_Del - each day this would happen. The machine had to be powered on and off to reboot. Pulled recent software off machine. Yes - you've guessed - without Spy Sweeper I have no problems. OK - it might be a conflict with other software - a quick Google confirmed my suspicions that others have problems. I was never impressed that it was picking up anything of substance either - but then maybe my machine is clean</review_text>
I made the mistake of buying a two-year subscription.  Every upgrade slows the product down.  A scan that used to take 14 minutes now takes over one hour. Stay away from this junk--there are much better free products available</review_text>
I've been using SpySweeper for 2 years now.  It generally does what it is supposed to do.  However, it was nearing time for me to renew.  SpySweeper becomes a huge, irritating nag when it comes time to renew.  Not only does the software bug you all the time, but Webroot sends out reminder e-mails too.  With 3 weeks left on my subscription, I decided to renew, mostly just to get rid of all the nagging.  Well, guess what? - the renewal process reset my expiration date.  Rather than giving me 3 weeks plus 1 year, the renewal starts immediately, and ends in exactly 1 year - which means, that I've been ripped off for 3 weeks of paid subscription.  Maybe Webroot thinks their users are too stupid to notice this deceptive practice of moving up renewal dates.  I've complained to them - and if they don't make amends, then I cannot recommend this product to anyone</review_text>
I work at Best Buy and we install this piece of garbage all the time.  For one its a huge system hog and two it doesn't catch much of the pesky spyware.  Also when computers come in to be cleaned up, no one uses this program (even though we're "supposed" to recommend it).  I would recommend xoft, pest patrol, or MS Antispyware much much more.</review_text>
I feel duped! I bought Spy Sweeper at the computer store a year ago. It was the 2.6 version. At first everything was great. I got my definitions, it found traces, it detected spy cookies. When I ran the definition update, I had no problem with the firewall. Every time they said upgrade, I did. Then I started getting renew e-mail. I had months to go and they sent me renewal e-mails sometimes two or three a week and I ignored them, not only because I knew the year wasn't up, but I also was suspicious that it was just another spammer out to get my credit card information. I e-mailed them asking if their renew mails were really from them, voicing my concerns. I got ignored, to when I eventually got to speak to someone, they didn't even know what their renewal e-mail looked like! The problems began when I updated the latest version which is the 4.5. When I would try to update my definitions I'd get a warning that there's was a problem and contact webroot, while it had no problem noting that I had the latest version updates. No settings were changed, not even my firewall which was blamed by them. I think it's them not me since now it's suddenly happening. They refuse to address it. Then I checked their site about my subscritpion. I knew I had one because I bought it at the store, my subscription doesn't expire until June and if I was invalid I doubt I could upgrade to newer versions. What did their page say? No subscription! When I wrote I never got a straight answer about it. Then I was told that the program was corrupted, download a new copy of the latest version from their site. I did. What did I get? Boxes that said subscription not activated. They knew I had one and they won't change it on their site or give me explanations. After pestering does my latest version now say when I expire. I've asked why it goes online to scan when it doesn't need to and I get ignored. So I decided to call but wasn't sure how because I'm in a different time zone. It took several days for them to get back to me by e-mail saying that their Mountain Time is treated like my Eastern time to get a hold of someone. The first person I spoke to after four tries at 15-20 rings each, was nasty, especially when I told him to slow down because he mumbled. I downloaded what he told me to do, he said nothing about the firewall issue despite him telling me he read my tickets about it.The second person sounded like he'd smoked one too many joints after he decided to answer the phone after 15 rings. He didn't know how to answer any of my firewall questions or why their page kept saying I had no subscription when the program in it's latest version finally admitted I'm current after pestering.  They don't give you straight e-mail answers. They don't answer their phones hoping that after the 15th ring you'll give up. It won't scan everything even when no other programs are running. In the new version it found a spy cookie, it kept repeating the same one over and over despite my checking it as "always remove".Never did that with the previous versions. I don't like a company who answers questions selectively. I don't like a company who makes you wait 20 rings. I don't like a company who blames your computer settings when they never affected the previous versions. Webroot's Spy Sweeper will be replaced in my desperate search to find a spyware program that actually works, and whose staff answers my questions and not mislead me about my subscription status</review_text>
I have owned Spysweeper for several years. I have found that a large amount of spyware is not getting caught.  In many cases, a  **portion** of the spyware was caught, Spy Sweeper did not remove the complete spywhere and I kept getting hits.  Tried out XoftSpy software and it found and removed ALL of the spyware.Even more, I get constant e-mails from Webroot telling me that my "Subscription needs to be renewed."  and that I must send in another $25 to renew.  I got caught in their scam once until I started checking my subsciption date.  They frequently send out banket e-mails telling people their subscriptions are up even though they may have as much as a year left.  I have contacted them several times on this issue with no response or correction.I am only keeping this software installed because I paid out the bucks for it.  I would not recommend it to others mainly because of the decptive business practices and the inability to perform as advertized.  Look elswhere</review_text>
This is a good product but...Unfortunately webrrot feels no need to stand by its current marketing claims of:Free Software UpdatesSpy Sweeper is continuously updated to provide you with the most advanced and effective spyware protection. As a Spy Sweeper customer, you receive these updates to our software absolutely FREE.This is simply not the case they have now instituted an anual subscription update fee like the big boys. When I addressed this with them on the phone they suggested I take it up with the vendor "Fry's Electronics" they should have warned you.Our issues are concern over the future marketing claims made by this manufacturer. They will also say you should have read the small print... We guess their interpritation of free and the rest of the world's is a little different. Who knows what they will decide in the future.We are seriously disappointed in webroot</review_text>
The bottom line of what makes a company viable is great customer service after the sale when things don't go as planned. Customer Service exists but their reps claim they can't do anything about your problem. Their manners are less than acceptable. Rude seems to be the "in-thing" at this company. As consumers, we have options; one of which is to ge elsewhere. I am writing them off as a lost cause and taking my monetary loss as a lesson learned. It's too bad</review_text>
I ordered ZoneAlarm Internet Security Suite 2006 after a PC magazine review,   I have a 3 month old HP Media Center PC.   Th software totaly locked up my machine on install twice.   Each ocasion requireing me to reboot in safe mode and to use the restore function to even use my computer.   I lost 6 - 8 hours of work befoe I decided to return it.   I did receive my refund 8 to 10 weeks after returning the product.    I am now using Norton Internet Security with no problems.  I transfered it from an older abandoned PC.I mave been a PC user since 82 and am fairly knowledge about hardware and software.   This is one of the few programs I could not instal.   I have used the free Zone Alarm Firewall without problems.ew</review_text>
Don't buy Zone Alarm if you use AOL; they are not compatable.  The pop-ups will drive you crazy and AOL won't work properly.  Also plan on your computer running much slower when this software is installed.  I bought it from Amazon and had to throw it away in a month...  no refund; money lost.  Norton is far better with AOL</review_text>
THIS SCREENSAVER IS TERRIBLE. IT PAUSES AND JERKS AROUND. VERY ANNOYING. I EMAILED THE COMPANY AND NEVER HEARD FROM THEM. I DONT USE IT AND I DONT RECOMMEND IT TO ANYBODY. THANK YO</review_text>
I had two new fully operational G5 computers with Panther operating system already factory installed.  I was contacted by Apple that a new Operating system was available, faster, yada yada yada.I took the two computers into the store and purchased the new operating system Tiger.The software proceeded to completely destroy both hard drives on both computers.I returned them and told them I wanted my mony back. They refused since the software was oipened but agreed to replace the corrupted software and install it for free.The computers never worked right since.We were forced to continue working with these crippled computers as we have deadlines to meet.  It was a nightmareas it took four times the normal time to do the work because of crashes etc.  We were already out a week with down time due to their negligence.When the smoke cleared we took them back in and asked them to take the operating system Tiger out and replace the computers with the original operating system.  Another four hours standing in line.We got them back to the office and low and behold they still did not work. We took them back again and were told by a snotty tech that we had dust in the computer as if that's what the cause has been all along. He told us never to come in with dust in the computer again even though the dust was in areas that we are not allowed into without breaking the warranty.If this were the case why hasn't it been a problem for the past 12 years? and what am I supposed to do? only use the computer in an operating room?  The dust he displayed was extremely minimal the computer was only six months old and if it were such a problem why didn't the other four techs working on the computers notice it and clean it the first four times they had it on their bench?Bottom line.. I'm tired of buying new programs and computers that don't work. Tired of standing in line for hours. Tired of companies not having a complaint line. How handy is that? No wonder they keep saying your the first one that's had a problem with this.  That's literally impossible since I work in the entertainment indusrty that deals with editing and service bureaus that operate 100s of computers.  They all are avoiding Tiger because of known problems as well.  Apple is not addressing this and hundreds if not thousands of businesses are losing valuble production time due to their negligence. Instead of trying to develope a way for my daughter to dock her I-pod to a bowling ball, they should concentrate on making operating systems work in their computers.Total time lost in our company is at least a week which is in dollars around 20,000.00. I can't imagine how much is being lost nation wide. Something needs to be done about this.  They need to be held accountable for the destruction they cause by distributing faulty product.To add salt to the wound they keep coming up with all these stupid ideas on why the computers are not running right after they destroyed them initially. There comes a time that if they can't fix them, they need to replace them and stop wasting the consumers time and costing them money.  We need a lemon law that applies to computers.  Then the manufacturers will make sure they function before they are sold. I know I can't get the money my business had lost back but I want them held accoutable for distribution of a faulty op and replace the computers they can't fix instead of sending me back to the office with inoperable computers</review_text>
I've been using Apple's Macintosh systems since 1984 and have seen some great improvements in system stability, which I consider THE most important aspect of an OS.First off Tiger is a smooth running system (when it is smoothly running), and has some of the nicest bells and whistles around. The best dog-and-pony show around. That being said, WATCH OUT!This OS is capable of completely hosing your user settings, all your software registrations, bookmarks, email settings, etc. The whole enchilada. ANY OS that can do that at the drop of a dime isn't worth the time. Since I use Disk Warrior, Cocktail and Disk Utility regularly, this should never have happened. I waited until the OS was at the 10.4.3 stage before upgrading from 10.3.9 -- apparently it is not yet ready -- best to wait another year before upgrading. Hopefully these bugs will be fixed</review_text>
It seems that all previous Quickbook versions will not run on Windows Vista and I had upgraded my system. So, I bought Simple Start as the least expensive way to get a Quickbook product to run on Vista. Turns out Simple start runs fine on Vista BUT you cannot load a company file from earlier versions. Thus, Simple Start was simply useless to me. When I called Intuit customer service they said that for another $100 they'd give me a license number that would unlock that feature. By that time I was committed and had no choice. Talk about getting ripped off!!</review_text>
I read the review saying Simple Start didn't have enough features and would lead to upgrading to get a usable version. Despite the warning, I thought I could get away with Simple Start because I was buying the program for bookkeeping at a tiny church and would be putting few demands on the program. Even for my simple needs, it was a bust I had to upgrade to Pro for an additional $100. If Quicken isn't enough for your needs, get Pro.</review_text>
If you are buying this product because it is the cheapest one Intuit offers, excpect to get what you pay for.  If your needs are really so simple that this product will work for you then you would be just as well off using a spreadsheet, or downloading the free version from Microsoft, or even using their home version with business added.  By the time you figure out that you need better capabilities it will be too late to return it.Bottom line, if you want a good Quickbooks bump up to the Pro version, so you can get real Customer and Vendor management, and a decent overview summary, and multiple category levels</review_text>
Great Product but shame on Amazon for selling it without telling people that it is old software.  Kudos to Acronis for giving me a free upgrade to 10.Acronis 10 is absolutely wonderful</review_text>
This item has not been received in 25 days! No help from vendo</review_text>
I have spent the better part of 4 months dealing with these guys. They won't talk to you on the phone, don't let you get support until you register your product with a serial #, which, if you lose and need to re-install, you can't get without a login and a serial #. That makes no sense.I've had technical problems with True Image Home 9 and 10, and just can't get them to resolve it. Very unhappy with these guys. The product looks good, but if you have a glitch, prepare to wait A WEEK OR MORE for tech support to respond by email. Check out their web site and try some numbers - you'll find there's no way to talk to ANYONE unless you want to buy something.This is not one experience with them. It's Feb 07 now, and this charade began last August! Buyer beware</review_text>
This is NOT the most recent version for this software.  Do an online search, check the manufacturer's web site and you'll find it cheaper for the latest version</review_text>
If one is looking for an educational program to help a child learn there are much better programs on the market than Mia.Unfortunately we bought this as a package of Mia and all suffer from the same issues. First, it takes 2 CDs and a game cannot be completed without switching to the 2d CD. That compounds the problem that Mia cannot be loaded on the hard drive so the game cannot be played unless the CD is loaded. Having programs that require the loading of CDs to play them is a pain in the neck because children do not handle CDs properly and an adult must change the CDs. Most programs have only one CD but this one requires two.Mia programs are more like video games than educational software. They are comparable to video games like Spiderman and Sponge Bob which are puzzles to be solved. That is the problem with the Mia programs. The child spends an inordinate amount of time manuevering between the educational activities so that most of the time is spent manuevering and little time is spent on education. And it can be frustrating for the child, even a child that is very adept at video games. Yet because Mia is more of a video game than an educational resource, children who are video game geeks like Mia.Mia's science is better than Mia's Math and Reading because at least a written scenario is provided which helps out. But like all the Mia programs, the program hangs at times so that the child cannot complete the game. Worse yet because the program is always active, the hibernation and suspend operations on the computer do not function so the program must be shut down should the child leave the computer.Another problem that all the Mia programs suffer from is that the video only occupies a small part of the monitor screen so that the effects are dimished. Other educational software fill the full screen although to Mia's credit, when the user exits the program it restores the screen to its original resolution, something not all educational softwere does.The Mia programs do have humor in them which is enertaining to children and what educational material there is, is somewhat useful.The game is very lengthy. It takes hours to complete a mission. The oral instructions do not always match the written ones which are the correct ones, and are confusing to children. As the game progresses, lag time increases between segments</review_text>
It only became clear to me how MS undermines Mac by using its software as weapon when I began using MS office for Mac. I have used Window's based Excel everyday at work for the last 20 years and I cannot figure out how to use the Mac version efficiently. It seems like an ersatz version from 15 years ago. If you want to work on PowerPoint docs at home created on your PC at work you will find the effort not worth it...the docs will never transfer formatting properly. I bought this program and almost never use it because it is just so clumsy compared to the PC version. Having said that, there is no alternative to MS office; this is the outcome of MS having monopoly power...no support and an inferior product for Mac user</review_text>
It's not working with my Toshiba Tecra M2 laptop -- it keeps wanting an update to my video driver that doesn't exist</review_text>
I've had dazzle products in the past. Usually a very good product, This DVD Recorder is just not very reliable. I would recommmend spending a little more and getting one of the higher end dazzle products</review_text>
I found this software very difficult to use.  It does not have any "Stop" or "Go Back" button.  The only way to exit an activity is to hit "Esc" button to exit the program and then start all over.  When starting over, there is a very lengthy annimated introduction you have to go over each time and I could not find a way to skip it</review_text>
I bought two of the Mia computer games for my emotionally disturbed special ed. class. I bought it specifically for one little guy who has been in crisis since his grandmother (caregiver) passed away. The storyline of the game is that Mia has to SAVE her gravely ill grandmother. Then she gets MUGGED by a rat! I feel this is a little to noir for small children. The math game (which I am returning unopened) is about her house burning down, and if she could prevent it by going back through time. I feel like this puts a whole world of responsibility on young subjects. I am returning both games</review_text>
The creators of Mia's Reading Adventure would be better engaged creating movies and not children's games. There is just way too much expository and not enough interaction to make this worth your child's effort. If you're looking to teach your pre-k/k child reading skills I'd recommend the Blue's Clues games instead. Any older children would probably get as frustrated as mine did.</review_text>
I've spent all day putting together a 300 page book in Corel Draw, the file was saved several times without error, the finished piece is 2.6 GB. I exported it as a PDF that is 4.5 GB. Never any errors in Corel Draw.Acrobat won't open the PDF. Says it's corrupted.Now when I open the CDR all I get is a single page, and when I right click on the file and look at the properties it says it's 0 pages.I'm really upset, and now I've wasted an entire day with COREL's software, if the thing is just for 1 or 2 page church brochures COREL should WARN people on the package.It looks like I'm SOL and I'm guessing Corel will never bother with a reply.Hint: I think I'll switch to Adobe.Sincerely,Waitman Gobbl</review_text>
Aquazone is good, but I've found that Serene Scene is a better product. Aquazone is not as realistic as Serene Scene and that is what I was looking for. The realism of fish in an aquarium. If I could go back I would buy Serene Scene instead</review_text>
I had to return this product. I have a newer G5 iMac with all OS X updates and as a program it worked. But if you buying this for a sreensaver, like I did, the product didn't work. I tried emailing and posted a question on Allume forum, got no response.</review_text>
I purchased this item for $10 from Comp USA.  There was a problem with some of the files so when I finished installing it, my computer was a mess.I lost all my desk top icons and my computer was extremely slow to respond to anything else.  It took me a while to get the program removed and I eventually ended up doing a system restore.  When the screensaver came up it did look awesome.  I wish I could have used it but I am not going to try and install it again.</review_text>
In wandering around the web, I find I am not the only person to experience crash after crash upon importing (from Photoshop Elements 5).  When importing, Lightroom "thinks" for a long time (that's fine, and they do warn you it can be slow), but then the program crashes before it gets even close to finishing the import.About the rest of the program?  I don't know.  Too frustrated just trying to get it up and running.</review_text>
This software does not come close to the once-upon-a =-time quality of Adobe products. it  is shot  full of bugs overall. Not only does it cause your Photoshop system to quit working, it affects your entire Mac operating System. Adobe knows this is true because they try to cover up with a several page discussion about how operating systems, not Lightroom, can cause problems. Their approach of blaming someone else is shameful. The design of the product is marginal; almost impossible to read the dark grey print on black backgrounds. It is slower than anything I have ever seen.  I could go on and on but it only raises my blood pressure . I have spent the entire weekend fixing the computer programs broken by this "half done" system.. If you buy it, you will waste a lot of time like I did. The software is going back to Amazon tomorrow morning. Amazon, shame on you for selling such a poor product.</review_text>
I am rating this program just one star because I found out AFTER ordering that it is not compatible with digital voice recorders.  I did go to the nuance website before ordering.  They didn't have a little chart to tell what the difference was between preferred and standard.  Anyway, if you want naturally speaking to do transcribing, you need the Preferred version, not this one.</review_text>
Dragon 9 is supposed to have Vista compatibility, via an update that you can get from Nuance. Unfortunately, the update does not work very well, especially in the area of commands. Imagine opening Outlook and giving Dragon the command for composing new mail or even checking mail, and watching it do nothing but move to another message in the inbox. Then, imagine going to the Nuance site to get support. You have to answer about a half-dozen questions and provide you key, even if you have a registered account that contains that key. Finally, you are told that support will cost you $9.95. Ten bucks to fix broken software?! It's no wonder they don't have a support forum; it would be filled with irate customers. I won't even go into the problems with getting the support person to comprehend the problem, except to say that the software did a better job of understanding me.I've moved on to using the voice recognition in Vista which, contrary to a popular YouTube video, actually works pretty well. At least when I need help, I can get it for free</review_text>
I'm having a hard time understanding who would pay money for this downgrade?  You'll wish you had the "XP Upgrade" as soon as you do it.  It's just baffling that they would charge this much for such an awful product</review_text>
not unless you are comfortable editing your registry to get your DVD/CD drive to work</review_text>
I have a 3.2 ghz, 2 GB, PC, clearly ready for Vista.  After running the compatibility wizard and uninstalling all the software that would conflict (even the optional conflicts the second time around), they told me it would install, yet, it didn't.  After an hour of installing, it tells me the installation fails and restores XP.  I realise that mine is an isolated case, but it's typical Microsoft.  If you want something that works, buy a Mac</review_text>
I can't get the software to scan past 30%.  The software locks up when I try to end the scan after being stuck at 30% scan</review_text>
I've been running Spyware Doctor for 4 years, and was having problems with v4 using massive amounts of memory.  So I followed advice from the PC Tools homepage and loaded v5--BIG MISTAKE!  Since installing the new version and downloading the updates (a bad experience in itself, filled with ominous error messages from Windows), I've had to reload the code, reboot numerous times, had 2 Windows crashes and if the OnGuard facility is left running Spyware Doctor consumes 98% CPU for 5 minutes on every screen scroll done reading html text on a site identified as trusted. Oh and the company quietly changed it's policy and has hijacked my credit card information in order to automatically renew registration. I won't be running any more PC Tools products</review_text>
In the instruction pamphlet under Scan Tools, there is a list of what the program scans.One of the functions is a Registry Scanner--"This is a fast scanner that analyzes the Windows Registry for traces of known malware."The bottom line--I have an infected registry which was discovered by my antivirus program and the Spyware Doctor doesn't know it's there. I do keep Spyware Doctor up to date.I'm still looking for an effective spyware application</review_text>
Spyware Doctor was a fine malware detection product, but it is now broken. I've used various versions for quite a while (Windows 2000, Windows XP) but 5.0 is not working reliably.SD will not keep running on XP. The new 5.0 program unloads the OnGuard & Immunizer functions without warning on XP. The speed issue had been a problem (even with 1 GB RAM), but they seemed to have addressed that issue before 5.0.On Vista 5.0 will not uninstall. When you attempted to uninstall, it sends you to their website telling you how great the product is. When you ask tech support for help, they suggest uninstalling using safe mode (which cannot connect to their website).Spyware Doctor will not uninstall using (Windows Installer CleanUp utility - MSICUU2) as there is no entry. The Vista machine hangs and stalls.The obnoxious redirection to the PCtools website puts this product in the spyware category. Their tech support has been very slow (during the week, during business hours for a subscribed user with multiple purchased units).NEXT!</review_text>
I have used Spyware Doctor since version 3 -- almost three years now.  I liked the interface and simplicity -- and the power.  But as others have pointed out, including industry reviews, version 4.x was a HUGE drain on system resources.  My PC's would take anywhere from 5-9 minutes to completely boot up, with Spyware Doctor using almost 100% CPU the whole time.  Also, my computers would frequently "freeze," which turned out to be Spyware Doctor randomly zooming to 95-100% CPU for no reason at all.But with version 5, things are so much worse.  About 3 weeks ago, my PC's lost their ability to connect to the Internet.  Browsing slowed to a crawl, with frequent timeouts and "server not found".  I spent days on the phone with my cable company, and my router's manufacturer, trying to troubleshoot.  I re-configured my entire home network over and over.  I never made the connection between the onset of problems and my updating to SD5.  It was only after finding the PCTools support forums that I realized the problem was Spyware Doctor.I removed the program from my PC's -- and the problems were gone.  I had full Internet connection and full speed again.Spyware Doctor 5 is causing massive problems for users.  PCTools rewrote the program from the ground up, the company says, to improve the resource drain caused by version 4.  But apparently it was rushed to market even though beta testers reported many of these same problems for weeks.I've uninstalled this software and am basically wasting my subscription and losing money.  Other users are right -- PCTools does indeed "auto-renew" and charge your credit card without warning.  This is a huge red flag.  I lost hours, DAYS, dealing with the problems caused by this program.  Many users have had to reinstall Windows completely.It's easy to get caught up in the hyperbole and negative reviews.  But don't just take these at face value -- read the Spyware Doctor forum at PCTools' website.  These problems are real.  And it doesn't look like they're going to be addressable anytime soon.  They've issued a couple of version updates, even removed several of the program's protection "Guards", but these haven't fixed the problems.  And they're not giving any kind of timeline or explanations to users.My advice -- stay away for now.  But keep up with the forums at PCTools' website.  When they finally get the issues resolved, this should be a really strong spyware program.* PCTools has also been criticized for offering a "Free spyware scan" on their website (actually a download of SD), which will find spyware on your system but refuse to remove it until you buy a subscription to Spyware Doctor.  This kind of sleazy bullying isn't normally characteristic of reputable companies -- most will give you an actual free trial with functioning software</review_text>
I have been a fan of spyware doctore for some time. Spyware doctor 4.0 was an excellent product. It did it job pretty good without taking up any significant resource. But unfortunately it seems that PCTOOLS have not yet got their act together for Version 5.0. The first version I received as an upgrade was version 5.0 build 172. Problems started as soon as my machine rebooted. The Spyware doctor service for apparently no reasons hogged the system resource to an extent 95-97%. Killing that does not matter because the application restarts after 15 sec, and also that it seems to be the heart of the application. After reboot the update started running and BAM came the blue screen of death. So after a series of reboots and crashes I installed the version 5 build 176. But that too did not work, hence finally I reverted back to version 4.0 and eveythig works perfectly.Please stay away from Version 5.0 till PCTOOLS get their act together. As a reference do go through the review of CNET for this product[...]</review_text>
I usually use Adaware to scan my computer weekly, and like others, I would like to try the trial version Spyware Doctor to scan my computer. The result was, I had more than 200 infections! I was amazed that my other virus scan programs didn't catch any of these infections, and my computer had been running properly. Of coz, I would like to remove these infections and so I paid with my creditcard and got the License No.After entering the License No. and Scanning, I continued to remove the infections that spyware doctor had caught. Before clickinig the remove button,I checked what I would delete and the files SEEMS OK to be deleted.  I had to restart my computer in order to complete removing the infections. I clicked YES to restart.From then, my nightmare began, I couldn't start my computer AT ALL!!! Not even displaying the loggin window! My computer just kept restarting again and again.  After 5 times restarting automatically, I smelled something burning from my computer!!! I was so scared becoz there are some important files that i haven't backup yet!Endup, I reformat my computer!!! I couldn't login my old account again! Now, I have a new administrator account and lost all the softwares that i orginally have. Luckily I was able to reinstall 70% of the softwares (you gotta know the serial no. for most of the softwares are not working after reinstall, and that took me long time to find ways reinstalling them, and NOT all of them!) Some of my important files couldn't be opened again because I don't have the softwares to open them!I was/am still so mad about this! The spyware doctor removed my system operating files and that's why i couldn't restart my computer. Yet, i reinstalled spyware doctor again because I paid and only used it once. However, I couldn't use it after reinstalling like other softwares.  Even i followed the instruction online to reenter the licence no. that i purchased, it's just simply not working (the website said i don't have to repurchase and it should work!)So i Paid $10 , only used the spyware doctor once, but I lost all other softwares that cost totally more than $400</review_text>
The new product release is worthless - too buggy and slow to work.  The previous releases were ok - they did find some malware and removed it, without interference in our system.  However, despite the cute-sy interface, there are other software programs that provide the same (or better) anti-malware support.Most importantly, this company has some shady business practices (like hidden yearly automatic renewal charges, installing google toolbar with download, etc) and no way to contact them directly other than their online contact form which never receives a response.  Check out the Better Business Bureau to see their "unsatisfactory" report.I am currently disputing a charge from this company on my debit card and have had huge problems - so far I have only been able to speak with Bridget at their third-party billing company who says they are not able to provide assistance with my complaint.  There are other, more reputable companies to work with.  This type of software is not worth the hassle</review_text>
This is an example of a large company pertpetrating fraud on the people who buy its products.I bought my son an iPod for Christmas. Unfortunately he could not use it to download from itunes on his 4 yr old Mac Powerbook computer. He needed to buy the newer (tiger) operating system. So another [...] to buy this operating system. He has been unable to install it on his Powerbook.Both of us have spent over 4 hours on the phone with Mac tech support(hah!) and have found no solution.  Finally they told us to bring it in to an Applestore (three hour drive away) which we did, only to be told that it would cost [...] for them to even  look at it.I hope no one else has to suffer like we have just because you bought an iPod</review_text>
There's a fundamental flaw in the software: it won't print a greeting card properly unless you have a borderless-capable printer.  If you print on a printer that can't do borderless printing, the front cover image on the card will be off center.  Check the FAQ section of the hallmarksoftware web site and they even admit as much.It's a known bug, and a 'fix' has been promised since December according to the hallmarksoftware on-line forums.  Until the fix is released, if ever, avoid this program</review_text>
I loved the 2006 version of this software, but when I received an email offering an "upgrade" to the 2007 version, I decided to improve what I had.  I could not be more disappointed.  The resulting product is a miserable failure and I'm amazed that some people are having good luck with it.This version prints everything off center.  I can play with some of it to center it, but not the Hallmark logo, etc., on the back.  The result is a very unprofessional mess.  I went online to report the problem saw they have a FAQ on the issue promising that "soon" they will have a "fix" I can download.  Three months later and still no "fix".I've written Nova 3 times, they acknowledge the problem and issue the same automated response "Keep checking for updates".  Finally, after numerous emails and phone conversations they have agreed to let me return the software to them.When I received the 2007 edition, which in every other way was virtually identical to the 2006 version, I threw away my old software.  I'm now thinking of purchasing it again because I found this software easy to use and loved to be able to make so many changes, add photos, etc.Maybe some of these don't have this technical problem, but just be warned</review_text>
Card Studio 2007 has repeated many cards from Card Studio 2006.  I bought this new program to have more of a selection but was very disappointed.  Also is is very difficult to see the cards when they are bunched.  You have to pick a card in order to read the front.  Very time consuming</review_text>
I contacted the program's customer service department when the cards in this program printed off center no matter what I did. I received an email saying that this was a known problem with the program and a fix would be available by the end of January. Mid-February I asked again about it as there had been no fix. That time they said it would be fixed by the end of February. I've used their previous programs w/out problems, just wanted more variety so added this one. Apparently not a good idea.....</review_text>
I bought this for my child who uses it at school and loves it. I have a Mac Pro running the latest version of Mac OS. I installed it and it needs to run on 800x600 resolution, which is kind of silly in this day-and-age, but that works OK. What does not work is that it crashes about every 5 minutes. Pretty unworkable. Don't bother buying this for a Mac</review_text>
No support or response to questions, only 1/2 of the functions work, not a bad design but it was obviously released full of bugs.  Try cosmic blobs</review_text>
We have Kid Pix 3 and my kids (4 & 6) played it all the time. We just "upgraded" to Kid Pix 4, and my initial experience has prompted me to write this warning.Kid Pix 4 runs in 800x600 resolution BUT it won't force your screen resolution to match that when it runs. Kid Pix 3, of course, did. As we are using a LCD monitor with native resolution of 1280 x 1024, we obviously want to keep the desktop running in this resolution. So now we are faced with 2 options: 1) Use Kid Pix 4 with a drastically reduced window (the drawing and toolbars are in a box surrounded by a huge black screen with the file menus at the very top) or 2) adjust the resolution manually every time someone wants to run or exit the program.I find this unacceptable. Customer support is non-existent: if you bought it retail, The Learning Company won't answer your questions and refers you to Encore's website. No patches are available and Encore has no way to actually contact them. Their FAQ simply explains how to go to your desktop and adjust your screen resolution to 800x600.I think this huge oversight and lack of any patch to simply fix the problem speaks volumes for the quality of this release.Boo to Encore, boo to TLC for allowing their "brand" to be junked, boo to Broderbund. Don't waste your time</review_text>
This is the worst software I bought.First,it cost $100 and McAfee did not honor the $55 rebate because I sent the rebate form a little late. They had only 15 days to send out after purchase while compusa receipt has much longer deadline to send our rebate form. Isn't that kind of trick?Second and most important, it slowed down everything, not a bit but by dozens of seconds  or even more than 1 minute.Third,the speed is not only the problem, its wireless connection sucks to the maximum and a couple of my machines can't get online and can't connect to the network. I have 3 PCs and 1 laptop. Only two machine can get connected. It also conflicts with Belkin network card driver which has been so popular for so many years. How the hell McAfee did not know that adaptor?Fourth, there is no manual whattsover and you have to all figure that out yourself. Given it has so much problem it's very frustrating to configure it. Sometimes the security center is downloading forever. Who the hell knows what it is doing. Sucks.I had spent so much time to fine tune it and it still sucks that much. I changed back to Internet Security Suite which is much better than this. Don't buy it even they give it to you free or you will break the disk.</review_text>
This software will not load properly no matter how you try. The online help is no help at all it gives you a few suggestions that all boil down to please try to re-install. Their down loadable wizard informed me after using it that I needed buy the components that didn't load but were on the disk. Try and remove the parts that do actually load and they do not uninstall properly. McAfee has a section devoted to removal of their software but so far all the suggestions have not worked. Need customer service and its $2.99 per minute from you're first call. I have never had such a horrid experience with a software from a "reputable" company in a long time. I will never buy McAfee products again.</review_text>
Downloaded the new McAfee software.  My computer is now slowed over 90% of the speed of a snail- both with AOL and Internet Explorer.  McAfee customer service is of no value whatever.  McAfee FAQ  describes a very dangerous fix which involves editing the registry file but even those instructions don't seem to work as described.     What a mistake</review_text>
The software was installed on three computers and slowed two down so much I had to remove it on 2 and have not put it back on it worked fine on one of the thre</review_text>
I bought this product because it combined a number of security elements.  It worked fine until I installed the network security feature.  We have a home network and as soon as I installed the product, the other computers were unable to access the internet.  When I tried to uninstall it, my computer lost internet access.  Even using the 26 digit key did not allow access.  Customer service was useless.  They gave me directions which involved changing the registry. Bad move.  Needless to say, I had to have a computer repair service fix the network, and I had to reformat my hard drive. McAfee assumed no responsibility for the problems it caused,  Dell was nice enought to walk me through the reformat and it wasnt even their product that caused the problems.  I would like to give this no stars</review_text>
I bought this to upgrade my previous version of McAfee Total Protection. The first install was on a laptop, when it configured the wireless security it actually made changes to my WAP setup without notifying me. First of all it said that I didn't have any security set up on the wireless connection (although I have it set up with disabled SSID, MAC filtering, WPA protection...), and after it was done it had changed the setup to WEP... Also causing my other wireless PCs (that don't have McAfee) and my Xbox 360 to no longer connect to the network... So I ended up deinstalling that part.Second PC: regular desktop, after installing the software (only select pieces: antivirus, firewall, spamkiller, privacy service) my multimedia sharing to the Xbox 360 no longer worked. Contacting McAfee support never yielded any usable response ('reinstall' seems to be the default answer ...). Deinstalling/reinstalling didn't help, opening up the firewall didn't help, etc. etc. so I ended up reverting back to my old version of McAfee.I consider myself a power PC user, I've set up and configured dozens of PCs over the years, built my own PC, and I can honestly say that I have never used software worse than this one. I hardly ever write reviews, but I had to write this one. Be warned! Maybe McAfee will eventually get its act together, but for me it's time to move on.One last comment: this McAfee software (just like prior versions btw) takes up a lot of resources - several services need to run that take up a considerable amount of memory). Not good if you don't have ample memory</review_text>
Until '07, if you had a McAfee suite but only wanted to use some of its components, and use other programs for other aspects of protection, that worked fine. For instance, I use Zone Alarm Pro for firewall and Spyware Doctor for spyware, and McAfee '06 just for virus. This combination has worked fine, but McAfee '07 won't install *any* of itself unless all other programs are removed. And that's a no-go for me, since some components of McAfee (esp spyware) weren't rated all that well by reviewers.</review_text>
Contrary to the other review, they did ship the proper 3 user version.However, since installing it yesterday it is consuming 100% of my systems resources and I can not find any setting to have it stop. Evidently it does continuous deep virus scans so you might as well toss your computer in the garbage. What a mess of a product.</review_text>
This has caused serious technical errors on my systems--all new laptops, desktops.  It will cause MS Word 2007 to crash and also cause a number of errors on your file system, possibly requiring you to re-install your Vista OS.Worked well in Windows XP and Office 2003 environment, and they claim this is Vista compatible, along with Paperport 11.The company will not offer me a refund.  I will pursue.</review_text>
Freezes IE 7 and you have to close out and restart...besides that, the other problem is slow printing because you have to use the "Print as Image" selection for anything that is scanned.  Overall it is OK, and with the vast price difference with Adobe, I can live with it.  BUT, make no mistake, this program is far inferior to the Adobe product</review_text>
I deinstall the product after two weeks of use.  It did not allow me to select Adobe Reader as my default program and was not able to open many PDF documents.  If a document was opened it was often incorrectly formatted for viewing.  Also, the feature to allow editing of the documents in Word or Excel was most often non-functional</review_text>
I recently upgraded to MS VISTA and MS Office 2007 and I upgraded to the VISTA version of PDF Converter Pro 4.  BIG, BIG MISTAKE!!  The program installed some sort of pdf "add-in" to MS Office that caused Excel, Word, and Outlook to CRASH.  As soon as you opened one of the programs it would give an error message and close.  It took hours on the phone with Microsoft to figure out and correct the problem (THANKS MICROSOFT!).  However, I got ZERO help from Nuance, they wanted to charge me to even REPORT a problem!  BEAWARE YOU WILL NOT GET TECHNICAL SUPPORT WITH NUANCE PRODUCTS! Before I upgraded, I used PDF Converter Pro at home whereas at work I used Adobe Pro.  There is no comparison, PDF Converter Pro while considerably cheaper, does not do near as good a job of producing pdf files. I'm still looking for something that works but is cheaper than Adobe.</review_text>
I have purchased this product which I run on a Dual Core Processor under Windows XP Professional. Software is very unstable and crashes many times when I want to open a document from a URL. ScanSoft solution is that one should save the document in once PC and then open it up. This is of course unacceptable as this software should handle this and this is just a Band-Aid fix.Customer Service is the worst I have ever experienced and NUANCE/Scansoft need to greatly improve this. I have submitted on various occasions emails which I never ever receive a response. When talking to customer service they promise they would get back to you and so far have NEVER EVER done so!!!! Extremely unreliable service. I own many of their products and will NEVER EVER purchase another one of their products.</review_text>
If you are accustomed to using other versions of CorelDraw, you may not want this version. Fact is, they have made many so-called "improvements" which I find are incompatible with other software that I have used in the past. It does not convert to encapsulated postscript (eps) files properly, and will crash programs that traditionally work well with eps figures. By contrast, CorelDraw 11 worked well. Hence the "improvement" has rendered the software a nuisance. If you are accustomed to pasting figures into other software, forget it. CorelDraw X3 will not retain the integrity of the original figure, and it will look distorted and crummy. Any prior version of CorelDraw worked well. Again, the "improvement" has made the software a nuisance. On top of that, it crashes a lot.I contacted their "customer service" about a year ago when I first discovered these differences. I was assured that they knew about the problems and were working on them. Well, a year later, with no patches to correct these differences, I am now being told that it is everyone else's fault (software manufacturers) that CorelDraw is not compatible. I was also told that they have no intention to correct these problems because they do not consider them problems. There is an example of their customer service for you.I have been using CorelDraw for a long time, starting with 6, then 9, then 11. This is the worst of the bunch by far. I am going back to a previous version.</review_text>
I'm in awe about what this program can do, but I've yet to be able to use it to its fullest. It's not user friendly and I've been designing photo brochures, and marketing literature and multi-media presentations for years with other design software.The Corel_Tutor is unwieldy to use and only illustrates the simplest projects. It takes a week to learn the glossary used for the program. And if you don't use it daily, it's easy to forget the glossary and toolbox icons.I was hoping the "student & teacher" edition would be more instructive, but it's not.I'm currently searching for a tutor who will teach me the complexities of using this program with a hands-on approach</review_text>
I used this software to do a scrapbook for my mother for her birthday.First of all the software takes up a HUGE amount of space! Like 1600MB. The program is so slow and I have a relatively new computer. After about 4 pages in one file it becomes impossible to work with and then crashes. I had two files - 6 pages - crash and the work was gone. All the work gone. The text editor will add typos and put in and take out spaces. Sometimes it works great other times you have to restart your computer. Once it added bright green lines where I had added all of the embellishments to the page - everything other than the background. I had to redo it. Piece of JUNK! but what does print on a color laser - don't try it with inkjet - looks great</review_text>
Be careful with this program.  My wife bought it, and I tried to install it for her on our PC.  I made several attempts, and each time installation hung at a different stage of the installation procedure.  When installation hung, I could not cancel or kill it, or even shut down the PC without pressing the Reset button (on Windows XP Pro).I went to the support page of the web site, and found a FAQ item about incompatibility with Zone Alarm.  If you're not familiar with Zone Alarm, it is a personal firewall and security product that is very common among home users.  According to Nova Development, the only way to get Scrapbook Factory Deluxe 3.0 to install is to permanently remove Zone Alarm.  Besides being a serious security risk, this is an extreme measure to have to take.  This seems to be perfectly OK with Nova Development.  They offer no workaround other than removing Zone Alarm from the PC.  Personally, this would be enough to give me pause about installing the product even if I did not use Zone Alarm.  You have to wonder what the installer is trying to do that even the presence of dormant security software interferes with it.</review_text>
This software was rated the best out of a large group of digital scrapbook programs. I am very disappointed with it. First of all, my system resources can't handle moving the pictures so while I click and drag, the screen doesn't keep up and I have no idea where the picture or item will end up. It's not very precise this way. The website's solution is to use my arrow keys. Ok, so maybe that's a problem with my computer. Second, I can't select photos easily because it brings up images that are too small to see the detail. And that's with the LARGE thumbnails. So in a photo of a group of 12 kids, I have to have the photo pre-selected. Not how I planned on putting together a scrapbook when I have thousands of photos to look through. Also, in researching the screen freeze issue I discovered that I can only have up to 10 pages in a scrapbook. Also not my part of my original plan. My advice would be to go to the designers website and look at the FAQ's before buying. It helps you to see any issues before you buy. I'm not sure what my next selection will be, but I don't see me using this for my scrapbooks.</review_text>
I switched to Tax Cut years ago after Turbotax (in 2003) implemented their idiotic validation scheme. I figured I was doing my part to punish Intuit / Turbotax. And for all those years I've been happy with Tax Cut.Not this year. I found some major bugs which cost me a lot of time. I had my return done, but the numbers were seriously out of whack -- I know I didn't have that much income! Going back through the interview process didn't turn up the source of the added money. Only by checking the actual "Forms" did I find that several copies of 1099-Misc forms were hidden from the interview process, and by adding the same data in non-hidden copies, I was double entering the data. There was no easy way to recover. I eventually had to wipe the installation and start all over.A call to tech support did absolutely no good. The person on the other end didn't seem to understand the problem with having "hidden" copies of forms going into the calculations. If those are hidden, what else is it doing wrong?I'm not quite sure how do deal with this next year. Go back to Turbotax? Hope Tax Cut fixes its problems? Or go to a human tax preparer?Whatver my choice, I'm not looking forward to it.</review_text>
I bought Taxcut this year because it was inexpensive and included business tax forms for my partnership. For the money I guess I'm satisfied with the partnership results, but that's where it ends.Taxcut for Federal taxes is not integrated with Taxcut for business... ok so what do you want for cheap. But, it also isn't well integrated with the Massachusetts state tax version, leaving me to go figure how to deal with what it calls "special" situations (unreimbursed partner expenses and interest from out of state banks, for example). Overriding form data is painful and the program complains that if I override calculated data I can not e-file (not that I would trust it to e-file my taxes). Form navigation is hopeless. I can only imagine what someone who isn't experienced with tax preparation could accomplish with this mess.I filed for an extension; now I'm probably going to buy Turbotax to do the actual federal and state returns.With a deep discount, I would probably purchase Taxcut again for the partnership taxes, because it is slightly easier to use than the Excel spreadsheets I'd been using (but only because I don't have to copy the numbers from the spreadsheets into the forms).Honestly, you would think there would be some tax software that is better than the non-functional Taxcut without the overblown, fatty and expensive too-many-talking-heads Turbotax alternative</review_text>
I tried to use this program to file a very simple return, and it calculated that I owed the state $550 for underpayment, as well as a $230 penalty for late payment.I tried working through the program several times to find the error. I found that the program was automatically checking boxes that I hadn't checked! I have no idea if that was the cause of the underpayment problem, which I was not able to resolve.In frustration, I went to [...] and filed my return easily within an hour, with a $140 return from the state rather than a $780 penalty</review_text>
This program sucks. I used it last year and thought that it was unwieldy and really confusing (i.e. unlike TurboTax and other programs, there's very little transparency in the system). Then I bought it again this year because the store that I went to was out of Turbotax, and I needed to get my taxes done quickly. This year was even worse than last year - not only was it still unwieldy and irritating, but it gave me figures that simply did not make sense.  The results for the federal return were OK, but it gave me figures that would have cost me over $2,000 in taxes that I did NOT owe on my state return. I ended up going online to double check my results using a cheap ($10) online service recommended by the NY state tax website. Within 45 minutes, I cleared the online source, and got results that made far more sense. I have no idea what happened with TaxCut, but I suspect that they may have been missing a field somewhere along the line - this is a problem that has been noted by a number of others in reviews on a variety of sites. I will NOT be buying this product again</review_text>
It is probably too late to save anyone from this software but I had to say something about it to someone. There is apparently no way to tell taxcut about it.I have been using taxcut for several years now after switching from turbotax because of the issue of them installing spyware. I was happy with taxcut until this year. It is defective. I can't even believe it isn't in the news. My taxcut program is missing the "wages" entry on the Schedule C form. It would have been a terrible loss if I had not caught it. I went to their website to get some help or a phone number and neither was available. I can't believe that I have the only taxcut software that is defective but I couldn't find any reference to this problem anywhere. Now I have to go through the whole tax form to make sure it didn't make any other mistakes! I might as well have done my taxes the old fashioned way by hand.</review_text>
"Genius" is an educational simulation game, where you're building an industrial complex -- plop down factories, roads, houses, fire departments and such.  As the game progresses, you complete physics puzzles to obtain new technologies and product improvements.  You subscribe to newspapers, which contain answers to some questions and the knowledge or equations needed to solve others.The physics problems are entertaining, well designed, well documented, implemented excellently, and can be quite fun.  They are presented as problems you encounter during business operation, for example while developing a new product.  All of the information you need is provided.  The game will appeal to children 8 & up, but these physics problems are more like age 16 & up because they require high school math.  So, children & youths may need help from a parent who remembers algebra and preferably physics -- yikes!  Some of the questions are easy & fun.  Some require you to be comfortable with algebra, converting between units, and applying formulae.  A few are very difficult.  Fortunately, the questions are the same each time, so after figuring out the answers, you can write them down & just enter the answers next time.  Sometimes the game even gives you the correct answer after it is too late, so you can write it down for next time.  Unfortunately, I can't find a cheat sheet list of answers on the web -- too bad, this would really help.  The level of difficulty of these questions isn't a problem, just be warned.The simulation side of the game is suffers in comparison.  The industrial simulation controls are poorly documented.  What each building does and when/why/where it is appropriate/inappropriate and how to run the game is somewhat of a mystery.  There's no way to figure out whether building something will be good or bad except trial and error -- logic doesn't always help.  Bad decisions spiral out of control, seem to lead inevitably to bankruptcy.  Unfortunately, wrong answers on the physics problems can have the same effect.  There is a "statistics" report that is supposed to give feedback on whether your company is making or loosing money, but this form doesn't have enough information.So, expect some trial & error, some frustration, some algebra, some physics, & some reading through magazines looking for obscure clues.  "Genius" can be really fun, but could use some interface improvements.  Highly recommended for anyone taking physics in high school or college.</review_text>
OK, the maps are good, but its very very combersome to use with a laptop in your car. It is very disracting and can easily cause an accident. Does not work aroung Lincoln tunnel area. Also would not find my home street, and I have been there for 2 years. Either the one I got was defected, or its not what other make it out to be. I had to return mine.</review_text>
This is a complete joke.  The only cities that are in the program for U.S. states are major metro areas. If you have a handheld (either regular or mobile phone) you more than likely also have WiFi or GPRS internet connection.  And if you are in a major metro area, with a WiFi connection, why would you need a program for maps?  Just go to Yahoo Maps or Mapquest.  If you don't have a WiFi, then just buy a paper map...it will do the same thing (maybe even more!) than this program.The only possible way this program could be useful is if you already have a handheld GPS receiver AND you never find yourself outside major metropolitan cities.  I have a GPS receiver for my laptop (USB) which I though could connect to my handheld and it won't...so my advice is to buy an entire package (software and handheld-specific GPS receiver).Can't believe Microsoft put its name on this junk</review_text>
Doesn't tell you how to get anywhere when used with a GPS...simply shows you where you are.  Nothing more than a glorified paper map.  A complete embarassment</review_text>
I purchased this program recently, and was very disappointed.  The maps are very limited...for example, most of the major tourist areas (beaches, Newport, ect.) in Rhode Island are cut out of the RI map.  I recommend buying MS Streets and Trips 2005 (which includes Pocket Streets 2005 in the box) instead:http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0002DOEAM/qid=1121691049/sr=8-2/ref=pd_bbs_2/103-6971135-7476654?v=glance&s=pc&n=507846With this program, you have the entire USA at your disposal, and you can select which maps to send to your pocket pc or smartphone.Fortunatly, the store that sold me Pocket Streets allowed me to exchange it for Streets and Trips (after paying the difference).  The prices are very close.</review_text>
This product is nothing like the desktop version of the software. So limited in functions, you might as well have a paper map.</review_text>
This app is just horrendous. It is literally NOTHING more than a moving map; I'm serious. There are NO features at all. To make things worse, when zoomed out, the display is littered with the names of every little village and hamlet you've never heard of, leaving the names of recognizable towns a cities nowhere to be found. Also, at these zoom levels, most roads, streets and highways are not visible, making navigation impossible. This app does not even come close to qualifying as a GPS nav system. Even as a 'moving map' it's pretty well useless unless you're zoomed into about 300 yards. Even though this app was a freebie included with Trips and Streets 2005 (which is a VERY nice, capable app.), it's still maddening that Microsoft would allow such a eggregiously lame program to be released. If it were possible to give this program negative stars AND charge Microsoft with a crime, I'd do it in a heartbeat</review_text>
This is simply awful!  I would expect this type of performance from some no-name brand software purchased at a flea market - not from Microsoft!  I think they must of contracted this off to some really low bidder.  I had more satisfaction tossing the software into the trash than trying to auction it off on some internet site.    I think I'll go with the TomTom Navigator software instead</review_text>
I guess i'm to dumb to purchase an item like this.  I followed the instructions to the letter and it's not working. I guess I should have read the small print.  Sent an e-mail to Xitel for help and waiting for response. Will re-rate later.</review_text>
while there are many benefits to learning vocabulary with this tool, I found it did not help with conversation.</review_text>
I have been a loyal fan of Quicken for many years.  My, things have changed for the worst at the once mighty Intuit.  It pains me to report that Quicken Deluxe 2007 is a work in progress.1. The installation CD was unreadable.  To Intuit's credit, I was given access to their download site for replacement software.2. The reconciliation report (needed for balancing your checkbook) will not display or print for some reason.  All other reports display and print just fine.  Unfortunately, the reconciliation report is the only one I am truely interested in printing.  I am using a Brother HL-5280DW laser printer.  The printer works fine with all other programs, including the old version of Quicken.  Again, the most important report (reconciliation) will not print on Quicken Deluxe 2007.3.  The software would not recognize the C-drive as a working drive even though the program is running on that drive (?) - go figure.4.  The overseas Tech Support is willing to play dumb and pretend they don't know there is a problem with the software, keeping you in the chat room for hours.  I guess as long as they get paid it doesn't matter whether they help or not.  The ultimate recommendation is to reload the software - just one more time.As a past happy user of Quicken 2004, I was forced into this upgrade.Don't expect the problems to be resolved quickly.  Intuit has been aware of most of these problems for over 6 months.I hate to be the bearer of bad news, but this version of quicken is just that BAD NEWS</review_text>
I've been a user of quicken for at least ten years. I've liked the product historically, but this version is garbage. Like other users, I too have fallen victim to the 'out of memory' error. Guess what? There's nothing I can do. I can't go back to a previous version of Quicken, because my data file isn't compatable.Honestly, I blame myself for not reading the feedback others had left first. I was brand loyal to Intuit, but now I'm paying the price. The software is garbage, stay away.</review_text>
Background - senior IT professional.  I have been a Quicken user for well over a decade and have always been very happy with the product until the 2007 version.  First, let me point out a couple of things to like about this version:- the interface; seems to depend on the eye of the beholder, but I for one find it pleasing and useful.- the ability to append notes and check images to a transaction.  I love this feature.- the Cash Flow dashboard and the CalendarNow for the caveat: if you depend a great deal on downloading transactions using WebConnect, prepare for a great deal of frustration and disappointment.  This feature used to work reliably in all other versions.  In version 2007 it is prone to quit with a notice that there has been a "Quicken Server Outage" that prevented the download from succeeding.  These occurrences are sporadic.Scores of users are reporting this on the support forums and elsewhere; I have seen no hint of a response or explanation from Intuit.  Horror stories about tech support at Intuit have kept me away from that venue, though at some point I'll call just to see what happens.  I upgraded to 2007 from a very solid and dependable Quicken 2006, and this issue alone has made me wish that I hadn't.Weighing the new features against the new bugs I would have to say that I do not recommend purchasing this version at this time</review_text>
This is the first review I have written in probably a few years.  Normally, I don't feel strongly enough about any product, good or bad, to bother entering a review.  With this new version of Quicken, I have something that I feel strongly enough to write about.I have been using Quicken for close to 20 years.  I have built all of my finances around it.  For the past 6 years, Quicken has been going steadily downhill.  This latest version, I hope, represents rock bottom.  I don't see how the product could possibly get any worse.Words cannot describe how bad this product is.  No functionality has been added in the previous 6 years.  What has happened is that the screen has become more cluttered with more links to Quicken's "financial partners", and more redundant links to other, old, program features, and more white space.  In return, the user has to page through tab after tab after tab to view the same information that previously fit on only 1 screen.  Further, each screen refresh now takes seconds, whereas in older versions a screen refresh was instantaneous.Entering a simple transaction may require this bloated sofware to generate 2, 3, even 4 complete screen refreshes, each one taking maybe 1 to 2 seconds.  That means, once you hit the "enter" key to complete a transaction, you can be waiting as long as 8 seconds before you can move on to entering the next transaction.  As little as 3 years ago the same step required less than a second.  Obviously, time required will vary with your computer - but it is bad enough that Quicken now requires you to "downgrade" your Quicken software every few years - it is also necessary for you to replace your entire computer system at the same time just so you can realize the same performance level as you had in the previous version.  All of this with NO additional features or functionality.There is a new kid on the block that I am switching to.  It is called "Moneydance".  It can import data from Quicken, it is fast, compact, and runs on any platform, Windows, Linix, Unix, Mac, even OS/2.  It is easier to use than Quicken and the support is great.  It is available for download - a functional evaluation version is free and the full version is only $30.  You can actually speak to a person to get help w/out having to pay.  Since I have been using Quicken for years, it will take a while to test Mondeydance out to make sure it works properly.  I am running the 2 side-by-side for a while to make sure the numbers agree.  So far, things are going well.  Then I plan to dump Quicken forever.  The well has run dry at Quicken; everyone who made the product great has apparently left the company.Obviously the people at Quicken are free to make their product as bloated and as cumbersome as they want.  But they should not be allowed to force people to downgrade.  Yet, that is what they are doing.  I am absolutely positively through with Quicken, and I am not coming back</review_text>
This is an extremely flawed software program. I have used Quicken for more than a decade, and this product is not worthy of the name. Runtime errors keep me from evening getting the program going. It contains 6 bank accounts which I cannot currently print checks from. I have reinstalled the software at least 15 times with no success. I have used every suggestion from tech support and the Quicken forums without ANY success. I guess I'll have to move to MS Money</review_text>
It's definitely an awful piece of software. It's totally unstable under winxp sp2 and ie7. Follow other peoples advice and get quicken '06</review_text>
Looks nice... but beware!Installed Norton 360 on the 6 workstations in our small office.  As soon as I did that our accounting system (Peachtree) started to lock up a few times a day.  Even after turing off the firewall on all workstations the accounting system still locked up.I've now uninstalled Norton 360 on the server PC and that seems to have solved the problem.I wish now that I had just upgraded from Norton Internet Security 2005 to 2007...  Never again.</review_text>
Installed great - looked good. Day 3 it started blocking me from websites 'as their security certificate had been revoked' - Amazon even? After a week of back and forth 'support' they couldn't fix it and left me with a partially working PC to drown.  THe PC support is partially automated as they didn't read my responses and their advice went in circles.  Plus trying to fully uninstall it is a nightmare.It might work on XP but don't get it if you have Vista.</review_text>
Having had Norton products installed for years including AntiVirus, Internet Security, and SystemWorks, I decided to replace the installed products with Norton 360 and a non-Norton password manager.  Obviously, it is critical to FIRST remove all Norton programs before installing Norton 360.  The installation process proceeded relatively smoothly.My computing environment includes a 1.6Ghz processor, 1,000MB of memory, and 6GB of available disk.The background scans and LiveUpdate have played havoc with my other applications by periodically locking up the entire CPU at 100% CPU utilization.  One application that streams radio broadcasts now stops.  I immediately disabled the automatic updates and scheduled backups, however, the CPU occasionally still locks.Additionally, there is no way to transfer security settings from previous Norton products to Norton 360 thereby making the installation process very labor intensive.If you now have separate Norton security products and are satisfied with them, save your money and renew the Norton subscriptions.</review_text>
As an IT professional I would strongly recommend against installing Norton 360 on your computer.  I have been a big fan of Norton Security for years and I have it installed on all my home computers for years.  After installing Norton 360, it erased most of my security settings and my computer continiusly crashed.  It messed up on of my home computers to the point that not only it would crash several times a day, but I couldn't even use System Restore to recover my computer and I was forced to rebuild the system from scratch.Don't believe the promise to install it easily on 3 computers either.  Symantec makes as difficult as possible for you to download the software and isntall it.I am ready to switch to McAfee</review_text>
My subscription for 2006 was up and I needed to renew - since I just reinstalled Windows XP Professional (SP2) on my laptop (a Dell Inspiron 9300, Intel Pentium M 2GHz, 512MB RAM, 60GB Hard Disk), I decided to simply purchase the 360.I have been having issues with the Live Update for several weeks now (Error 5).  Instead I have to download a 15 MB file ever so often with the updated definitions.After checking the technical support website, it appears that Norton is aware of the problem and is currently working on it.  That was just about two weeks ago.  Customer support is non-existent it appears since I have yet to be contacted.Complete waste of time.  Renew your existing subscriptions instead.  I wish that I had</review_text>
This version does not have voice prompts to tell you directions or some of the other features you might expect. Microsoft now provides voice messages in version 2006 and it is cheaper than this version ($59-79 depending upon timing). It is worth the price if you have a laptop. Pocket Streets is disappointing. By the way, it is illegal to have your laptop open in the front seat in some states so don't get a ticket (they allow a normal GPS but not a laptop serving as a GPS...go figure).  By the way, Microsoft does not give a discount to upgrade from version 2005 to 2006 so your only choice is to purchase a new product at full price</review_text>
The video editing part of this software is completely useless.  It didn't come with a manual and I ended up buying on my own a book about how to use it.  It hasn't made a difference.  The software is completely uncooperative.  My computer more than meets the minimum requirements for running the program.  If you bought this software for the video editing, I recommend using the disc as a drinks coaster and buying something else</review_text>
The features of the program are great, but it crashes WAY too much. My computer system is fully adequate for video editing, so that is not the problem. I've gotten to the point where I save my work literally every minute for fear that it will crash</review_text>
The video-editing component of this package, Video Wave, worked great for me for about a year, but it has recently turned into a NIGHTMARE!  The audio is anywhere between 2 and 4 seconds out of sync with the video, and after trying everything I'm convinced that its a problem with the code.  A quick product search will show others who have had similar problems.  I would STAY AWAY</review_text>
That's exactly where my CD went. In the garbage. That's where all the other Roxio software I've ever owned has ended up. At least I never had to spend extra for their junk.It's always came as  part of a peripheral or PC software package.No printed manuals are ever provided and it's always an issue trying to download one from the Roxio website...which I would then have to print at my expense.I could live with the on-screen manual if the software wasn't buggy and they provided some sort of customer support.I can't believe that this company is still in business. I guess that they survive by making deals with peripheral and PC manufacturers to stick their customers with inferior software.Be advised......don't be fooled by their slick packaging and website. Read the reviews here and elsewhere</review_text>
The video editing capability is tough to deal with and not impressive when you figure it out. The tools are not explained and there isn't as much to do with it as they imply. May be nice for birthday party editing, i don't know. I didn't like it. It's not worth $100. The other capabilities might be nice,but from what i've dealt with, that's not the case</review_text>
I was extremely disappointed in this "upgrade".  I had Roxio's Easy CD Creator 5 and loved it.  That product allowed you to easily arrange your music on the dics, burn it, then create a lable or insert for the disc with almost no effort.  Almost everything was intuitive.Creator 7 is a big step back in ease of use and utility.  So they added a few new bells and whistles, so what?  The base use of this product is to make music cd's and to create inserts.  Arranging music is not as easy as it was before.  And the insert creator is so frustrating to use I don't bother.In fact, I have continued to use Creator 5 and have simply written off the fact I paid $100 for Creator 7 - for nothing!Now, with a computer upgrade, Creator 5 no longer works.  I don't dare try another Roxio product (just read the reviews for 7.5 and that appears to be a total waste of money).  I'll be taking my chances on ANYTHING else . . . not Roxio</review_text>
Once I figured this software out, I was able to do a slideshow of my pictures, integrate video, and produce a decent DVD.  Only problem is, it distorts all my video footage by forcing it into 4:3 whereas my DVD camcorder shoots in 16:9.  This sucks.  I have been buying other software packages ever since trying to get my video to stay in 16:9.  Roxio support did e-mail me back with the blanket statement that it doesn't support 16:9 at this time.  Even in the new 7.5 version.  Roxio needs to join the rest of us in 2005 and bring their software to be compatible in widescreen</review_text>
I foolishly purchased 7.0.  It worked ok for a few months then just kept hanging up my system.  Funny, it started hanging up when 7.5 was released.  I tried to get "customer support" but that's a joke.  Do yourself a favor, DO NOT BUY ANYTHING FROM ROXIO.  I'd given this software negative stars if I could.  Spend your money elsewhere.</review_text>
The game disk does not run on my laptop. But it will play it on my desktop computer.  Very annoying, but at least I can play (other reviewers have not been so lucky).The game has some good questions and I enjoy testing my Friends knowledge.  The game itself is rather simple and not totally fun.  The "game board" is the outside of the Friends' apartment building.  When you get a question right a window lights up.  When you get one wrong a window dims.  If you don't answer the question nothing happens.  You win when all the windows on that floor are lit up.  I would prefer that they make you answer all questions- none of this passing on a question- it would up the ante and perhaps add some excitement.If you play a multi-player game you cannot select which letter is your buzzer and the letters assigned by the game designers are adjacent keys on the keyboard!  It's silly for the two players to be huddled together, hovering over the same part of the keyboard when the designers could have selected other letter keys set further apart.There are SOME video clips and still images accompanying the questions, but it's mostly a trivia game without visual aids or embellishments.  Think Trivial Pursuit with a computer screen as the cards.This game was a gift.  If I had to do it over again I'd probably spend my money instead on Scene It! Friends Edition.  As of right now, Scene It! Friends Edition is on sale at Circuit City for the same price as this game is on Amazon. (And though I haven't played it, the reviews of that game are much better than this one).</review_text>
This is an item that I purchased from Amazon.com that I am not satisfied with.  I cannot install the game on my computer to play it.  I had a relative try to install it on her computer and she also could not install it to play.  She believes that it could be a damaged disk, and that I should pursue getting a refund or replacing it with another copy.  I hope you can help me with this.  Thank you for your support.  Sharon Moseley</review_text>
I am extremely unhappy with this product.  It is defective.  I gave it as a Christmas gift to my daughter and was very disappointed to learn that it does not work.</review_text>
I read previous reviews about not being able to run the program because the computer recognized it as a copied disk. I thought this couldn't possibly happen on my high tech computer... I WAS WRONG... Even though I purchased a legitamate copy, the program still would not let me run it.... BUYER BEWARE!!!!!</review_text>
I changed from quicken to Quickbooks and regret it.  Yes, Quick Books does some wonderful reports and invoiceing but I have found it difficut to use and especially to download crdit card transactions from my business credit cards.  I have also found it difficut to match transactions.   To get a better handle on my expenses I am going back to quicken or try another program.   Online help and tutorials, "dummies guide.... not helpful either.You would think see they make quicken they would allow import of QIF files.dissapointed.</review_text>
I have had to un-install and reinstall three times and it still won't update on a very current Windows XP version. I hate how hard it is to download from my bank and it never recognizes the stuff anyway so I have to go through line by line and create aliases. I like Quicken better but the accountant can't figure out how to import Quicken into his Quickbooks Pro so here it is. Hate it, hard as ever not easier, the whole thing takes way too long to work with. Reports are a bit easier which is good or I would have tossed it out the window and bought Microsoft Money</review_text>
The product is great, calling tech support is a task though. Intuit outsources thier call centers overseas and it is difficult to communicate with thier support people by telephone. If this product wasn't preffered by my CPA I would never buy it ever again. Boycott companies that outsource to other countries, keep our jobs at home!</review_text>
I was very happy with my QuickBooks Basics. But for whatever corporate reason they no longer support the Basics version, so I was forced to upgrade to Pro 2007. It is MUCH slower than Basics, it's more complicated to back-up (it asks SO MANY questions), also it takes longer to print a simple check (again TOO MANY CLICKS before it prints...</review_text>
I'd give this product zero stars if I could.I use the QuickBooks online payment service with version 2004, and last week it started telling me that they were discontinuing support for version 2004 with that online service, so they forced me to upgrade.So I bought the upgrade, and when I ran the installer it wouldn't accept my serial number.  I spent forty minutes on the phone with tech support on a choppy line to India, and he still couldn't get it to work.  I finally gave up when the next step he proposed was to disable all of the services running on my computer.I had heard from others, including an accountant, that this version was bad but couldn't believe it would really be this bad.  I'd used QB since the early-1990s and never really had a problem.  But this is really, really bad.Intuit needs to go back to the drawing board with this version.  It's a TOTAL LEMON</review_text>
I installed quickbooks pro 2003 on my new computer running VISTA and had a small problem.  So, I bought an upgrade to 2007 since Intuit says it works with VISTA.It does not.  The software crashes at odd times.  It also crashes when attempting to call up invoices from the accounts receivable report.  It reports out of memory errors and closes two to six times each day.  I have set up my old computer, which runs XP, so I can use the new software until they fix all of the glitches in the 2007 version.  I recommend NOT buying this version if you are running VISTA OS</review_text>
I have gone through all the major revisions of PaperPort, and I dislike them all.  The features have improved, but the program has become steadily more unreliable and bug-prone.  It often crashes, which means I have to shut down the entire program when editing a document and restart, which apart from taking ages, loses all the changes I made.   Very frustrating.  It has also become steadily slower as the version numbers have climbed - you just to sit around twiddling your thumbs waiting for it to load a document or advance a page on a scanned document, especially if it contains many pages.  If you can find an alternative, don't buy it - unfortunately for me, I can's see any alternative if you want to manage scanned pdf files in a sophisticated way.Incidentally, this product seems living proof of the dangers of bloatware - it's pretty clear that the programmers have lost control of the software's innnards.Plus, by the way, support for this product is a scandal - $9.95 for each email sent?  Unbelievable</review_text>
Contrary to the advertising about runs on vista, what comes in the box may not run on vista. Upgrade now says you are up to date but it is not., However, you can use product id to download the real vista version. BEWARE the product license says "The software...is provided on as as is basis without warranty of any kind..."I had a major mess with Nuance's product verification process. When the product did start to run, it was not correct. To date I've been charged for two support incidents(maybe more billing will hit my credit card later) and I've logged 3 hours on the phone within the first two weeks as well as several emails. Otherwise I like the product but one should not have to have hours of grief and pay and pay to get it running the first time. I'll never by another nuance product.</review_text>
No Support. You have to pay $9.95 to send an email support question. Still cannot print annotations in PDF files that you create. There is a workaround. Nuance should change their name to Nuisance. I hope that someone comes up with an alternative</review_text>
I have been using Paperport since it came from my visioneer scanner for about 9/10 years and since then upgraded a few versions. After reading hyped-up product features of version 11 from Nuance website, I cannot justify upgrading my paperport software to PRO given its  current cost. I am pretty sure that a lot more people (especially loyal users like me) would snap it up if it was little cheaper. I will probably wait for some time for price to go down.... It will also need time to stabilize ( no patches yet !!!) and become compatible with Vista. For those of you who got lotsa money (please send me some), I would recommend Paperport as a decent doc managment s/w</review_text>
I have been a user of PaperPort since version 9, skipped the upgrade to 10 because of bad reviews, received an upgrade notice in the mail, so I decided to buy it. It turns out it was a bad decision. The scanner that I use with 11 is the same as with 9 and is on Nuance's hardware compatibility list. The problem is, it took me uninstalling and reinstalling the program to get the scanner to work at all with PaperPort. Then, when I did get it installed - and I used the advanced setup option with it, tested it, all looked good - except everytime I scan something, the program crashes! It is literally unusable as a scanning solution.I have seen a few companies with products that were once really good, sell it off to another company, and the product support seems to be essentially abandoned. It seems that this may be the case. There are no updates or bug fixes for 11, and I will not buy another PaperPort version in the future. I will attempt to go back to 9, and probably stay with that. If I run into any issues with it over time, I will look elsewhere, and I recommend others do the same. I normally don't write reviews for products, but this one is so poor, I just had to warn people</review_text>
I've used PaperPort for years mostly because it was the best of a bunch of poor options. However, Version 11 is buggier than earlier versions: every time I launch a Microsoft Office product, the PaperPort installer starts up.There is no reference to this in the PaperPort Help file or in the ridiculously inadequate knowledgebase on the PaperPort site. Another bug imprints a "trial copy" legend on your PDF files. This one is explained in the knowledgebase, but requires you to tinker with the Registry to correct it. That's a bit ridiculous. Why are they distributing code with a known bug?Nuance expects you to pay $9.95 for e-mail technical support - even if it's a bug in their own product.The product is a modest performer at best, but Nuance's awful technical support policies are the real sinker here.I've requested an RMA for a refund.Jerr</review_text>
I used version 8 of this product and decided to upgrade even though all the reviews here warned against it.  Boy are they right.  This thing is terrible.After installing on Windows XP SP2, as soon as I started the program it crashed.  Now every time I try to scan using my Canon Scanner, it crashes every time.Product is useless.  Wish I had of never bought it!DO NOT BUY!</review_text>
After having used this product since version 4, each version had its problems.  The latest version 11 has improved document indexing and searching - a LITTLE bit - over version 10.  It does NOT scan both sides of pages as it did in version 10.  The "Capture Assistant" crashes the program.  If you need support due to bugs in the program, you have to pay, and pay, and pay</review_text>
I am a little disappointed in the upgrade to Microsoft Office as it is not user friendly nor is it as accommodating as the earlier version</review_text>
I bought it, installed it, tried it, uninstalled it and returned it (of course I had to reformat my computer to get things back to the way I like them). Reviews say it was a big improvement.  Maybe so, but I have no desire to learn a whole new way of doing things again. I spent years learning keyboard short cuts and putting up with a product I thought was inferior to WordPerfect (how I would love to have the reveal codes option for formatting).Be prepared for a steep learning curve. If you use word a lot and are proficient, you will find it very frustrating. Menus are different, key combinations are not all the same. You can customize it, but to be honest, I don't care.Between Vista and Office 2007, I think Microsoft has finally screwed the pooch. I'll stick with the old versions (XP and Office 2003) for now. My next computer will be a Mac running OS X and some sort of open office application. I have had enough.</review_text>
I should have read these comments before ordering.  Got an OEM CD and a generic jewel box</review_text>
I was expecting the nero 6 ultimate all in one instead I received nero OEM Suite. The MPEG 4 encoder they claim is not included instead there is a thirty day trial. Better business bureau should be notified</review_text>
This review is for Turbo Tax Basic for Mac/PC 2005The software is easy enough to use but either out of curiosity or self abuse, I checked the results manually and found a round off flaw contained in the program.  If you are self employed and use Form SE (Self Employment Tax Form) the program fails to round "up" correctly.  The mistake favors the individual and not the Feds.  This is a math error and the IRS can red flag it.I remember several years ago I purchased the Deluxe or Premire verson and the program recommended that I might consider putting $300 into my IRA in order to lower my tax bracket, it was great!  However subsquent versions did not do this, after which I only purchase the Basic version.</review_text>
As another reviewer says:"But the final tax forms I needed to file with were not included on the CD-ROM package. TurboTax instructed me to get them by using "one-click update." Well after I update and attempt to restart the software, TurboTax refuses to come up at all."Exactly. I've re-installed it over and over and the same thing happens. I've used Turbotax in previous years and never had a problem like this. After spending hours entering in my data, there is apparently no way to get to the final filing stage. With four days before the due date, this is disasterous. Their support site offers no hint of a fix. Mac users, stay away</review_text>
This was my first time to ever attempt using a software program to file my taxes. TurboTax sounded easy enough. And it was pretty easy at first. The software interviewed me in an efficent manner and saved all of my information. But the final tax forms I needed to file with were not included on the CD-ROM package. TurboTax instructed me to get them by using "one-click update." Well after I update and attempt to restart the software, TurboTax refuses to come up at all. I can't speak for this software on Windows machines. But if you are using Mac OS X, I suggest you explore other options first</review_text>
The program does a great job in figuring my taxes. But now Intuit is charging for filing and the state program. Also I was unable to download the updates over my dial-up connection.  I called to have a CD version mailed to me but so far I haven't received it. I'm trying Tax Act this year. It is a free program and has free filing. IF I can complete the TurboTax version I will see if I can duplicate my return using Tax Act.  If so then good bye TurboTax</review_text>
I have used Turbo Tax for about 20 years and have loved it.  In the past it was user-friendly, efficient and complete - it even printed out all the forms I needed - ready to send to the IRS.As usual, I purchased it this year.The format changed and isn't nearly as user friendly as in years past.  You have to manually select the walk-through feature, section by section and it's very easy to miss sections.When I got to the end, it wouldn't let me do a review for errors until I updated the version.  But, I don't have internet at home and couldn't update.  It crashed my computer 3 times before I skipped the review totally.  (God only knows what else I skipped in the process.)When I went to print the forms - again it nagged me that the software was inferior and needed to be updated.  Again, I skipped it but the pages printed out with a nasty watermark saying the forms weren't updated and couldn't be used.  I can't use these.  I can't send them to the IRS.  So, I have to find IRS forms and manually insert the information myself.  So, why did I spend money for the software??Why would they sell a product that you can't actually use?  Yes, it'll "prepare" my forms.  But, what good is that if I can't print them out?Why would they sell a product that was already so obsolete that you can't use it without contacting the company for another version?ABSOLUTELY - RUN - DON'T WALK - RUN RUN RUN AWAY FROM THIS PRODUCT.  DON'T BUY IT because it simply doesn't work.I won't use Turbo Tax again.  They have lost a faithful and long time customer</review_text>
I kid you not, this suite,program,resource *THUG* IS THE WORST GARBAGE ON THE MARKET. Like others i read the shiny reviews and took a chance and purchasing it because of the frequent trips to HELL I had logged in with other so called "SECURITY SUITES" over the years. Works ok for about the first month or so and then...WHAMMMM..crash city. Think I'm joking...buy it and find out for yourself. I'm no PRO yet, but i do have enough knowledge about programming to know when my PC goes from( NORMAL to CHOKE) out of the clear blue. Uinstalled it (3X) just to make sure that it was the cause of the problem,sure enough,it was. Other reviewers mentioned thier processor being pulled to the grind...well it's true. STAY AWAY...STAY FAR..FAR..AWAY</review_text>
The most recent version 7.0 was sent via a downloaded upgrade to owners of this ZoneAlarm Internet Suit a couple of weeks ago and has been a nightmare.  The ZoneAlarm forums are filled with user's complaints.  This software is full of bugs, it has crashed user's OUTLOOK and OUTLOOK EXPRESS email programs, and we are unable to use our email.  ZoneAlarm customer service is the worst!  It took them 6 days to respond to my technical request email, and the response was canned and not appropriate to the problem.  I finally called their corporate office and was told "if you don't like the program uninstall it!".  If your want to speak to their technical support they charge $2.99 per minute, even if the problem was caused by them!  At this time the software remains not fully use-able, I have no email from OUTLOOK, ZoneAlarm has not owned up to the nightmare they have created with their users, and they are not responsive as to when a fix will be available. [...</review_text>
I've been a long time user of Trend Micro's PCcillin but after reading poor reviews on their latest version I decided I didn't want to take a chance on it so I went looking for different anti-virus software. I stumbled onto this ZoneAlarm (piece of junk) and after reading mostly wonderful reviews I down loaded their trial.  It didn't seem too bad. After a few weeks I bought this 3 computer suite and installed it. I went a while longer and notice my computer's performance was not as good as it was. I downloaded upgrades and uninstalled old versions and installed new.  Now after about a month my computer is practically unusable (as well as the kid's - they have been screaming about slow computer since the start).This zonealarm is the worst software I have ever used.  It hogs CPU and memory.  It gets the CPU usage to 80 - 100% and it doesn't free it up.  I shut down all programs and CPU just keeps churning away. The interesting thing is that at times I would check task manager processes and system idle would be 90% but when you check the performance tab the CPU chart would be near 100%?  Go figure! I finally said enough and uninstalled it (and deleted every occurrence of zonealarm out of the registry) and downloaded Trend Micro's pccillin.  It's installed and I got my old machine back.  Log-ins take 40 seconds were they would take over 3 minutes with ZA.  CPU is back to normal.  You couldn't give me this cr*ppy software.  I wish I would have stuck with pccillin and saved the $40</review_text>
I bought this product because of positive member reviews and and outstanding review in CNet. However, I just bought a new Dell Inspiron E1505 that shipped with Windows Vista Home Premium, and ZoneAlarm 6.5 is flat out incompatible with the new OS. I downloaded ZoneAlarm 7.0 and that is flat out incompatible as well. I'm sure this is a great Security Suite for Windows XP, but beware if you have Vista. There seems to be no update on their website when Zonelabs will release a Vista compatible ZoneAlarm. (They mention something about "after January 2007", but it's March, for crying out loud!) So there's my purchase price of a good product down the drain</review_text>
I purchased this product after reading many negative reviews on other products (my last Internet security product was PC-Cillin, I didn't renew because of the Low ratings for 2007). What I found was that an huge load was put on my processor, and system memory apparently because I use a program that feeds video over the internet from a network cam.  I never had problems like this before, and after some research on the ZA support site, I found other users who were having similar problems with their processors overclocking.  VSMON.exe seems to be the culprit, and is the main component of the Zone Alarm product.  Everything seems fine, as long as I don't try to use video over the internet(including IM webcams).  I would recommend thinking about if you intend on using webserver programs before making this purchase</review_text>
I bought a new PC last week and maxed it out with a gig of ram and 512 video card...Vista was preinstalled...These are the basic specs of the PC I have:AThlon 64 X2 dual core processor2 Gig memory DDR 2250 SATA HDDnot only did this thing run slow...I found out that a lot of my old software wouldn't work...what gives????I ran Company of Heroes (seemingly a surefire bet considering the upgrades) and that crawles like I was trying to run this on a minimum spec'ed machine...and mind u I bought this new AND did upgrades (an extra 250 dollars worth) so I wound up spending a nice part of Saturday reformatting the HDD and putting XP back on my machine and viola! I really get to see whta kind of power I am working with...for those of you thinking about going back to XP, do it and wait until Vista gets figured out...it's 250 dollar resource hog and it won't be on my machine for a little while...and while u are at it...please be sure to back up your drivers files...</review_text>
I bought the vista upgrade with my dell computer.  I tried to install and half way through the set up, after it had uninstalled my old programs, I got a message to abort.  The abort left me with a damaged media program, and thus far I have spent over $400 trying to re-connect damaged files and programs.  My best advice is to wait until Microsoft gets the "kinks" out of the vista program and then buy the upgrade</review_text>
I am very disappointed in Vista.  It took about 12 hours to install and now my computer is extremely slow.  I would absolutely NOT recommend it</review_text>
The Vista set up is nice but is buggy and incompatible with a lot of games and upgrades</review_text>
This maybe the worst interface I have ever had the displeasure of working with and that includes console applications with DOS interfaces. Edlin and fdisk are more user friendly than the McAfee's Security Center. There is noway to disable the software except by uninstalling the program or opening XP's admin tools and then forcing the services to stop, which is not a recommenable approach for the average user.Here is a short list of the probelms that I encountered. Counter Spy is cheaper, easier to use and has an interface that is user friendly!* cannot select to disable during non-internet use so I can run software that Security Center has conflicts with like ProTools 7.3 recording software.* the scan results are vague, ie returns 6 quarantined threats but doesn't display what the threats are and you can't print the result either.* There are more......There are some good features but the detractors win by a land slide.</review_text>
Much worse than previous McAfee editions.I dropped Norton on some older desktops due to its lack of support for W2000. I then went to the free edition of AVG anti-virus, which was OK but slowed things down. Thinking "you get what you pay for" I sprung for McAfee which has been OK in the past. The edition I purchased has 3 licenses.  I installed one of these on my wife's XP laptop as well as one of my desktops (luckily, she's still talking to me).The 2007 McAfee Suite makes AVG look like a free Ferrari. Absolutely terrible performance, coupled with a mediocre interface. Perhaps the only poorer-performing way to assure you'll never get a virus, spam, etc. would be to hit your motherboard with a hammer.This will slow down your computer (even worse, unpredictably). If you have lots of email in Outlook or Outlook Express expect to open your mail box, then have a long break before you can do a thing (as it rechecks everything for spam). There's a partial workaround for this, but users shouldn't have to search for workarounds. Every Web action now has noticeable latency -- as well as slower applications when McAfee is grinding away in the background.  If you liked your current anti-spam, kiss it goodbye -- McAfee may not let you keep it. McAfee (like Norton) is also difficult to remove from your system. What prompted this review? Today it appears the update process rebooted my computer without requiring a "yes" from me.As for alternatives, I wasn't able to get Kaspersky anti-virus to run on an older machine -- somewhare a remnant of Norton persisted (possibly a document tagged Symantec etc. left over from a day of working with them ages ago). However, I did get it running on a laptop and its better than Norton-McAfee-and even AVG in my opinion.So, consider Kaspersky or another vendor. If that doesn't work try AVG.It will be interesting to see how McAfee responds -- they've really shot themselves in the foot with this release</review_text>
I have used McAfee for at least 5 years. This 2007 Suite is a piece of trash. I takes soooooo long to find a site that IF it eventually finds it you forget what you were looking for.  At half the sites, if they are found, it will not allow me to progress into the site. In setting it up it insisted upon registering but never did tell me if the registration was completed; just kept blinking. I assume it was registered because it did update. I cannot get into half the sites I visit on a regular basis. It won't even find the McAfee site. Just sits there searching until it gives me a notice it can't find the site. Never will I buy another piece of software from McAfee. I should have read the reviews before I bought it but I had been satisfed with the previous version so I never bothered reading them. Dumb move on my part. Dumb one on yours if you buy it. Never again.</review_text>
As everyone else has said, this product is not at all what it should be.It slows down the internet browsing to a crawl (my laptop that has crashed several times, is several years older and runs wireless loads pages faster than my new computer with McAfee).You can't close it, as others have said, other than uninstalling.The funniest part I've found, however, is that it warns you the first time it tries to access.  Being amused, I refused the program permission to update itself.  Other than removing the program, it was the best thing I did using McAfee</review_text>
Buyer beware: this program will critically impair your system!  Internet loading will be drastically crippled.  Expect frequent system choppiness due to automatic downloading and background processes.  There is NO WAY to close McAfee to get around these drawbacks other than to uninstall.  I am going to return this first thing next week.  I gave them a few weeks to improve performance with patches and upgrades, but nothing has changed.  If only I had read the reviews ahead of time.Bottomline: if you don't mind these side-effects, by all means purchase this program;  McAfee has solid protection.  But there are easier ways to get that protection</review_text>
I had McAfee ISS 2006 and loved it.  I bought 2007 when my subscription expired.  Oh my dear God!! What have I done!!  The thing is complete crap. My computer is 1 year old with duel core chip and 2GB of memory.  This thing never crashed.  I loaded 2007 and it was crashing every 5 minutes!!  I could not get on the internet with my browsers.  McAfee was updating and Microsoft was reporting the serious errors with no problem, but forget about trying to get help from their website.  They have got to be kidding!!  I tried to uninstall it, forget about it.  I was able to get enough of it off so that my computer is able to access the internet and not crash every 5 minutes.  Thanks alot McAfee, you took a good product and turned it into crap and made a mess of my computer.  I downloaded a free firewall and AVG anti virus.</review_text>
I installed this on my laptop and it slowed it down to a crawl.  I deinstalled it , installed Norton 2005, bought the subscription Renewal and my laptop is back up to speed.You have been warne</review_text>
I didn't use this particular product but the version that came with my computer which was slow but not the end of the world. The problem I had with them is that they aoutomatically renew your subscription without giving any warning that they are going to do it. I had a 2-year subscription and they send me an e-mail 2 years later saying they charged my account with never telling me that I was in auto enrollment! When I called to complain they of course had someone who couldn't inderstand me and I had to spell my e-mail address THREE times and was told it would take 3-5 days for the refund to be processed which is crap because I work for an online store and its easier to void a sale and cheaper for the vendor to do a refund the same day! I asked for a manager TWICE, the second time they came back they had the nerve to ask me if I was interested in an upgrade and subscribing to their magazine, and was put on the never-ending hold until I gave up 37 minutes later which was probably the plan all along. SO I called my bank and put a stop payment on the automatic payment. Now I am searching for another protection program and calling their customer service before my purchase to see how it goes</review_text>
Do not use this product.  It is very hard to remove from your computer.  It is harder to install than Norton, and is an inferior product.  I will never buy their product again.</review_text>
This software is "One Time Use"! If you have a notebook and laptop, you won't be able to install for both!It sucks</review_text>
Yes, it's easy to install, configure and use. The footprint is small and it doesn't hog resources. That's the good news. The bad news is that this software's virus detection rate is abysmal and the company's tech support is worse. So, in short, don't *trust* it.Two examples, starting with tech support. After building a new computer, I had several blue screens (stop errors, BSODs) and my analysis seemed to indicate that EZ Antivirus was at least partially responsible. I emailed support with all the relevant info. Their (paraphrased) reply: "We understand that you are having Faults in Windows. This is because you have Windows installed. If you did not have Windows you would not have Faults. Thank you for contacting E-Trust." I should have that engraved on a plaque.Example 2, AV detection: When my subscription ran out, I uninstalled EZ and tried a demo of Kaspersky. It found 5 viruses on my computer that EZ never told me about. In this case, it's 2 strikes and you're out. Goodby, Computer Associates</review_text>
Like some of the other reviews, I loved cool edit pro. Then Adobe got a hold of it and royally screwed it up with 2.0. I use this program often and tried to give it a chance. No way around it, it sucks now. I am going to use Sonar, a much better product. The only thing I like about 2.0 is that you can burn to a disc from Audition. That is the only reason why I gave it one star. This is not a user friendly program</review_text>
I agree with the other reviews this is a horrible piece of software. I am a software developer and have written some serious applications in my career, and this one ranks at the bottom of the barrel.I have a stock Dell XP machine, and after a 15-minute install, Audition 2.0 crashes every time on startup. I never even got it to run. Tried calling Adobe support -- useless...waited 35 minutes on hold then hung up. Search of Google groups for answers revealed nothing, as did their support site.I *loved* Cool Edit 2000, and even Audition 1.5 to some degree. This new version is what happens when too many engineers get put on a project. It's a remnant of a once great application. Avoid it like the plague</review_text>
I wanted to make sure people who look at this product have a full understanding that Adobe Audition 2.0 WILL NOT install on a Windows 2000 Pro or Server operating system. Almost EVERY reference I have seen regarding OS requirements say Windows but not specifically Windows XP. The only exceptions have been on the Audition box itself and this Amazon listing (go Amazon). So if you are a Windows 2000 user understand that you will need XP for this product. If you can find a copy of Audition 1.5 you're good to go.I would say more about the product if I could actually get it installed but with the 12 PCs I use not a one has XP so I have a $300+ book end until I can upgrade (if you can call it that) to XP</review_text>
Adobe Audition is my favorite program. I use it more than any other program I have on my computer. I have used it to restore thousands of old phonograph discs. I am only giving them one star because I can't give them no stars for this joke.I knew this was going to happen. I had been using Cool Edit Pro for a long time when Adobe bought it and I knew that they were going to turn it into an Adobe product and screw it all up. I am very fortunate that I went to Adobes web site and downloaded the free trail version. I would have been really upset if I had actually paid money for this dog.Lets start with the boot up time. I own a 2 year old average laptop and Audition 1.5 used to boot in about 2 seconds. 2.0 takes 20 seconds. That is almost as long as Photoshop or Premiere Pro.Next we have the user interface. They destroyed it. And the old one worked so well. Adobe is really hung up about making absolutely everything a "Palette" and so now every little thing is a palette, allowing you to resize and relocate them to your hearts desire. But after about a half an hour of trying I'll be darned if I could not make the 2.0 interface remotely resemble the 1.5 interface.The shortcuts buttons have been removed (wow that makes a lot of sense), however you can get it back if you look long enough for the place to do it. (Don't bother to right-click anything, in their imperial wisdom right-clicking is now pretty useless.) But if you do put the shortcuts back up they are now all black and white and it is really difficult to find the one you want. In place of the shortcuts they added some icons that I have yet to figure out or to need. What are they thinking????A lot of the presets have been reconfigured and trying to figure them out gave me a headache.After several hours of playing with this pile of garbage I decided to uninstall it and return to using 1.5.</review_text>
If, like myself, you have many DX and VST plug-ins installed on your system, then Audition 2.0 is definitely NOT the choice with you.  Somehow, the idiots who made this junk have made it completely incompatible with 3rd-party plugs such as Waves Diamond Bundle.  Oddly enough, this was not a problem in earlier editions of Audition, or its former incarnation, CoolEdit.  But now, Audition crashes irrevocably when trying to use many VST and DX plugs (except, of course, the ones made by Adobe themselves.)Bottom line?  This software is crap.  Absolute crap.  If you're serious about audio production, go with Wavelab.  Heck, even free multitrack audio software like Kristal works better than this.If, for some reason, you absolutely need Audition, then go with an earlier, more stable version, such as 1.5.2.0 is about as useful as a football bat.</review_text>
I am not a bookkeeper. Without bookkeeping software I would be lost! I own a small business and help keep books for a friend's business. I have Quickbooks from 1996 and love it so I convinced my friend to get this newer version. I am very disappointed with the format and see very little similarity between them. Aarrrgh!</review_text>
This program is terrible to deal with.  I run a small business and bought QuickBooks Simple Start.  Once loaded and you go to use the program there is a pop up requiring you have an Administrator.  When loading the software it does not tell you to select or bypass the Administrator requirement.  You only learn this when you first go to use the program. The URL they give on the pop up for troubleshooting does not address this issue, either.  You are just locked out of the program.  Now it gets fun. So, you have to speak to them for help.  But this is where it gets to be no laughing matter.  To get help you have to email them to ask for help.  They then call you back at their convenience.  If you are busy working when they call back you have to start all over.  I have yet to be able to use this product since I bought it 3 weeks ago because they will not call back when it is convenient for me the customer and will not let me call in at my covenience.  Even worse, since they have bought out all their competitors QuickBooks customer support no longer is available after regular hours when a small business owner has the time to handle such operations issues.  I can't return this product for a refund because I have loaded it.  My first clue to how not user friendly this product is should have been the title: Simple Start</review_text>
I'm sure it's a good product for beginners, but I already had an older version of Quickbooks (from 1995) and the only way I could export/import the old data into a newer version of Quickbooks was with QB Pro.  Simple Start doesn't allow you to import data from older versions</review_text>
This is by far the most basic editing/creative package that I have ever used.  I have been using every version of Print Shop since some of their early versions.  I have Print Shop 22 and was haveing issues with printing in MS Vista.  I figured that I would be able to purchase one of Broderbund's similar products (one made for Vista) and it would be similar in style and usage.  Wrong.  I was not able to import other Print Shop projects, printing is limited, no drag and drop feature from other programs, limited editing, formating of text is off when copying from one document to another, sizing pictures and text boxes while editing projects is limited to dragging corners only, and on-and-on.  I tried to use Broderbund's tech support page, but it is very limited to their FAQ section.  Try asking a question or emailing for help; good luck.  I will fumble with this product for awhile (only because I can print more than one page at a time, because PS 22 in Vista only allows for this)and wait until the next compatible version of PS comes out for Windows Vista.  I would have thought there would of at least been a patch by now.  I think they may have made Zoom the way it is now to allow for newer, better versions.  I hope this helps...</review_text>
I was very disappointed in this software.  It's not really good for anything and I still haven't figure out why this was even released.  I own Printmaster 15, American Greetings Creata Card 8, and an few other photo and scrapbook programs.  This software has templates to make banners, cards, invitations, and all that stuff.  The templates are few compared to other programs and then to customize them, well you really can't.  If you try to start out with a blank template and add your own photos you are limited to what you can do.  No borders, edging, font manipulating.  It's just insert the photo, do some basic photo touch ups and that is pretty much it.  I wanted to add shadows, edges, frames to my pictures and couldn't.  The fonts could only be made in single color.  You could not add outlines or drop shadows, NOTHING.  Add the font, pick your size, pick your style, and that was it.  You can only save to their 1 file format which of course only works with zoom.  No e-mailing or file converting.  What good is this program I have yet to find out.  I spend time to make a birthday invitation from my own pictures.  Well guess what, I couldn't e-mail it to my guests.  Print is all it does.  Complete waste of money.  This is the first software I ever purchased that I will be returning.  Spend a few extra bucks and get something like Print Master, Print Shop, or something comparible</review_text>
I bought this product based on Consumer Reports review.  I've had Norton and McAfee in the past which slowed down my system.  My computer is slower to start up with ZoneAlarm, but faster than McAfee while on.  However, most of the time, I need to shut off ZoneAlarm in order to access the internet - just like another reviewer.  Defeats the purpose don't you think?  It also recognized my offices's software as a virus and although I allowed access, it keeps showing it as a virus.  I'm going to have to go to another product.</review_text>
The idea of being notified of every possibly suspicious action sounds good, but in practice ZoneAlarm is too intrusive for most home computer users. It seems to have bugs too, starting with an installation that initially wouldn't work on one of the computers on my home LAN. ZoneAlarm also seems to forget some actions that are allowed and supposedly remembered. I haven't gotten exasperated enough to buy another antivirus product and uninstall ZoneAlarm yet, but I'm close</review_text>
I am very disappointed in this program.  I have been doing my own graphics/cards for about 10 years.  I started with Print Shop (early edition) and progressed thru all the updates.  I then switched to PrintMaster and LOVED it!!!  Again, I have progressed to each new verion with very little or no problems...until now!  This has got to be the worst of the worst--- the program did not want to load without being babied.  When it finally loaded, it was very confusing and I found that I needed to get my graphics from the internet!  The area I live in only allows me to have dial up---you can imagine how long it takes to get the graphics I want!  If you are interested in doing your own graphics/cards, skip this program...go back to PrintMaster Platinum 16 for much better results.  As far as I am concerened, the River Deep Company needs to hide this edition in the DEEPEST RIVER they can find</review_text>
I've been using a Win 98 version of this software for years and the opportunity to upgrade to the XP version was tempting.However, it does not work at all in my portuguese XP.After searching for the misterious error code through the manufacturer's database I was informed that it does not work in non-english Win XP.All the previous versions worked fine in my PCs but this one was totally disappointing. Living in Brazil, I had to give up my money since the shipping costs were about the same value I would recover.Shame on them</review_text>
You've GOT to be kidding me.  The Fry's salesperson told me Microsoft Word couldn't print business cards and that I should buy this product to make high quality business cards.What an incredible lie.This is such a piece of junk.  It has almost nothing.  The cards look TERRIBLE, a total embarassment.  It's HARD TO USE, it's easier to make it in Word.LIES LIES LIES JUNK GARBAGE LIES LIES LIES</review_text>
I love PrintMaster.  I'm currently using PrintMaster 16 Platinum.  I have used many generations of this program with great success.  I have taught classes on creative desktop publishing and always recommended--even sold--PrintMaster, but this one is terrible!  Most of the images, even the previews, seem to be online and require a download which is very slow.  The thumbnails are low resolution and hard to see, so you have to download previews just to get a good look.  Most of the images can't be accessed at all, because there is a prompt for the intall/program disk.  There is no such disk.  There are separate install and program disks, neither of which satisfies the program.Encore, which now distributes the program, does not support it.  Broderbund does not not support it, except through its website which does not address this issue.  If you try to phone customer service, you pay for a call to get an automated response which sends you to another response which tells you to go to the website.Do not purchase this product without a money-back guarantee</review_text>
I've used Printmaster 12 platinum on DVD and liked it well enough but the disk wore out.  I knew from reviews of subsequent versions that Broderbund was giving us less and less but even still I was stunned by just how much less.  Where are all the projects?  Even counting the online projects there just isn't much here for anyone.  For kid's masks, version 12 has at least a dozen but this version gives you 2!  The cards are terrible - many are just small clipart images with a white background.  (At least you won't need much ink).  In short, if you want to create anything decent you'll have to design it yourself.  Inspired by the ONE nice-looking cut-out card, I was able to search the art work and create several nice cards that I would be pleased to send.</review_text>
I have used lots of PrintMaster versions I had some trouble with version 16 with the address book so I was happy to find that a new version was out and called to order they told me I wouldn't have a problem with the new one.  This new version is JUNK; all the projects have to be downloaded so if you don't have a high speed connection forget it!  I don't like the fact that you have to go on line every time you want to create a card etc.  I sent a note to customer service and just received a generic response.  So looks like I have to find new software</review_text>
Everyone uses office.  Everyone is familiar with office.  So why did MS change the interface to make it nearly IMPOSSIBLE to get anything done?  I am computer savy (I'm an engineer) and I find the new ribbon interface totally infuriating.  Worst of all there is NO way to go back to the "old" drop down menu system.  It honestly takes me 10x the time to get anything done with word/powerpoint because they've buried functionality behind these ridiculous ribbons.  MS claims that you will be able to be much more productive once you're familiar with the ribbons.  I don't know/care whether that's true or not.  The learning curve to get to the point of fluency with their new UI is immense.  So much so that the time investment to become proficient FAR FAR FAR out ways any "increase" in productivity....not to mention that it's overpriced.  Offce 2003 is a far superior product</review_text>
Never recueved the product.  Waiting for refund for over 6 weeks</review_text>
I just wanted to write a little note about getting the case open.  I just received my copy today, and in my excitement discarded the darn instruction on how to open......I know you're all probably thinking I'm just stupid.....after realizing what I did - I'd have to agree!  :)Anyway, if you pull off the "peel" tab and get rid of it - here's what you do:See that red tab at the top of the box/package?  Hold the case from the "spine" and pull the little red tab down.  I found it most effective if I used my thumb and index finger (I'm right handed) on the tab and placed my middle finger on the top of the spine, and pushed a little with my middle finger.  I've gotten so used to ink cartridges, and other items that have a "don't pull this yet" type of tab, I was a little afraid of touching it....until of course I finally found what I did with my "peel" notice and found I did need to pull on the little red tab.So that's all there is to it.  Again, most of you out there probably think I'm stupid - but for the one or two others out there that tossed that peel tab  - Enjoy.  I'm going to install tomorrow, and once I've used the programs I'll see about a real review then</review_text>
this item puts more spyware on the pc then it takes away do not bu</review_text>
The product was fine, but, I received an older version and as a result I couldn't properly update it even after registering it.  As a result, I purchased the newest version available directly from Lavasoft and it works fine and I have had no trouble updating it.  Why didn't you specify what version it was on your website; then I could have made an informed decision?</review_text>
Ordered version 1.06, but was sent v. 1.05. Lavasoft website will upgrade the old version if I send them my order number. However they will not accept an Amazon number. Amazon customer support said sorry, that they would accept a return and provide a refund.I will be more careful where I buy software in the future</review_text>
slowed a new system down too much when running in backgroud. Went back to free verison</review_text>
The updates are frequent and expensive. Good program, but it's not worth the trouble and expense of upgrading</review_text>
way to many problems with this version, if you want to replace all your printers, scanners, sound cards and so on, go for it.otherwise stay away</review_text>
The software requires a "patch"...not a big deal.Once I got the thing up and running my attention span was about 5 minutes.  The "goofiness" is a detriment and the aspect of trying to learn is hindered by the balance of trying to figure out how to use the software.It has a tutorial but that is a waste of time as well.If you are SERIOUS about trying to learn some basic conversational Spanish, try something else.  Don't waste your time or money on this one..</review_text>
Great product for what it does!  However, my experience with Quicken products such as Will Maker is that there are no updates.  You'll have to buy the next year's version to stay up to date for changes in your state.  At the end of 2007, the software is obsolete</review_text>
This program causes my computers to blue screen. Trend Micro has been contacted twice, but have not responded</review_text>
I bought PC-Cillin because it has 4 stars in Amazon rating, which is much better than McAfee and Norton. But I am wrong. Before installed PC-Cillin, everything is fine. But after installed, I can not access my yahoo email. After calling customer service two times, even uninstalled PC-Cillin, I still can not access yahoo email. Now I have to re-install Windows XP. It will cost me a lot of time. Anyone knows what wrong is</review_text>
This upgrade is a disaster. First of all, in Word, the view markups function is the default now, so you have to go through and change all the settings to hide markups (most people in my department do not want to see those distracting colors and balloons and do not need to edit the doc in any way). However, if you want to send a document that does not have the tracked changes embedded -- because you don't know which version of Word the recipient has, and you can't take the chance of them seeing all those comments -- you have to go through the document again, view markups, reject the comments, Accept Changes, and resave. It's kind of difficult to explain, and frustrating too. People think that if they can't see it, then the recipient won't be able to see it either.This is a good explanation from a Microsoft help forum:*Not displaying* tracked changes isn't the same as *not having* tracked changes. Even when using Word 2002, the changes were still in the documents, and anyone could see them just by turning on the display. All that has happened in 2003 is that the display is automatic. The way to have documents in which changes are not displayable is to remove the changes from the documents entirely -- and to do that you must *accept or reject* all the changes. Nothing you do with the view will be sufficient. If you need to retain a record of the changes, you'll have to maintain two sets of documents: one with the changes, which *never* leave your office, and another that has been "scrubbed" and can be sent out.Still, it's a big problem and more unnecessary work than 2002's version. Also, Outlook's new default view is quite different than before. The panes are set differently, so you have to go to View/Reading Panes to change the positions. And then you have to ungroup items (the breaks in between the weeks are very annoying...most people don't like that, although I guess some people think it looks more organized).Oh, Microsoft - can't live with it, can't live without it.Almost forgot...the buttons/icons are prettier in this version, and we all know that that makes a huge difference. Yessss! Pretty buttons! I can die happy now.</review_text>
The major flaw with this product is that it's not clear which version of Office you can upgrade FROM.Note: It does NOT work with Office SBE!!Various sources say various things, even the Microsoft site isn't helpful</review_text>
I discovered a bug in the program which seriously affects its integrity.Have been on the phone with Quicken techs numerous times and they finally acknowledged that there is a problem with the program and a patch (fix) needs to be developed.  So far though, they have not done it</review_text>
If you have not bought this yet, don't. If you have, but haven't installed it yet, don't.I've used Quicken for years, and this is the worst implentation yet. The major problem, an issue known to the company, is that reports will not print properly on many printers.Wait until they issue a fix before you use this product</review_text>
Well you certainly will be able to recognize words and answer the questions correctly, but if you're expecting to understand what the words actually mean...I wouldn't recommend this.I was able to answer the first seven chapters easily and get all questions right but I have no idea what any words in the sentence/caption actually mean.I've used it for a month know and I have no greater knowledge of Chinese than when I started....</review_text>
If you do not have a mediocre-level understanding of Chinese, stay away from this product.  Rosetta Stone has a very unique approach that might work for children under the age of seven (the critical language learning years), but for every other beginner in the language the software is almost impossible to use.  The object of the "game" is to match a Mandarin phrase (said aloud and written in pinyin) to a poor, pixellated photo.  For example, in the first section of the first lesson, you are shown a ball, an airplane, an elephant and a horse.  A phrase will be read and you have to match it with the correct photo.  It gets much too complicated after that.  Basically, it's a pure guessing game for most of the time.  I gave this product a serious evaluation even after reading the plethora of poor reviews.  I thought the unique style was interesting enough to give a chance, but I feel as though I wasted hours and hours.  I can remember only two or three words from the entire experience.  Although I have spent fewer hours on Pimsleur's Mandarin audio lessons, I am able to recall many, many more words and phrases.  Although Pimsleur's isn't perfect, it's definitely the best choice for a beginner (along with a solid Chinese-English dictionary).If you do not know well the basics of Mandarin, this software is completely useless.  Buy Pimsleur's instead</review_text>
This is the most god awful method for learning a language I have ever encountered. My jaw dropped when I saw that NASA and other government agencies were using this software in order to learn a foreign language. If that is truly the case then I demand my tax dollars back. It is THAT bad. The reason I gave this software a shot is because their marketing campaign has been asserting that it was the absolute definitive method for learning a new language. You're probably looking at it for the same reason.First, you should know that you can purchase a set of flash cards from your local bookstore and it is just as effective as any rosetta stone softare and costs 90% less.I used this software when I borrowed it from a friend in order to see if it was better than my current method of learning mandarin, which I'll get into later. I had an opportunity to make copies of this software when it was in my possession but decided against it. Not out of fear of piracy penalties, just plain because I would rather not have this software than have a copy of it. That's really how awful it is.Imagine if your parents tried to teach you English by only teaching you noun/picture association? It wouldn't work unless you learned about proper English grammar and proper syntax. If you learned about verbs and other things. This program will assume you know all your Chinese numbers automatically. In the very beginning a picture of a little girl will show up and it will verbally say 'one little girl' in mandarin... however it will not tell you which word means the number one, which word means girl, and so on. It's a guessing game, not a learning experience.All the positive reviews I've seen for any Rosetta stone software on amazing seem absolutely phony and fabricated to me (especially on the Rosetta Stone Japanese page). Please beware, and there is no better way to prove that what I'm saying is true other than trying a demo for yourself. I am sure that it is as bad as the full retail version that I used for a week.The absolute best method I've used for learning mandarin has been pimsleur's audio cds. (I've never tried berlitz and pimsleur's other competitors, but I'm sure they are better than Rosetta stone). I have used Mandarin I and II so far from pimsleur, and I am able to hold impressive conversations with other fluent speakers of mandarin. The great thing about it is that pimsleur explains everything to you, allows you to say it out loud, there is no brute memorization involved with pimsleur, only natural language assimilation.Just ask yourself this, when you learned English as a child. Did you learn    by learning how to read and write first? Or did you learn how to speak and listen first? Didn't you learn syntax first and then use what you learned to formulate your own sentences? That's exactly how pimsleur has taught me mandarin. I was surprised how I was able to create my own grammatically correct sentences with pimsleur only a few lessons in.Go ahead and try a demo of any Rosetta stone language. It should be enough to keep you away from Rosetta stone in favor of any of their competitors.I've heard good things about berlitz and others, but pimsleur in my opinion is the absolute best.</review_text>
You've got to be kidding me. There is no English translation, just pictures and Mandarin phrases.How are people suppose to figure it out without a straight forward english definitions or explanation for each phrase?They're suppose to be teaching Mandarin to an English speaker, not some boy raised by wolves who never knew any language.This is retarded. Worst product ever.</review_text>
Their approach might work for other languages, but for Chinese it's critically important to understand the grammar of the language, which Rosetta Stone never explains. It simply displays four pictures at you, with some incomprehensible (to a beginner) Chinese near them, and you have to learn to match incomprehensible words with the pictures. I've taken Chinese for two years, and I still found it impossible to learn anything from it. I either knew the words already, or I couldn't learn whatever it was they were trying to teach.I would be happy with just a videotaped lecture of a Mandarin college course, but I can't find anything like this for sale or free online</review_text>
I liked the software itself.  Being the first year I used it, I thought I'd start being a regular TT customer.Then it was April 17 2007 and I tried to e-file.  The servers would not respond ALL DAY. There were no admins to be reached on the support sites or the forums (except for one who said "I don't know what is the problem and I have nothing to tell you").One major failing with this software is that it cannot AUTOMATICALLY try to connect.  If it fails, it says "try again in 10 minutes".  Which I've had to do all night.Now - I will miss my tax deadline and have spent 6 hours at my computer trying to get connected.  Mail is not an option now as my car is gone.This is a major failure of the company and an utter lack of support, since their officials apparently couldn't be bothered to come in to work on tax day to offer us any solutions.I will not buy again.</review_text>
This is a product that is dependent on constant upgrades because the most current version of the 2006 tax forms are often not available when it first comes out.  That is the nature of the product.However, for the third year in a row, many Macintosh users have run into problems with their automated online form upgrade process.  If the automated upgrade process does not work, you can do the upgrade manually, but that is a somewhat complex process.  Alternatively, you can order a snail mail version of the upgraded program, if you can ever get through to the phone number you have to call.  They always seem to be encountering a large volume of calls no matter what time you call.Its a great product once you get it upgraded to contain the most recent version of the forms.  I wonder if the automated upgrade process works for Windows users?  At any rate, until they fix the automated upgrade process, an important part of the software, I have to rate it as low as possible</review_text>
Having used Turbo Tax since 1990 I feel that I am qualified to comment on it.I have also used Quicken, Quicken Deluxe, Quicken Home & Business, QuickBooks Pro 2003 & QuickBooks Premier Contractors Edition. The Turbo Tax product seems to get more user UN-FRIENDLY each year.  The navigation features do not allow as much mobility thru the program as they did in the late nineties and early 2000's.  Like I said I WAS using QuickBooks Pro 2003 until tax time last year.  I purchased Turbo Tax Home & Business like I had for the past 4 years, and really got a shock when I found out that it would not import my data from QuickBooks Pro 2003.  Three year old software that was not compatible with Turbo Tax in 2006(actually 2005 tax year).  I ended up purchasing QuickBooks Premier Contractors Edition 2006($280+) in order to upgrade just to get my taxes done.  Intuit in my opinion is a perfect example of major corporate greed.  I am done with them and will purchase TaxCut this year</review_text>
Mutual fund basis calculations are broken,  updates fail on the mac.  Not to mention no state in this edition.  It's absurd how many different versions of TurboTax there are this year.  It almost takes longer to try to figure out which one to buy than it does to do your taxes.  I'm done with TurboTax, switching to TaxCu</review_text>
Have used TurboTax for years with no real problems.  The low rating is due to the following:Bought this in a store and discovered later when trying to download the state that it is FEDERAL ONLY!  If I had known that I would have ponied up the extra minor $ in the store rather than the extra $30 for download.Last year the state was included with this version - this year Intuit's new fine-grained tiering of their product line ripped me off!Also, the price for this product is way too high, and the lack of an upgrade path is (pay less if you are a loyal customer) completely sucks.  Intuit almost lost me a couple of years ago when they introduced product activation.  They are in serious danger of losing me again</review_text>
I have 3 computers with different expiration dates for the installed Norton anti-virus programs.  I purchased the 3-pack and installed it into the computers as the old subscriptions expired.  I then found out that the clock for the 3 units started when the program was installed into the first computer.  When I contacted Norton, they acknowledged that it was designed that way and gave me a code to enter into the three computers in order to increase their protection to a full.  When the code was entered into the first computer the clock increased to 1 year in that computer.  Norton would not allow the code to be entered into the other 2 computers.  I will never purchase another Norton product</review_text>
Extremely difficult to unistall. Endless loop. Do NOT buy this product or if you do then be prepared for an exremely fustrating experience. I will never use NAV again</review_text>
This program works after it's installed, but the installation process is unbelievably flawed.  If you have a version of Norton on your computer already, this may cause all kinds of problems with the new installation.  Not only did I have to uninstall all versions (after Norton lets you install the new one), but I had to make a bunch of changes to Windows, also.On top of that, while you're struggling to install (I got it on to one computer easily, a second with some difficulty, and the third... well, it's been several days of struggle), Norton counts down the number of days in the subscription.  So if you install on one computer today, and another two months later, then your subscription on all your machines still expires a year from now.I don't see how Symantec can put out a program that doesn't allow you to upgrade easily... after all these years, they can't fix this major bug?  That's just pathetic</review_text>
I spent 3 days trying to get this installed.  I think the complication was that I had Norton Systemworks 2005 and wanted to add the NAV 2006 on top of it.  Well I finally got it done, but not until I'd restored my system to a backup from before I'd installed NSW 2005.  At that point I had NSW 2003 installed.  I had to manually uninstall that and remove tons of entries from the registry.  Norton's automated uninstall failed over and over so I gave up on that and did it by hand.  Then I installed NSW 2005 with NAV.  When I went to install NAV 2006 it was unable to uninstall the old version.  So I had to restore the system again.  This time I installed NSW 2005 without NAV.  I was then able to install NAV 2006.  It is working now.  It just shouldn't be this difficult</review_text>
Bought the 3pack for home use.  Installed it on two pc's and then had defective a defective new pc that it was installed on and removed.  NOW, it won't let me activate on the new computer - their system is flawed!!!!  They want me to mail in original invoice, unlock code and disk and THEN they'll see what they want to do.  This will all take at least 2 to 3 weeks, in the meantime there is no protection on this computer.  HAAAAA!They really need to have a specific code for each activation so that it updates to the active computer it is being used on - they really could figure this out.  They're taking the easy way out and getting more $$$ in the process.This combined with all other slow down issues, I'm switching to ZONE Suite, as I've used Zone Alarm for years and it is great.Best of luck</review_text>
Bought this 3-pack about 2 months ago (three computers at home) and worked ok- no viruses. Then I did what I thought was a clean install of XP Pro from XP Home on one of the computers, and it carried over a lot of garbage from XP Home I wanted to get rid of, but that's another issue (clean install?}. After installing XP Pro, I was warned I didn't have virus protection and so I tried installing my NAV again. You would think at some point NAV would have enough brains to try and establish that this was a Windows upgrade, and that the NAV was legitimate. Nope- fatal error and computer lock-up, which I was able to survive. No contact opportunity at the Symantec web site.I simply opted for Microsoft's recommended anti-virus software- Computer Associates. Another twenty. Then I had a heck of a time uninstalling NAV, which wouldn't install and now wouldn't uninstall. What a waste of time and money. Who creates these viruses? We certainly know who benefits from them.There is really nothing you can do- they are immune unless they hurt someone with media clout. This little note means diddily, but thanks to Amazon anyhow for the opportunity to say something.</review_text>
This program is causing many people difficulties.  I had to make two seperate calls to customer service.</review_text>
I have a recently purchased Acrobat 8.0 Professional. It installed fine on my new Vista machine, although it cites only Office 2003 products. But I have MS Office 2007.  After installation (and reinstallation) no Acrobat conversion options show on MS Word, and when trying to use Acrobat directly for an MS Word file conversion it first reinstalls itself, and then reports that the Word file (I have tried several) is corrupt.I now have to ask colleagues with older software to do my PDF conversion.I could not find out if or when Adobe plans to be compatible with Vista and Office 2007</review_text>
The first order I received for Italian 1 and 2  had defective disks, which were not replaced by the manufacturer when I called their customer service.  When I re-submitted my complaint to Amazon, they immediately sent me a replacement of the whole set. However, these disks also are very slow to load on my new MacPro laptop, and quit at times. I am not able to recommend Rosetta Stone</review_text>
I bought this as Christmas present for my daughter who will be traveling to Italy this spring as part of a College course she is taking, and she will be spending a semister there next year as well ... She just called me for school to help her resolve an ERROR in the installation: The install reaches 100% then states it has encountered an ERROR, and quits. It remains uninstalled and is thus far UNUSABLE. An awefully expensive piece of plastic that does NOTHING. As a Senior Software Engineer I'd have been fired for less ... The RosettaStone WebSite/Knowledgebase offers NO information on this</review_text>
I specifically bought Turbo Tax Premier because of stocks sales/purchases we made in 2006.  The section on stock income was confusing and it took me several times to figure out what information Turbo Tax wanted where.  When I thought I had it figured out and finished that section, I thought I would repeat it to make sure I did it right.  To my surprise, the second time I entered the information I received a different total than the first time.  So I did it a third time.  The third time matched the second, so I figured it must be right.  Then when I got to the section for error checking, I was told I had errors in my stock sales.  So I did it a forth time, which came out the same as the second and third time.  This time it passed the error checking, but instead of showing that we had purchased the stocks, Turbo Tax showed we had "inherited" the stocks.  I could not get Turbo Tax to change, so I printed out the form scratched out "inherited" and put in the date of purchase.  I would rather do my taxes by hand than use Turbo Tax again</review_text>
I have been using Turbo Tax for years just as I jave used Quicken for years.  One of the big plusses for me was It's Deductible, a program that places values on items you give to charities and imports directly into Turbo Tax.It's Deductible was a stand alone program until 2006 when it went to Intuit for online entries.  You could not longer buy the program to install on your PC.  This would have been OK but then Intuit would not allow you to see the values placed on donations until you purchased Turbo Tax.  Intuit thinking of the bottom line rather than the customer.  I hated that and told Intuit my feelings - no response as I expected.  But what the heck, I entered my donations through 2006 and when Turbo Tax 2006 came out I purchased it from Amazon for a good price.After installing Turbo Tax I went to see what my donation values were and to import the values into Turbo Tax from my online entries.  Nope - No can do.  Not only was It's Deductible buried in Turbo Tax with a very clunky and slow link to start the program but there was absolutely no way to import.  After much searching on Intuit's support pages - always a chore - I finally found a page explaining - no import.  But if you like you can get a voucher to unlock the online values and then manually re enter the information into Turbo Tax!  What a crock.  On top of that using It's Deductible and Turbo Tax slows my duo core PC to a crawl.  I will look elsewhere next year</review_text>
You can try this for free for up to 60 days by registering with Microsoft and downloading an evaluation copy. When you're sure you want it, permanently activate it with the product key you get in your Amazon package.The new version of Excel has two huge advantages:1. It removes the old 256 column/65,536 row limitation.  You can now have 16,384 columns and more than a million rows.2. Excel 2007 can use all the cores/processors in your computer (or you can restrict it to use only some, so huge background calculations do not tie up your machine).  On my dual core computer, Excel 2007 is **way** faster than 2003 at almost every task.I've seen no crashes, hangs, or hiccups.But everything else about Excel 2007 is frustrating.  The new "ribbon" interface is unnecessary and awkward -- almost every operation takes more pointing and clicking than older releases. Bypassing the ribbon with the new "Quick Access Toolbar" is problematic because (bizarrely) Microsoft has deleted many distinctive command icons, leaving them with identical green circles.Right now Excel 2003 costs more than Excel 2007.  If the two plusses don't help you, you may think that 2003 is worth more</review_text>
I excitedly upgraded to Office 2007....'07 Outlook is FAR slower - ties my reasonably powerful machine up in knots (110% of resources) for minutes at a time inexplicably; spell ck doesn't work consistently; HTML emails have lost functionality I used to use often with 2003 ver; Excel opens MUCH more slowly; no real gains in Excel fuctionality; various add-ins essential to my biz no longer work in Excel 2007; Access 2007 was billed as much easier to use - FALSE; Word has a couple of improvements but messes up spell ck with Outlook if you keep both Word 2003 & 2007 on yr machine; the highly touted "Ribbon" is mainly cosmetic; I believe 2007's indexing is at the heart of some of sluggisness which might be ok if it worked..but it retruns strange results....NET, NET, I am uninstalling Office 2007 and going back to 2003 with all its stupid faults....it's too bad no one at MSFT actually uses thier products to realize how defective they are.</review_text>
Normally I might wait to install a new software upgrade, but I just got a new laptop and thought it would be best to use Office 2007 with the new Vista operating system. I was wrong.You would expect that a multi-billion dollar company like Microsoft could put out a powerful and bug-free piece of software. But after a month of using Office 2007, you get the distinct impression that this software is not ready for public release. Microsoft should be ashamed.I don't know the root cause of my problems, but I have to stress that I am running a clean install of Office 2007 on Vista, so there shouldn't be any software conflicts or issues.So what are my issues? The list is long:-- My biggest concern is that MS Word constantly hangs and stalls. It can making editing a document very painful. I suspect the problem is when I put images or Visio diagrams into a document. But that is something the old MS Word was able to do without an issue. Oddly, if I have a colleague open the document and save it out in Word 2003, the problem goes away! What?! It's killing my productivity.-- When ever I cut and paste from an old document, Word hangs for 15 to 20 seconds. And often the formatting and margins in my new document go haywire. I keep having to spend a ton of time fixing things. This never happened in the old Word. This is another time killer.-- Every few days, Outlook 2007 starts telling me that it cannot display my email folders. Uh oh! I have to completely restart my computer to see my email again.-- Outlook 2007 breaks many graphic emails that people send -- they look like a mess. It is because Outlook 2007 does NOT render HTML correctly since it uses the Word engine, not Internet Explorer to display email. I have no idea why Microsoft did this, but they have got to fix it.-- Many of the issues in the old Word 2003 still haven't been fixed. If you place an image, it can often be hard to get it to appear correctly. Why can't they solve this one?-- While most Office programs have the new ribbon interface (which I like), some programs like Visio 2007 do not. So you have to remember how to use two interfaces. Couldn't Microsoft find the time and money to update ALL its programs? Give me a break.-- On a few occassions in Visio 2007, my files have failed to save correctly. At first I thought this must have been my fault, but it's happened to me a few times and can't be a coincidence. A few times I've gotten an error message and lost my work. Ug.-- Word and Excel 2007 use a completely new file format. So anyone you send a document to has to have 2007 installed (which isn't likely the case). To get around this, you can save it down to a 2003 file format, but then you end up with two files on your hard drive -- one in the new format and one in the old format. What a pain! Also, there definitely seems to be an issue with Office 2007 opening older Office 2003 files. Could be the cause of many of my problems, but there is no way I can avoid using old files. They should have worked harder on compatibility.There are good things about the new 2007. I do like the new interface design and the new features in Outlook 2007 are amazing for organizing tasks and sharing your calendar.But I don't think it's fair that Microsoft released a product so full of serious, serious bugs that have cost me hours and hours of extra work. I didn't spend hundreds of dollars on a beta product and don't think the public should have to suffer. Surely they can afford to do better!NEW ADDITION TO MY REVIEW:Today I discovered that I can no longer paste Excel charts into Word like I used to. When I try, the chart goes in, but any bars/lines disappear.</review_text>
I'm good with computers and have used other architectural software, and this was most disappointing.  In fact, if I had not bought this on Amazon, I would have returned it to the local retail store with huge complaints.  It was difficult to install--buggy.  It had problems rendering a drawing and would often lock up.  The "objects" that you pull from its library can sometimes be opened and resized--and sometimes cannot.  Hardly intuitive at all.  Also disappointing was the way multiple stories did not synch up.  I had reasonable expectations for this software, but wish I had bought something else.  For $10 it would be a good purchase.  For anything over that, you are wasting your money.  Try another product, a demo first, or something.  But in my opinion this was a big waste of money</review_text>
This software is very hard to use. The help video goes too fast, the manual doesn't cover everything and nothing is intuitive. I have used a lot of software and this is just not worth the money</review_text>
I was so excited to get this! The terrain on our lot has quite a slant to it because we're on a hill. My husband and I thought this would easily help us create a materials list for our retaining walls that we wanted to put out front. Long story short... I spent hours (at least 40) getting the dimensions of our house correct and trying to get the yard right. We even rented a surveying instrument to determine the slope of our yard to input elevation points. MANY hours wasted... the software does not let you set the height of the retaining walls and it inputs random walls and pieces of wall in the 3-D view that you can't get rid of. The flowers are hard to place, they don't end up where you want them.  Besides, the "Plant Chooser" doesn't have hardly any perrenial plants to choose from.Bottom line: I spent $50 in software costs and $50 for a surveying instrument and ended up having to calculate the wall length and height manually.  If you have a flat lot, this might work well for you.  For anyone that has hills, or slopes to their yard, Good luck!</review_text>
I work for a software company so I know a little about the user interface concept.  This is one of the worst packages I have ever used.  I just spent an hour trying to draw my house and get the dimensions right.  The automatic dimension builder did not work.  I had to draw it, and redraw it to get the dimensions right.  Then I added a few windows and doors, and 2 porches. Then I tried to use the camera to get a vertical view.  The whole file blew up - can't find it anywhere.  The manual is useless, and the tutorial CD is just an overview of each topic.  What a waste of moeny</review_text>
Do not waste your money!  I consider myself pretty computer savvy, but this software is not easy to use.  You'd have an easier time just drawing out your ideas by hand.</review_text>
This is the worst software I have ever worked with, everything is difficult and some things are impossible to create.</review_text>
I have moderate knowledge of computers, etc. and I found this overly complicated.  This is not intended for the novice.  However, even if you are not a novice it seems to still be a waste of money.  I wish I had not bought it at all.  Perhaps it has secrets and treasures I am not aware of...but the directions are complicated and it would be by chance that you would ever discover them.  Save your money...this was a waste</review_text>
This product is an absolute piece of junk. Do not buy this product. Will not even load properly onto computer. Have wasted several hours trying to install product on windows XP platform with no success. I have wasted a whole day trying to install this piece of junk on my computer, now I will probably waste another day trying to return this bunch of garbage to the vendor.</review_text>
This game can get very boring. It's very confusing and hard to control. It is sooooo frustrating!!!!!!!!! The instruction booklet doesn't come in handy either. Like some other people, I only got rabbits too. I bought this game because I wanted to heal cats and horses. But, only rabbits came. Buying this game was a big mistake. It is reallly no fun. Don't waste your money on this game. I gave up about a month ago. I've left it on the shelf and haven't touched it since.</review_text>
When I got this game, I was very excited to play it. But when I played it, I was very dissapointed. The game was very confusing, and hard to control. Sometimes, I couldn't get my person to go where I wanted it to go. Learn from my mistake. Don't waste your money on this game.</review_text>
I got this game because I thought it would be fun. I was totally wrong! Every customer that I got brought only rabbits. Rabbits, rabbits, rabbits!!! This game confused me a lot. Also, it gets very boring. And, it's very hard to control. Don't waste your money on this game! It will be a total waste of your money. Believe me</review_text>
Conceptually this is a great game, especially for a child with visions of being a Vet. You (can theoretically) learn about animals, their care and health issues. Those 2 stars for overall are basically for the concept and little else.Unfortunately the general usability of this game, vis-à-vis lousy controls, is quite low. It's nearly impossible to move the character at times, which results in stressful failure in the game. It crashes. It can't remember simple settings like, leave the terribly loud and obnoxious music off.Playing this multiple times with my 6 year old always goes from excitement to frustration (bordering on tears more than once as a bunny gets woefully ill while your character is comically stuck bouncing between the sofa and ottoman).Once going you can engage your child by "studying" the books you've bought. Also, as you analyze the patients you learn about ailments as well as the treatments. That is all good stuff, but on whole the game is too frustrating to enjoy.One final note, this is the first time I've ever bothered to review any product.</review_text>
I was very excited to get this game.  I did read previously written reviews. My 13 yr old daughter wants to become a veterinarian someday and loves spending time on the computer, so this just seemed like the perfect Christmas gift.  Alas, the game has many faults that does interfere with the game being enjoyable!  I should have listened to the reviews.....The game is extremely glichy!  It makes playing it very hard and frustrating.  My daughter tried for one week and has given up.  The characters get stuck and just stand and vibrate on the screen until you start the game over.  Sometimes she will play for a half hour before it starts up and sometimes it does this right away.  VERY DISAPPOINTING.Also, some internal setup issues of the actual CD is that it works better running from the disk then saving it to the computers hard drive.  We have a pretty new computer, we have windows XP - this program just doesn't run well off our computer anyway.  We have other games that don't have this problem. In fact my son got a game - building machines and inventions - and it doesn't have any of these problems and actually requires more from my hard drive.Also, my daughter complains of some of the limitations within pet vet that don't allow her to change.  You have to pay a specified amount to hire an employee and the employee in this game is a slouch - there are no other choices when hiring staff, no wage choices, you can't get this employee to work or and you cannot hire anyone else.Overall because of the gliches in the game, she hasn't been able to play it to the programs full potential and has given up....so the idea is great.. but the makers should have looked at this better before taking the consumers money and putting it on the market.  I cannot find any fixes or downloads online to repair it either.  BIG BUMMER!!!  BEWARE!  JUST DON'T BUY THIS ONE, LOOK ELSEWHERE</review_text>
After being greeted with much excitement, this program wouldn't properly install on my not-so-fussy computer.  The web assistance was of little help at all and we had to send it back.  Very disappointing</review_text>
I am a retired senior software engineer (web development).  I've used many antivirus/malware packages both at work and at home.  This is the ABSOLUTE WORST.  After installing it, I got popup virus alerts from BitDefender every 10 seconds.  No kidding.  I couldn't believe it.  I previously had a copy of Norton AntiVirus 5 on my computer which is highly reliable (not like the latest version).  I tried BitDefender based on the reviews below which were obviously written by people with less than standard operating systems.  I use a PC with Windows XP SP2 and IE6 (IE7 is still buggy).  Although multiple runs of BitDefender show absolutely no viruses or malware on my system, I continue to get these popup "virus alerts" every 10 seconds when I browse the internet, which is way more irritating than anything Norton ever did to my computer.  In addition, it drags my computer to almost a screeching halt when I go to a web page I haven't been to in more than a day, sometimes even the ones I just went to an hour ago.  I find this truly irritating and went to BitDefender's website and tried their online chat.  "Jack" was completely worthless.  He told me to completely wipe out my cookies, as well as a lot of other useful files for no apparent reason other than he's probably not named Jack, but something like Vishnu and this was the first thing on a long list of things to tell people to do.  Very useless.  Not recommended for anyone.  Try to get an old copy of Norton Antivirus 5 and pay for the update feature ($20 per year).  Much better than this garbage.In addition, there are virtually no options to customizing this product.  You're stuck with what they think is necessary (like automatically deleting internet files you may need--like shopping carts).  It literally cripples your computer.</review_text>
I made the unfortunate mistake of reading fantastic reviews for this product and trying it out myself.  I went online and purchased the program, downloaded, and installed on my pc.  Installation worked perfectly. I ran a scan and it even found viruses that Mcafee missed. However, any program that used the internet now freezes or takes forever to load. After closing web browsers I have to restart before my PC recovers.  I unistalled the program and now everything works great.  I'm shopping somewhere else for my Antivirus needs</review_text>
I'd give this no stars but it won't let me.Why would anyone buy this? I was in Compusa today as they are closing down on Long Island & thought about buying this. I put it down & said I will researh this more at home. As I suspected, you can go to [...] & do the same thing that this software does. The software doesn't allow you to print stamps at home so what's the point? The only plus is that you get a sheet of free stamps, so it's like buying a [...] coupon, that's a one time use. I don't get it</review_text>
I brought the software beleiving that it would help me with my scrapbooking.  It has very limited graphics and templates to workwith.  I would not recomend this software package.  Also the journaling sucks as well.  Even when you start a product from scratch the software isn't user friendly with very little guidence. As stated before 1 star is to much.</review_text>
Complete waste of money.  I purchased my copy at Wal-Mart but wanted to warn others before they made the same mistake I did.  The graphics and templates they use on the package to lure you in are nice and tasteful.  The actaul program is SO not like that.  The graphics are down right cheesy, and low budget.  Having only paid $9 for this program, I feel like I was completely ripped off.  I'll for sure be calling the company and asking for a refund. 1 star seems like too many to give this awful item</review_text>
This software is a waste of money to say the least. The templates on this software are terrible and ugly. You are lucky if you have five good templates to choose from. If you are looking for something quick and easy to use this is not it.You have to format everything. Please don't make the same mistake I made. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT</review_text>
If you read the license, you find that you probably give away rights to anything you use in a comic book.  It also looks like you can't give away copies of comics you print, certainly can't sell them, and can't let others copy them.Unless you want your child's face on a cereal box without your permission, you probably don't want this software</review_text>
This program is limited to a few word bubbles and sound effect fonts.It is difficult for a novice to understand how to get his or her own pictures into the comic. The word bubble sdo not rotate, so they could be pointing anywhere except where you want them to.It looks really great on the cover of the CD, and that's what sold me.It was a disapointing christmas</review_text>
Once again QuickBooks dangles promises to us Mac folk that just don't add up. If you're like me, your accountant and bookkeeper are on Windoz - that's why I was psyched when I thought I would really be able to share my Mac QB files with them, and vice-versa. Mistake #1 - I give my bookkeeper a backup from QB 2006 before I updated to 2007. BIG mistake. QB is not backward compatable. So when my bookkeper sent the file back to me in Mac format, (after spending hours updating it), I was not able to import it into QB 2007. To me, this is nuts. But the helpful tech person we spoke with, suggested that even if it had been '07 this sharing business between Mac and Windows versions is sort of a one time deal. This wasn't intended to be a back and forth thing, between Mac and Windows. Huh? So what's the point?  Here's my work-around: I bought a used XP box on eBay and am trading my Mac '07 for Windoz '07.</review_text>
We have used QuickBooks on a PC since the 1990's.  We loved the way Inuit made accounting accessible for people without degrees in accounting.  QuickBooks for Mac is TERRIBLE in comparison.  If you plan to use the payroll features, it is unusable.  QuickBooks Mac payroll redirects you to the internet, where it is handled by PayCycle (an independent company).  Payroll is not integrated at all in the Mac (instead import/export operation). On the PC, it is part of the QuickBooks application.  We could not get job costing to work, and the tax calculations made no sense.  We were paying TONS of money to PayCycle, so fortunately the taxes were filed automatically.  We finally reverted back to QuickBooks for Windows and are MUCH happier with Intuit handling our payroll</review_text>
I imported from Quicken for Mac to Quickbooks Pro for Mac and after 3 weeks of trying to make the result work, I gave up. The interface is far less intuitive than in Quicken (for example, entering vendor names by typing the first letters then scrolling through the choices with the arrow keys as in Q) does not work in QB, forcing one to guess at the exact vendor name the first time; and the imported names and addresses do not go automatically to vendors if they have been paid, and customers if they provide payments; rather they all go to an 'other names' list that, with a thousand or two names in it, cannot be simply dragged to the  correct list; rather each one has to be edited individually. When I started forming invoices and quotes for customers, I found that QB would forget the customer's address, sometimes including it and other times yielding a blank field. Also the field lengths in QB are often shorter than in Q, resulting in incomplete import of memo fields. In addition, export capabilities are negligible; one can only export transactions and other details in a proprietary format that can't be used elsewhere, unlike Q which exports in a readable and massageable format. Overall it seems that QB has been written by a different company than Q, and to a large extent the programs are not compatible even though the import from Q to QB appears at first viewing to work OK. It is better to start a new financial year with new software and enter all data in again by hand rather than try to make QB use Q data, in my view. I have switched to MYOB AccountEdge at a rather higher cost, and find that this clean start at the financial year beginning works OK for me. The MYOB product is a little clunkier than QB with more fields to fill in and numbered accounts all over the place, and its Q import is a total joke (with repeated questions on where to allocate accounts for each transaction without an explanation screen) so that import of any more than 10 transactions becomes laughable) but its export abilities are wonderful and I think its inventory control is better than QB; also, it has not yet lost invoice addresses the way QB did on me. One has to input addresses in fields before memorizing tranactions however otherwise the memorized transactions in MYOB don't update. I have found that MYOB is about as intuitive as Q when it comes to entry of payee fields etc; while QB has lost that data entry ease entirely. QB may have an advantage if your goal includes payroll however; MYOB seems to have a pretty sad service unless you are prepared to pay all of the taxes yourself.</review_text>
When I considered purchasing this product, I was confused to see that some people thought it was great, and others thought it was terrible.  I couldn't understand why there were such discrepancies in the reviews.After I bought it I understood: For some of the things it does, it works fine -- no problems.  However, there are many major bugs in the software, and if you need one of the buggy functions, you'll be sorry you bought it.Examples of some problems:1. If you burn an audio track entitled "Blue Fog" Nero will give it the title "Fog."2. Every time I run a backup, it tells me there was a write error, but the backup seems OK.3. I backed up every file on my drive, but when my system crashed, there were problems that prevented me from restoring my system.4. It has blue screened my system one time.5. Many commands are poorly or not at all documented.  For example, the wave editor has a declipper function, but there is no documentation on how to use it.So, I'd recommend that you look instead at a competing product.Good luck</review_text>
This is very BAD---doesnot work and really interfers with other programs. Almost impossible to remove it.</review_text>
I could be home in bed. But I'm Fing around trying to undo the install of the biggest mistake I've made to date...purchasing, tossing money in the toilet for Nero7. The damage and the time it's taken to recover is about 20 times it's cost. Useless. I can't copy a disk. I can't burn and image. What's the deal???All the negative stuff I've read true. Unfortunately AFTER I paid for Nero7 BEFORE reading what others have to say.What really puzzles me is who all the folks are that are writing all the wonderful reviews? Employees of Ahead?Keep your distance or you'll be sorry</review_text>
Nero 7 wants to prevent you from generating ISO files and instead wants you to use its NRG CD backup file system. Then it doesn't want you to burn WAV onto CD but forces you to invest in MP3 encryption so that you can burn MP3 to CD. The software is full of these horrible twists that Nero has gone from the best burning rom to the worst burning rom by simply making it harder for you to do what you want. I rolled back to Nero 5.5 and had a fully functional and top of the line burning rom again</review_text>
This software suite promises to do everything on earth, but doesn't tell us how.  There is no useful help file.  There are no tutorials or instructions on the website.  And, Nero's support is a joke (just try to get a message through).  I don't understand how a company that started out with the best burn program in the game has sunk to this</review_text>
This product is worse than useless.  Right off the bat, the tutorials do not behave as depicted.  What is left does not run properly.  I spent hours and hours trying to make a CD from an LP, all to no avail.To make matters worse, this bug infested monstrosity, has very poor support.  There is no 800 number.  The version that I had came with 10 days of tecnical assistance that was useless!  After the 10 days, technical assistance costs $1.29 a minute, plus the cost of the long distance call!I REPEAT!  DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!</review_text>
Ever since Adobe bought out this small operation, customer service has been severely lacking.  Software will NOT work on Excel 2007.   The promise for additional POWERLOOKS has become dead.  Granted that the program makes presentation more interesting, the Powerlooks that was in production are no longer on the website.  This is highly disappointing as I purchased this program in anticipation for further development on the Powerlook templates.</review_text>
First, I should have listened to my instincts and downloaded the trial version BEFORE purchasing.  Had I done this I would HAVE NEVER purchased this product.  As it is, having bought the product from a box store and NOT online, I made a $99.00 mistake, plus tax.The product has too many limitations to be considered as a viable add-on to your powerpoint presentations.  As a presenter, using PPT every week, in training presentations, I can tell you that this product does more to limit PPT's slide producing capabilities than it does to add to them.  As a matter of fact, I found the product to "take away" from PPT's slide building procedures, NOT "add" to them.Save your money and wait for the next PPT add-on to come along.  This product is worth neither your investigative time, nor your monetary investment</review_text>
I use PowerPoint a great deal as a teacher and thought this would upgrade my presentations. Unfortunately, every one of my computers had insufficient video memory to allow the software to work. For now, it sits on my shelf until I can purchase more powerful equipment. Certainly not for the casual user. It isn't the magic black box that will make you a star</review_text>
They changed pretty much everything. For starters they completely removed all of the normal menus such as File, Tool, and Edit. Which means you can't use the keyboard for quick and easy menu access. Well maybe you can, but you would have to memorize all of the commands instead of having the nice little visual cues which made previous versions of Office (and almost all other PC programs) so much easier to use. You basically have to use the mouse for everything. And in my experience there is no faster way to repetitive stress injury than over-mousing.The Ribbon is just awful. First of all it's huge. It takes up about FOUR TIMES the space of my customized toolbar. They place nearly every button imaginable on it. And as far as I can tell you can't change it around or simplify it. Every function is displayed all the time whether you need it or not. Which makes finding anything a real pain in the neck. You can make the ribbon retract which at first glance seems nice. But in reality it turns what used to be simple 1-click operations into 3-click operations (extend ribbon, spend several minutes searching for button, click button, retract ribbon). Good grief! What a pain.This software didn't last 24 hours on my system before I restored my old version of Office. This new interface is about the most awful thing I've ever seen on a computer. I know of certain free open source office suites that I prefer to this monstrosity. That being said I still prefer any and all previous versions of MS Office to the free one. In fact I would rather be using my old Wordperfect from 1995 than this *thing* that MS is trying to shove down our throats. If only I hadn't thrown that disc away six years ago...Before you "invest" your money in this software I strongly recommend you download the free trial version. Then buy an earlier version</review_text>
You will probably be more productive and less bug ridden if you stick with what you have.Don't expect to turn this version on and be able to use it. Many changes are literally imposed on you, like the ribbons instead of the familiar icon bars. Missing menus and the auto-double space setting every time you hit return.There are new features which can be helpful to some, but Microsoft probably thinks you can afford a week for retraining.The arrogance of Microsoft not even to offer the menus everyone is used to as a classic or traditional option is incredible.You upgrade for hundreds of dollars to get totally stuck and run out to buy a manual.</review_text>
Far from user-friendly, you will be at the office later at night tearing out your hair trying to find the buttons on the tool bar for even the simplest of office tasks, wondering "Why did I get this program again?" Its like reading another language after using previous editions of Word, which I was a big fan of. I guess with some extensive getting used to the it might be nice but for now it's a nuisance. I can't find anything on this toold bar that looks like an airplane cockpit. In the words of Thoreau "Simplify."Good luck sending files as attachments to colleagues-they won't be able to view the newere version. Get used to saving in "97-2003 Word Format." Also, won't comply with other programs such as e-fax unless saved in this manner. At this price, you could do without the headache.</review_text>
I am an experienced Office user.  I recently updgraded from Office 2003 (which worked great) to Office 2007 and now I am much less productive.Office 2007 is pretty but if you actually have to get something done at work  DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT</review_text>
We are very disappointed in this product because it provides almost no options to customize the spreadsheet.  We cannot rename catagories that are not applicable to us (i.e., child care), and we cannot create new categories that are specific to our needs.  What's even more limiting and disppointing is that you cannot create a different tab for each month to use for comparison, which makes us wonder what value we gain from having a single month of finances captured.  Finally, the bar graphs for summary comparisons are shaded the same color of the background which makes it very difficult to read</review_text>
I have used Norton Virus Protection and Norton Internet Security for several years. I am currently running NIS 2006. My experience with these products has not been good but out of fear I just renewed my subscription. Since then I have had nothing but trouble with NIS. Since my renewal is within the grace period I decided to request a refund. I tried to do this on-line but found it an impossible waste of effort. Their web site and support are as useless as their product. From Norton Internet Security I clicked on support linked to their web site. Once there, I tried to apply for a refund but their system did not recognize my subscription renewal order number.  It did recognize my product order number for NIS 2006 but that is not refundable so no help there. I gave up on requesting a refund and decided to contact support. If you click on "contact us" There are 2 options, Telephone or Email. Telephone support was down because of an earthquake in Taiwan. I decided to try email. I clicked on email and got the following security alert:There is a problem with this website's security certificate.The security certificate presented by this website has expired or is not yet valid.Security certificate problems may indicate an attempt to fool you or intercept any data you send to the server.We recommend that you close this webpage and do not continue to this website.Click here to close this webpage.Continue to this website (not recommended).How ironic is that? I know I was on their site because I navigated there by clicking on support in NIS. You would think an internet security company could maintain their own security certificates. I'm not surprised though because everything Symantec does is designed to make you hate them. Their product is abysmal. It bogs my system down to a crawl, disrupts the performance of other applications and hogs system resources. If you put NIS on your computer you'd better get used to staring at the hourglass icon for long periods of time, Especially if you don't have tons of virtual memory and hard disk space available. Nortons CCapp retards start up forever and won't shut down when you want to log off. Recently I had to reinstall my windows xp operating system. After that I had major problems with NIS and had to uninstall it. It was then I realized how much better my system ran without it. I had already paid my renewal fee so I downloaded and reinstalled NIS and have had nothing but trouble since. I tried to leave feedback on Symantecs web site but typical of them, that does not work either. I wrote a long complaint, then clicked on submit. An error message came up saying to go back and correct the highlighted areas. When I clicked the back button all the text I had typed in was gone... just because I had failed to enter a subject line in the feedback report. I'll be damned if I was about to type all that information back in again. If you buy NIS you'd better hope it works the first time. If you think your going to get good support from Symantec or anything out of their website - think again. Oh, and BTW Beware, Symantec enrolls you for automatic renewal unless you go to their website and un-enroll. Once they have your money just try to get it back. Symantec sets up road blocks so you eventually just give up in frustration. This is how they make their money rather than by making a good product.</review_text>
I have been using Norton Anti-Virus since I purchased the Compaq Presario 4000. The reason I have stuck with Norton because this Presario came with Norton Internet Security 2002 attached to it. I never used the NIS 2002, though, but I purchased the Norton Anti-Virus (NAV) 2003 which I have bee using for the last three years. In fact I used the NAV 2004 for two straight years without any response from Symantec, then all of a sudden that subscription was eventually retired by Symantec. I liked the NAV 2005 (which Symantec six months prior to its due date subscription, which made me mad and hence my wanting to try NIS at a subsidized rate) because like NAV 2003, it could tell if someone or something was trying to intrude into your computer. It is after purchasing and trying NIS 2005, that I realized how low and base Norton can go with its software. First when I tried NIS 2005, it blocked all my websites. I couldnt access them and I could not read my e-mail (Whenever I tried to read my e-mail, the response would be that, that action has been cancelled). So I reformatted my hard drive and the NIS 2005 appeared to be working quite well until I tred to install Adobe Reader 7.08 and couldn't allow me to proceed. Moreover, it was snail slow in allowing me to read one mail to another. So I uninstalled NIS 2005 and installed NAV 2006, which appears to be working well. I have now purchased Tend Micro PC-cillin 2006 as well as McAfee Viruscan 2006 at subsidized rates, should Symantec pematurely terminate my NAV 2006 prematurely i.e. before the 366 days of subscription are over. I think one of the reasons why NIS could not work is that it is a program that it is trying to do more than it can chew. It tried to be an anti-virus, personal firewall, privacy control, antispam as well as parental control in one. It reminds of the days when it was better to purchase a cassette player separate from  the radio, since the technology at that time could not produce a good combined raio cassette player. I think Norton Internet Security is in that mode. It is not yet competent to produce a combined solution that is both antivirus and anti spam,anti-spyware at the same time. Hence the many complaints of its being a buggy program. At this stage, I would stay away from any program that calls itself "Internet Security." I may try Trend Micro internet Security which has received rave reviews from a couple of its users, but that will be if something goes wrong with my current NAV 2006. Otherwise, I am still wary of those programs that pass off as "Internet Security" such as "Norton Internet Security" or "Trend Micro Internet Security," pending their perfection of this technology at some future date</review_text>
Okay... so I'm not as astute in the technical aspects of software as some reviewers, but I can say that my experience with this software is absolutely terrible.First off, it is built to integrate with Outlook, but doesn't really. It always leaves one e-mail in your outbox (the one you posted first). If you open your outbox before they send, then the one you posted most recently won't send either. Seriously, the only way I have been dealing with this is that I have left a dead e-mail in the box permanently. If I need to change something that has been posted to the outbox, I have to open it, then get out of the outbox, change it, and repost it, otherwise it won't send -- ever.I have set NIS so that it doesn't scan my outgoing e-mail, as it blocks anything over 2mb, and in my business, I send things that big all the time. In a recent update, however, it has reinstated that and now scans all of my outgoing e-mail whether it is set to or not.I spent hours and hours on the phone with (supposed) technicians, who refused to answer any questions unless I disabled my whole network. What that has to do with this program, I don't know. I tried the "live internet chat" function, but -- and I kid you not -- it took almost two hours for me to get ten responses from the guy. When I complained, he hung up on me. Gotta love that.When I tell NIS that something it has categorised as spam "isn't spam", it doesn't remember the sender's e-mail address, like it is supposed to. It just keeps calling it spam and quarantining it.Regarding spyware, I have another piece of anti-spyware software called Webroot Spy Sweeper, that routinely finds spyware on my computer that NIS didn't catch.This has just been one headache after another. Their customer service was unresponsive and totally unhelpful, with not ONE actual solution to any of these problems.The only piece of software I have ever bought that was anywhere close to as bad as this is WinFax 10, another Norton product.I will NEVER, EVER buy another piece of Norton/Symantec software again as long as I live. They should be ashamed of themselves</review_text>
(this review is of the Spyware edition)NIS takes 25Megs of ram - ok for an all-in-one (if you have &lt;256Megs your lightweight CPU can't carry enough armor to make Windows really Zero-day Net safe IMHO)NIS has most of the features I look for in a firewall/spyware/virus scanner/intrusion detector, BUThalf don't work right, and some that do seem to fight every attempt to make them work.Even after LiveUpdate this week,One buggy automatic firewall rule autoloaded, and port 80 was open listening half 'naked' on the Internet.I replaced it, and at the first passing probe my rule was erased, autoreplaced, naked again.Only after I stumbled onto the secret trick (add a block all rule after the pass rules) did it close it.It took 11 clicks (!) just to add the block all rule - miserable!The log is a nightmare - pages of long sentences explaining "permitted once" 200 times, no actual infountil I click on one of them. What's worse is, none of them I checked WERE "permitted once" IIRC.NIS detected 2 trojan/spywares, but could not remove either.Enabling program component monitoring started an avalanche of popups, all suggesting I block access, but I actually DO want IE to access the internet.Running Windows update brought a popup asking if 100's more dll's are ok. How would I know? I do want Windows updated.Great feature in theory, totally useless even if you know the names of every evil dll not yet invented.If you have more than 1 or 2 programs not in the automatic ruleset, plan to either "permit all" or spend many hours actually writing the same set of 3 rules over and over for every autoupdating program you use - assuming you understand TCP vs UDP etc. Why no "permit all local + DNS + outbound port 80" choice? That would mean 1/10 the work! Jetico lets me pick "web browser" ruleset, so its UI from Hell gets used once per category.After spending all day and half the night getting it working, I discover that it is not possible to save my precious rules - or to reload them. I would be less furious if I had a fresh install of windows, but not much.All good, until a program autoupdates, and 3 more rules to write. Too angry for words.Jetico lets me clone the old rules or edit them to update the program sig.I would not use NIS if you paid me 10 times its price.</review_text>
The Good- This software completely locks down email access, internet access, network access etc.The Bad - This software completely locks down email access, internet access, network access etc.The UGLY.  I bought a new notebook I was going nuts trying to figure out why Outlook wouldn't send/receive emails, my wireless connection wouldn't work, why new software I was installing wouldn't update over the web, it was taking 5-10 minutes JUST TO RESTART THE COMPUTER!!! Hmmm all these issues started after installing Internet Security 2005.To be fair I said ok, better make sure I have this set up right...So I took a step back, went to Symantec's site and spent time learning to properly configure the settings, software etc.  Ok great, my bad right?  Wrong.  When I tried adding Comcast's server addresses to the trusted list NIS 2005 would freeze up, I would have to reboot, and 10min later the same thing.To make a long story short, I would not reccomend this product for anyone with less than 110% of patience and complete understanding of the product installation and set up.  The best thing about NIS 2005 was it only took 5 minutes to uninstall.</review_text>
I have always used Norton antivirus, and had no problems with it at all. I have recently had to migrate to Outlook 2003 and Norton IS 2005 and have non-stop system crashes. I have now uninstalled it and resinstalled my old version of Norton Professional and hey presto everything is working again - and not talking two hours to load.</review_text>
I have always used the other well-known office suites in the past but when I received an offer on this suite at a significant discount, I thought I would try it.  I should mention I'm a doctoral student in the middle of a dissertation, so the challenge was to migrate important data and documents into WordPerfect and Quattro Pro.  While I was able to get it done the Quattro Pro interface with SPSS, which had worked seemlessly with the other spreadsheet, failed horribly.  Not to mention the complicated details of what should be simple document formatting--the Visual Basic Editor kept freezing or denying me access.Invest in a better product if you have serious work.  I've gone back to the benchmark office suite product</review_text>
Quicken software continues to contain prominent advertising for Intuit products and services.  In my opinion, it is fine to offer additional services to customers, but give the customer the opportunity to say "no thanks" and then leave them alone so they can be productive with the software.  Forever pestering a paid customer with advertising for the same products and services is not a good idea.  Advertising takes up space in the user interface and is a distraction that reduces productivity</review_text>
I've only had this software for a few months and already know half of the tech support population of Bangalore, India. One problem with this software is that it has an auto update function that results in "Patch Engine Error," which I've solved through versions 2, 3 and 4. Another problem is with Quicken's servers, resulting in CC-501, CC-502 and CC-899 errors. Translation: Quicken's servers are unable to reliably update your bank account information. Today, in the time it took Pandeep to respond to one of my online chat questions, I was able to migrate a dozen accounts to MSN's free online version of Money, which updated all of my bank accounts easily. Conclusion: Save your receipt for their 60-day refund</review_text>
I have been a long time user and have always had good success until the 2007.I have tried to install on my new PC and have not been successful. I called Intuit Phone support and spent and hour changing setting on my computer. We did the usual things for WinXP Pro:1. Set up a new account to verify it isn't a permission problem2. Shut off all service and switched to safe modeNone of these made a difference. So the Support Technician told me to call Microsoft and then hung up. That was it, no chance to even complain, just a dead phone line.Luckly, I know enough to put my PC back in worki9ng order but this is pretty lame support.I never though Microsoft would get me to switch and they haven't but Intuit has forced me off all on their own.</review_text>
From my experience just about all support calls are routed off shore.Most of the tech support staff just take your question and type it into their work station. They say "May I put you on hold while I check my resources". Then they read answers off their screen. Several times I had to say to the tech - I can't understand your English. If you buy the package I'd find a local QB certified accountant and pay him/her for their time.</review_text>
When converting my 2005 data over to 2006 version it lost all of my time data.  I have to rebuild my datafile just to use the check register now.  Also the new program will not allow me to add a vendor or a customer.  I've had to change names and addresses of obsolete customers and vendors just to add new ones.Intuit's support sucks and cannot seem to resolve my problems.  I have two copies on two different computers and am having the same problems with my data file on each computer.  My recommendation is if you are using the 2005 version, and don't need tax tables, don't mess with 2006 version.  It has literally cost me thousands of dollars of my time trying to work out the bugs on my own</review_text>
The res on the artwork here is less than miserable. The interface is high-tech circa 1996.I'm dissappointed in this purchase. I would have thought it was fantastic when I bought my first PC in 1993</review_text>
I've installed and tested this for several clients.  Whether backing up to a local HD or over the network, the system has worked; I install and come back a week later to do a test verify and restore, and it's always worked.  I did have trouble once; Windows froze up.  This was probably due to poor programming combined with insufficient RAM; it worked the second time.I don't get why a product with mostly single star ratings like this still gets 2.5 stars.  Annoying Amazon 'feature'!Since 60% of Windows PCs are malware-infected, I'm figuring most Windows PC support issues are malware-induced.</review_text>
It's a piece of junk, so save your money and some headaches. Even Dell technicians can't fix it.   My new Dell computer had Norton Ghost pre-installed with a back-up hard drive just for cloning.  It sounded like a perfect setup except my Norton Ghost wouldn't work.  Contacted Dell three times and they supposedly coordinated with Norton to no avail.  Now I'm stuck with saturated backup hard drive that is useless to me</review_text>
I bought this product to assist in recovery, but I tried to recover a program and it would not work. Does real well on a complete recovery but do not expect a partial. Works well on recovery of My stuff</review_text>
I should have listened to the other reviewers...  I wanted to replace my C: drive with a faster one, and Ghost 10.0 says it can do it, but don't be fooled.  Even if you follow the extra steps from their support site (which are not in the documentation), you will end up with an unusable copy that will boot up but then fail with assorted catastrophic errors.It will also give you occasional error messages that are neither in the documentation nor on their support site.A friend recommended Acronis TrueImage which I ended using instead.  It's much easier to use, copies about 2x faster than Ghost, and best of all it works.  I cloned and replaced C drives from two laptops in a couple of hours with no problems.</review_text>
Don't waste your time and money!! EXTREMELY poor product support! 60 day return policy which they exploit by trying to solve your problems and delaying past the 60 day limit, then you're stuck with worthless software.I installed it on my computer making a complete backup of it. Then my computer crashed and I lost everything. I thought I was covered since I just made a full backup on an external hard disk but when I tried to do a restore Norton Ghost wouldn't recognize my external hard disk.I spent a full day with their support people and he finally gave up telling me he had to send the problem to the next level of support and that they would call me within 48 hours. Nobody called!I bought their Extended Download service and tried to download the product again. It didn't work and after spending 8 hours online and on the phone I still haven't got a working copy. The product key they said I needed and I tried to use also doesn't work. I'm writing my credit card company next to try and get a credit but I expect the same result - NO credit back and software that doesn't do what Norton said it would do</review_text>
I got Norton Ghost with my new Dell PC, so I thought I would use it for backups to an external USB drive. After about 6 months of 'trying' to use it, I finally gave up and uninstalled it. Reason, most of the backups somehow get corrupted and the software seems to have trouble working with it. Twice I removed all the partial backups and started from scratch, but again after a few weeks the backup agent would hang while doing an incremental backup.Now, the software is good for making a complete clone of the hard disk or restoring system from an image, but it does not seem to work well with incremental backups</review_text>
I have used this procuct in the past with great success, but Ghost 10 is useless. Symantec tech support is (as far as I can tell, been doing computers since 1957) the worst. If you get the Boxed version It says PC Magzine September 2004 "Belongs in every serious PC user's toolbox."  Think about it using a 2004 quote. In 2004 and 2005 I would agree.  The 1st sys I installed Ghost 10 is a Dell XPX600, Boot disk will not work, BackUp will not work, blue screen when backing up.Tech support directed me to web sites that don't exist, and the sites that did come up didn't have the files NU tech listed.  Dell Workstations 530 and 360 both dual processor, no games, 15,000 Scsi Raid, 4GB mem, 1GB nVidia, Dual Displays -- They Crashed and had to be reformated and reinstalled. System works 2005 expired I couldn't use my Ghost 9 backups, and I kept getting virus pop ups that were generated by NU, the systems were shipped to Panama and were in Customs for over 6 mo this is not a usual event in the life of a computer, but with no tech support and my computers only starting long enough to tell me Sys Works was not up to date I reformated. I purchased (in anticipation of setting up my computers) boxed from Amazon and download from NU Ghost 10,Sys Wrks prem, NU int sec (2007 versions) but couldn't install them. That was Mid December 2006, now its January 19, 2007 and still not one answer from NU that works, yes all systems are pluged in to  TrippLite Smart3000RMU & TrippLite line condidtoners (2 Batery Backup Units), the computers lived in ST Maarten and the power was 105 to 140 volts with lots of downtime.Panama weather, people, public offices are great (Driver lic $24 Lic plates $30 for 3 years, St Maarten driver lic $450 for 2 years, Lic plates $400 yr) sailing is better in ST Maarten. Life in Panama ( and I don't speek Spanish yet )is good Norton is bad. l read a lot mostly tech books, I purchase tools, electronic gear, software, computer hardware, etc without Amazon it would be hard to live offshore,no need to go to Borders, Amazon is online 24 7.</review_text>
This CD should be priced at $5.00. The graphics will not keep your child's attention and it's pretty lame. It was a wasted purchase, I have to bribe my child to use it, because it so boring</review_text>
I bought this for my two sons, ages 6 and 8, to help them develop speed with their memory math skills.  What a disappointment.  Even when they do know the answer quickly it can take them a good minute to find the actual answer in the game.  Each playtime you must start from the beginning a work back up to where you left off.  Good for review but it takes so long to get to the levels where practice is really needed.  I wish I'd purchased a different product</review_text>
This concept is good but the user interface and playability is terrible.  My 7-year old was frustrated with being forced to use the keyboard and no mouse.  And we couldn't figure out a way to go back to the main menu without exiting the game.  And playing a later level requires you to go through all the earlier levels.  And...did they actually test this thing on humans?  What a waste of potential.  It is a good concept</review_text>
My son had an earlier version of Math Blaster, it was wonderful.  I saw this new version and expected more of the same.  WRONG!!  After 10 minutes of loud sounds, and pulsing video, he was complaining.  It was impossible to focus on what he should do with all the distracting background stuff. Never could get to a point where learning might take place.  Wish I could get my money back.After this disaster, we purchased Mia's Math Adventure. This was more in tune with the first Math Blaster.</review_text>
I just got a 2006 version of math blasters, I played it for a while and I thought that it was really frustrating and it didnt help me at math at all! I think that anyone who plays it will probably fall right to sleep when they start playing! The box it came in said it was for age 6-12 but I think it is for 6 or 7 year old kids. I really dont think this is a good game to play</review_text>
This is THE BEST SELLING Bible in America for good reason! Ease of comprehension, lovely modern English, pleasing packaging, and the best conservative scholarhip for both textual reconstruction and language translation.Read I WAS A TEENAGE JEHOVAH'S WITNESS and JEHOVAH UNMASKED for two of the wildest rides ever!</review_text>
If I had $1 for every time a CS2 app crashed and made expend real hours to redo work, I'd have about $10. And that's enough for me to say, BEWARE of this set of applications! Adobe has allowed them to get too bloated, too slow, and the results are that all the programs (but principally GoLive, InDesign and Illustrator, in that order) are crashy and will quite suddenly, forcing you to expend the precious hours of your life redoing work you just finished. I cannot stress how disappointed I am in Adobe, and how distraught I am that we as a nation have allowed the only two competing companies to join, thus guaranteeing that there will be less quality and innovation in the future. In any event, do not buy the CS2 apps, Adobe does not deserve your support</review_text>
We purchased this software to map retail locations on a region.  It is missing too many features to be usable.  For instance, when you import a custom graphic pushpin, the software doesn't resize it as you zoom which forces you to create multiple sizes in another program.  You can add text description boxes but have no control over the font or sizing -- and they don't resize either.We highlighted our specific region but the software doesn't let you print just that region (called 'territory.)  We searched the help files and their word 'territory' is not even listed.You cannot save your map graphics in any standard graphics format, e.g. JPEG, PDF or ai.  We tried printing to a PDF generator, but Map Point's map output is of very poor resolution even on the highest settings.After wasting a lot of time, it's apparent we should have tried Google Maps/Earth with our graphics editing software for a solution that works</review_text>
If you buy this be sure to set a Restore Point before installing. This may work if you have never installed any other Anti-Virus software. This is not for a novice computer user to install unless maybe you are installing on a brand new computer.After uninstalling Norton (my previous anti virus software)I installed Kapersky and immediately had total system lockup with warning message from Windows (the old blue screen of death) saying a serious problem had occurred and if I had recently installed new hardware or software to uninstall it.  Which I did, then logged onto the Kapersky forum and was told to download a Norton Removal tool and run it and then reinstall.  I did this and still ended up with total lockup and warning message.  After three tries I gave up.  Luckily I had set Restore points and was able to get my system back and am now back to using Norton.  According to the forum there are also problems if you have installed McAfee.  I am running Windows XP.  Since I never got to use it I can't judge whether it has any value.</review_text>
I have this program on a 30-day demo.  It might be OK if I didn't mind my computer becoming almost unusable.I tried to run the system virus scan, as recommended, but after 3 hours it was only 2% done because it was stuck on a file it couldn't seem to get past.  I skipped the file, but then it quickly got stuck again.  The "time remaining" said it would take 4 days to complete, so I cancelled that scan.It has a learning mode that initally blocks EVERYTHING.  Apparently, this program has no brain.  For example, I have the Live Search Toolbar installed in Outlook.  It had to ask me if it was OK to run that dll file.  In fact, each program that called up a process from a shared dll has to ask permission before it could run.Don't even get me started on the Quickbooks and Internet Explorer problems.  Which is what it wouldn't let those programs do, even after they had been run and I repeated clicked "allow" over and over.Twice today it got so slow running IE that it finally crashed the computer so bad that  I had to do a hard re-boot.  If you have it checking ports on your computer, almost nothing would run or download on IE.So, I'm going to demo a few more, but it's probably back to Windows Live OneCare, which I had the past year.  It just doesn't seem to do much (no long list of features), but it also doesn't jam everthing else up</review_text>
If I could give it 0 star, I would. My humble opinion is that Kaspersky is not better than Norton at slowing down your computer. One brand new computer, plenty of space and memory. One old computer but with plenty of space and memory as well. Each time Kaspersky updates, I can't open Outlook Express nor Explorer. Well, the programs do open actually but I have time to vacuum and dust before they're launched. I used the repair fonction and uninstalled and reinstalled without any improvement.Samwis</review_text>
After researching a few options on the market I tried Kaspersky Internet Security Suite 6.0. I needed only anti-virus but since the rebates made the whole suite cost the same as anti-virus alone I decided to give it a try. Man, I was really disappointed. Out of 7 programs only 2 started and have been working properly: anti-virus and proactive defense. The suite was trying to start other 5 programs and was requesting to reboot laptop constantly. After trying all I could I decided to call or email for help. And this is where I got my surprise - none of the contact information led me to any LIVE person. I emailed to all addresses available on the net and in the program. I called all US numbers I could - they even don't have a live representative here. If you try to call a number for US and Canada you will reach one of those accept all calls and leave your numbers with wait all you can for response time. I filled out two bug reports directly from the program with the same result.One of the selling points of anti-virus program was HOURLY updates. Well, guess what. You are lucky to have a DAILY update without a manual interaction. I thought that something is wrong with my work laptop and installed second program (I was naïve and bought two) on a BRAND new installation of Windows XP. Result was ABSOLUTELY identical.If you don't believe me - try to contact ANY of their support (not SALES) channels BEFORE you buy their product. My final view on this product would be:1.	Great idea2.	Maybe great initial implementation (the reviews were great)3.	And UNAVAILABLE SUPPORT.Don't waste your time and money</review_text>
Before buying, I downloaded and installed a 30-day trial version of KIS 6.0.  First, I uninstalled Windows Live One Care.  After installing KIS 6.0 and rebooting, my Windows XP Home Edition computer just locked up.  Had to go through Safe Mode to remove the program via Windows Explorer, since Add/Remove Programs in Control Panel will not work in Safe Mode.When I reinstalled Windows Live One Care, it offered to remove the remains of KIS 6.0 that I couldn't.Next, Internet Explorer 7 would not work at some sites.  Had to call Microsoft Support and a great technician in India took about an hour to straighten out the damaged files in IE7 at no charge.  Thanks a lot, Kaspersky!Now, my computer is working fine.  I am sorry that I did not have a chance to use KIS 6.0, but I will stick with One Care and renew it when my 1st year of free updates expires soon</review_text>
Based on lots of great reviews, I decided to buy Kaspersky.  After two months, I got a message saying my activation key was blacklisted.  I sent an email to customer service and got an auto reply saying they were too busy to respond within 48 hours.  Finally after three days someone got back to me and told me to try deleting and reentering the key.  This did not work.  I had to reply again to customer service and got the same auto reply. This time, no one ever replied.  I sent another email threatening to write negative reviews of them and they still, weeks later, have not replied.  I emphatically advise against buying this product.  If you ever have a problem, you will not get help</review_text>
At first I thought the idea of offering a set of the most popular applications at an affordable price was great. Recently, however, many computer makers have started using MS Works as the standard pre-loaded suite on new machines.Users who need more than very very basic features will need to buy more dependable software packages(e.g. MS Office). The word processor in Works, for instance, does not have many macrons that are commonly used in Dutch, Scandinavian, Turkish, romanized Russian, Japanese etc.. In the end the low price of MS Works is a way to save money to computer makers and to squeeze out extra money from buyers who will need to upgrade to better products anyway</review_text>
I had to upgrade to MS Works 7.0 due to Y2K issues. I am not nearly as satisfied with MS Wortks 7.0 as I was with MS Works 4.5. I am now searching for a replacement</review_text>
I started writing code for the web back when you could still order it as a text only service.  DOS ruled the day, and there were no ads plastered on every site.  This is the first product that takes HUGE STEPS BACKWARD in useability, functionality, and performance since the public birth of the web.  Unlike the previous reviewers glowing account of AS 4000 I am looking at new software because the service that this company provides and their complete lack of a proactive nature with regard to its useability have rankled me one too many times.  To wit:1.  I am running a dual core 3.0 with 1 gb of memory and the 3d draw is slower that previous versions.2.  Tech support had the audacity to tell me that going to a drop down menu to rotate an item selected is faster than a right click of the mouse and a context menu that would allow me to do the same from that menu.  This is a step backward of at least 10 years.  Previous versions had the right click menu which also had delete and other frequently used commands available.  Really piss poor on their part to eliminate this feature alone.3.  Despite a fast newer machine, once you select an item you have to wait before you can move it by selecting it a second time.  Pitiful.4.  Won't import standard dxf files without saving them as one layer.  Making a product that won't play nice with others is a bad thing.I have other issues, but just don't want to spend any more time on this company or their products.  If I ran my business and failed to listen to my customers like punch, I would be out of business.Bottom line:  NO LONGER RECOMMENDE</review_text>
Unfortunately, I had to return the product because it was defective.  The first disk failed to load to my computer.  I contacted Punch Technical staff and they were unable to help me with the problem.  I tried on another computer in the house,and the same thing happened.  I therefore returned the product</review_text>
The graphics are clear, but they are bad! Horses look nothing like that and it is really gross! I would say get it for the younger kids, because they won't care.There is nothing to do with the game except earn money, build your hotel, and keep your horse from getting sick. You don't get to ride that often because it said "you have ridden enough for this round" and it is very enoying. you can't pay enough monay to keep more than one horse, but you need to jump them to earn money so you can build your hotel / parking lot / jumping corse / breeding paddock / ect. But you can't do that unless you can jump the horse alot, and you can't. It is easy to go 'bankrupt' so I would say this game is not for little kids because of the money dealing.not for older kids because of the dumbness of the horses look, not for younger kids because of the money problems.So don't get this game</review_text>
My daughter and another second-grade friend both got bored of this game after 20 minutes of staring at a horse standing in a stall and listening to a cat meow.  The controls are not very logical, and there is no animation to speak of</review_text>
If you have an older systemworks loaded, NSW will go to remove the older GO BACK version.  If it does, (depending on your system) OK.  However, if it wants you to go to Symantek web site and download a GO BACK removal toll, beware.  I downloaded it and ran it and it stated it wanted to restart my system.  What it did was screw up the partition and crashed the system.  GO Back puts your data in a seperate partition.  Symantek knows about this and has a "fix" you run before loading NSW, but they didn't let anyone know that it may crash your system.  On an older PC, without windows restore tool, it works OK.  However, if you have a newer PC with a windows resotre loaded and then have an older NSW GO back loaded, it will crash your PC if you use their GO Back removal tool.  Emailed Symantec twice, they stated they would get back in 7 days - never did.  Hope you have better luc</review_text>
The new Systemworks has a horrible interface.  You can't see what your options are easily.  You can't see the status of your components.  You can't see what version you have.  When you load it after loading Norton Personal Firewall 2006, the Firewall will not load program rules (you have to uninstall the Firewall and then reinstall it).  I'm not sure how the protection works, but the software "redesign" was done by an ergonomic moron</review_text>
I have used System Works on my computer since 2000. The 2007 version is nowhere as good as the older ones. They have deleted many of the "real" diagnostic features (Registry Optomizer), dummed down the rest, and added (rather forced) an auto-load Norton Protection Center that takes over the Windows Security Center and cannot be easily unloaded. Software should be made to be user-friendly ... this version is nothing like the previous ones</review_text>
The software installation is buggy.  It try's to download the entire installation from the SnapStream web site, even though there is a installation disk included.  If your web connection fails the installation trashes your system and you will need to reinstall Windows.  I have Windows XP SP2 with a flakey internet connection. Although I am computer literate, after two attempts to install this product I have chucked the whole thing out the window. P.S. SnapStream has no tech service department to speak of</review_text>
After 25 years of building PC, and installing software, beta testing software, I am unable, even with Adobe's technical support staff to install Acrobat Version 8.  Software gets to the end of the install process and stalls.  No combination of repair, uninstall, reinstall, registry cleaning, advice from THREE technical support staff after hours on the telephone can solve the problem.  Using XP, with all the latest upgrades, defragging the drives, with 2 MB RAM, and a Adobe Tech support clean registry still fails to properly install the software.</review_text>
The "bad serial number" routine as the first reviewer. I'll try Adobe Customer Service when I stop fuming</review_text>
I use Adobe Acrobat Professional extensively both as an attorney and as a researcher/author.  Because of the new features advertised which would enhance Acrobat storage of PowerPoint presentations, I bought it off the shelves at a local Staples office supply dealer.  I am proficient at my own installations and expected no trouble on this.  It acted like a virus.  The program did not finish installing.  Worse yet, it corrupted the underlying 7.0 installation and fixed that so the Windows Controller program could not install it. I had to hack through the registry to remove traces of it.  Finally I got to a stage where it appeared to be going through the registry process again.  Then I received the coup de grace -- a BAD SERIAL NUMBER MESSAGE.  I checked carefully and it matched the serial number exactly as on the label sent by Adobe inside its factory package.  I used MicroSoft OneNote to make a colored screen copy of this phenonema and marched the package back to Staples where they refunded my money.  It's too bad about the 20 plus billable hours as a lawyer lost to this process.  My experiences in calling Adobe in the past when I puzzled through a far lesser discourage me from wanting to talk to their technical support people (who too often know less than me given the increasingly apparent out-sourcing to people who read from a script and give us credit for knowing far less than we do).  At any rate, I am now bitter.  My 7.08 installation of Adobe worked great on my favorite computer where I had the bulk of my multimedia presentations which I hoped to reduce complete with sounds to the Adobe 8.0 format.  I suspect that wrong serial numbers were slapped on the packages.  I am deeply disappointed, even ANGRY at the inconvenience this has caused me.  I took it home and tried it on my desktop there and it also would not complete the installation and ruined my chances of a clean uninstallation of 7.0.  Deactivation of 7.0 could not take place either after installation of 8.0.  I don't know what Adobe was thinking -- or if they were thinking.  I have been a loyal customer of theirs for many years, but I'm thinking distinctly non-charitable thoughts about them this early morning.  I hope they get their act together -- soon.  They owe us all a quick fix and patch and they need DEEP REPENTANCE for the damage this did to Windows XP home installations which also appear to be corrupted in the process of installing this "upgrade" program which acts more like a computer worm or virus than a program</review_text>
I have been unable to get the software to work on my Dell computer with WINDOWS XP.  Although I have been in contact with the technical team at SBT on many occasions, my initial problem has never been resolved.  I am unable to use the Test & Improve Your Memory software</review_text>
Sorry.  I liked the idea, but this product did not meet my expectations.  It did not engage the users.  The interface was 20th century. The technologies used were outdated. My advice is to look elsewhere.</review_text>
I cannot believe that Taxcut can no longer import capital gains info from Fidelity, which is has been able to do for several years.  I was a happy customer, now I'm a MAD customer.</review_text>
After spending over an hour waiting on their help line and trying all of their non-functioning suggestions, I was still unable to install this on either of my PCs. They don't want to admit it, but their ad for Deduction Pro kills the software install at 21% (or 26% for the standard version). And no, their "font patch", killing all startup services, upgrading the Flash Player, nor starting in Safe Mode did not resolve the problem. I'm out the money on this and am switching to TurboTax. H&R Block has lost this customer.</review_text>
I just input all the information for my return and this software has me owing over $8000.  By my calculations I'm owed a refund of $150-200.  It is not taking federal income tax already paid from annuities into account.  Back to the calculator for me</review_text>
I just purchased the software and successfully installed it on my computer.  When I got to the point of entering dividends and capital gains, I couldn't figure out how to import the data from Fidelity that I've done for the last few years.  Looking around on the Fidelity website, I can across the following statement: "For the 2005 tax year, Fidelity information will not be able to be imported directly into H&R Block's TaxCut programs. H&R Block expects that these products will have this functionality restored for the 2006 tax year."  Unfortunately, this is the reason I'm using a software tax prep program, looks like it's back to TurboTax</review_text>
I have had to set up a few new installs of the Vista Business on some servers and I was disappointed with the overall performance.My biggest gripe is when I tried to remotely log in from another PC and I sat there waiting and waiting only to discover that the Vista default setup is to ask permission to run even the most basic operations and was actually sitting there waiting for someone to click 'YES' to allow the process to run. How irritating! Kinda self defeats the idea of remotely logging in doesn't it?.Also if you happen to rename the administrator account the change is not registered somewhere in the Remote Connections authorization. So when I *thought* I was remotely logging in under the new admin account name Vista wouldn't let me in and it was only after searching for what seemed an eternity - some hidden place it took me 15 minutes to find, I discovered that the the new admin account name had not been authorized when I did the name change. yikes!For those who need to run VNC Server on Vista, be aware there are issues -  installing and running that you will need to work around as well.It seems like Microsft drastically changed the menus, overdid the default security features, and installed a new hood ornament. Other than that I don't see what the big deal is.</review_text>
I was required to purchase this with my new computer. I thought I'd give it a chance at work. We have a dedicated wired network, which just requires that you register the machine's MAC address with our DHCP server. Nice and simple, and very much like the LAN in any home where the user has a NAT router.I plugged in the network and tried to get the MAC address. Vista would only give me the wizard to connect my network. OK, I tried the wizard. It offers to let me setup PPPoE with a username and password. That's it, no other options. I asked for other options, and it only offered that I use a modem (that I did not have in my computer.) No options for a dedicated network at all, that I could find.I went to another machine (on the 'net) and searched Google. None of the Microsoft sites were helpful in any way. Lots of PR posturing, but no useful information or troubleshooting.I gave up, found the license and install disks for Windows XP, and downgraded the new machine. It was far, far easier.</review_text>
You can get Mac OS X for 129 bucks and it has everything as opposed to the Microsoft's 227 dollar Home Premium which is the low end. Buy Mac and get all the functionality in one OS. When spec'ed out the system are comparable in price, except apple doesn't offer low-end hardware options which is why they seem more expensive</review_text>
The upgrade is $75 cheaper and you DON'T need to have a previous install of Windows to get it to work. Simply do the following:1. Boot with the Windows Vista Upgrade DVD.2. Click "Install Now."3. Do not enter a Product Key When prompted.4. When prompted, select the Vista product edition that you do have.6. Install Vista normally.7. Once the install is complete, restart the DVD-based Setup from within Windows Vista. Perform an in-place upgrade. 8. Enter your Product Key when prompted.This is according to Microsoft's internal documentation, and reported by Paul Thurrott at Windows IT Pro</review_text>
I was a private beta tester for the new OS. I tested the software for a whole year and I am not pleased with it.If you depend on stability for your existing software, you are out of luck. The hardware and software support for the new operating system is horrible. Many businesses will have to upgrade their hardware to use Windows Vista.You are better off upgrading to a Mac. After all, Microsoft did steal many ideas from Apple Computers.</review_text>
I hate this product. Since I'm used to Office 2003 (at work), opening this program and having to look at the childish-looking menu bar was a shock. The layout is irritating, poorly designed, and does not provide sufficient features. To make things worse, this sorry program does not allow you to save files directly to CD. The one-star rating was too generous.</review_text>
You don't need to be a student or to own your home to get the Home and Student version. Any one can get that version. Microsoft doesn't enforce the student part and by home, they mean where you live</review_text>
My best rating for Microsoft Money Deluxe is it is pure JUNK. Don't was your money. If it works at all, trust ,it is not with Microsoft Vista. A class action law suit sounds in order for this GARBAGE</review_text>
I have been a Microsoft Money user for many, many years. (Going back to Money '98? I forget.) I reluctantly upgraded to Money 2007 Premium earlier this year from Money 2004 when I read somewhere that Money 2004 was no longer going to be supported. (I also read that Money 2005, Money 2006, and Money 2007 had issues. Hence my reluctance to upgrade.)For years, I have sync'ed Money with my online accounts on nearly a daily basis. I'm that kind of focused on keeping my eye on my money, and Money has historically served me very well in this habit. Money 2007 does not.Since installing it, I have:1) Battled with my prior bank for nearly two months to get them to figure out by Money 2007 does not synchronize with their systems.2) Installed and reinstalled Money 2007 on several different workstations to test the synchronization issue with my years-old Money file and new, empty Money files. Always fails.3) Now I have *switched banks* thinking the syncing issue was my bank's fault. It wasn't. It's Microsoft Money's fault.Syncing fails *every* time with a helpful OBRES 22063 error. Oh, yea, thatone! We all know just what that is.I have read every Microsoft knowledge base article I can find. I have perused public.microsoft.money and other usenet groups. I have Googled. I have read blogs. The only thing I find is that lots of people have this problem with lots of different financial institutions, and Microsoft is doing nothing about itIn Money 2004, this worked flawlessly nearly every time. Why did itbreak?!?!!So if you're looking to have Money synchronize with your accounts online, look elsewhere. But if you're all about putting everything in manually, this product will serve you just fine.Buy a copy of Quicken instead!</review_text>
I have been using this program for five years now and I'm finally going to switch to Quicken. The 'Invoice Designer' is a total waste of time... it just hasn't worked for years and Microsoft will do NOTHING to get it to work. This is the unwanted step child of Microsoft, so please don't waist your time</review_text>
I bought this program because I wanted to use it on the pocket pc (DELL Axim X50v).  The program is very confusing to use.  It took some time to load on the PPC first, then you have to load the maps.  I tried to load the map of the whole state and it wasn't working. The map would come up and the gps reciever would pick up where I was, but when I would write an address of a street that exists, it would say "SEARCH DONE, NO MATCH FOUND."  I called the Delorme support many times, they helped me go through the application, but I feel that this application wont give me directions that I want off of the PPC.I should have bought the iguidance.  One of my friends has this application and it is awesome.  He loaded 3 states all at once and it gives you directions very easily.  There are many points of interest.I particularly like the screen that shows you all the streets in a 3D fashion.  It is easy to use."DON'T MAKE THE MISTAKE THAT I MADE, BUY THE IGUIDANCE OR TOMTOM SOFTWARE."</review_text>
Terrible product, confusing, not easy to use like McAfee. Not meant for a basic computer user</review_text>
Buyer beware. If you encounter a technical issue with this product and require a refund, you're out of luck. They will send you in endless circles attempting to get a product refund. There are many other good products out there that do the same thing. It's really easy to purchase, but impossible to get a refund</review_text>
Unit gives inconsistant results especially with front projection sets.  Spyder also requires room to be as dark as possible in order to make adjustments.  This is not always practical.  The tripod mount fits too loose on Spyder and easily falls off.  I think this is a good beginning to a potentially fine product, but not yet ready for prime time</review_text>
I am really thinking of returning it to Amazon. I think I will stick with good-'ol MS Word. You see I wanted a 12-page form and spent two days creating it. It's a form to survey boats so it also had graphic areas for photos (about 12). Well, all seemed fine until you printed a filled form to .pdf. The size of the created .pdf was near 10MB! (Similary done with MS word resulted in a 1.2MB finished .pdf). Well, I can't be e-mailing 10MB files!I also recieved the book for the 5.0 filler which says it can use Dragon Naturally Speaking (I use that). I'll be darned if I can figure out where that tool is, "you must activate voice recognition in the tool bar." And, if you use Dragon Naturally Speaking in the form filler area all sentences start out without capital letters, say and select does not work. (I should note that Dragon Naturally Speaking works flawlessly in MS Word!) So, you manually have to go back and capitalize each sentence. Finally, as others have said, there is no FAQ and generally no troubleshooting help on the ScanSoft web site.  This is very poor for a near $100 product. There would be no way that I would spend $700 on their premium edition.</review_text>
Do not buy anything from this company unless you will be able to return it within 20-30 days of the shipping date.  (The receipt says 20 days but the web site says 30 days.) You don't have much time to return an item, and the company does not give any leeway for Christmas orders.  I am stuck with the item my son did not want for his dorm room, and I can't exchange it for another item because he didn't like any of their products.</review_text>
I purchased a package for window xp in may this year and just got a computer on which I wanted to use it. On Thursday Nov. 25, we wanted install it but the boot disk # 4 was observed to be problematic and thus the whole installation was not successful.Please advice me.ThanksRev, Ndorle</review_text>
I bought this product on the strength of the Norton name, and a positive review in Business Week.    I uninstalled ZoneLabs, Ad-Aware, and all Norton anti-virus.  There were still NAV files after the uninstall.  I had to download their Norton Software Removal tool, which also could not remove some NAV files.   Everytime I re-boot, those problematic NAV files want to re-launch NAV.The NIS 2007 install was still difficult after all of that effort, and once installed NIS 2007 either freezes up my computer, or makes my internet connection so slow that it is un-usable.So, now I've uninstalled NIS 2007, still have issues with the corrupt NAV files, and will being go back to ZoneLabs and Ad-Aware.</review_text>
I have always used Norton products, and upgraded to IS 2007 when mysubscription came up for renewal. WHAT A MISTAKE. My computerfreezes up all the time, and the software is difficult to use- it isnot at all straightforward like previous versions of Internet Security.Do not buy this product.</review_text>
I bought this product because I thought Norton was a quality product. Man did I make a mistake buying this product. I only had it on my computer for 1 month and it made my computer crawl , almost to where it would not  hardly work. I deleted it . Then my computer starting working just fine. This happened to me 2 times before I got tired of it and trashed it.</review_text>
I bought a new Desktop PC installed with Vista.  It came preinstalled with McAfee 2007.  I have been using Norton products for years, so I bought a 3 user package of North Internet Security 2007.  For the 60 days of the trial, my computer ran flawlessly.  But it was time to install Norton as McAfee had run its course.  I installed the program last night, which took 45 minutes with the Vista update from Symantec, required updates, restarts and the full system scan.  After this time my computer, which as I said ran flawlessly for 60 days, well now every 60 minutes I get the blue screen of death and a forced restart.  I contacted Symantec's customer support only to be greeted with an hour and forty five minutes wait to chat with an analysts (seems that I was not the only one with Norton troubles).   After all this time, the advice I was given was....uninstall and reinstall!!!!  Gee, Einstein, I would have never done that already before I wasted my time contacting you.  But the Symantec analyst was firm that this was the problem.  So I took my morning and uninstalled and reinstalled and...THE SAME BLUE SCREEN OF DEATH but now in under an hour of use!!!  I'm uninstalling this virus and buying a McAfee package ASAP.Oh also, during the time my computer was not crashing, it ran SLOW!!  It is a 2.8 gig processor with 2 gigs of ram but it ran as if it were a 386 processor with 32 megs of ram.  And everything you run, Norton needs you to approve its connection...EVERYTHING.  You can allow Norton to decide what can and cannot connect so you do not have to click every five second, but then you will not be able to user 1/2 of your programs as the geniuses at Norton did not include them in their `safe' list.I regret buying this and only wish I could give it ZERO stars!!!</review_text>
After years of using Symantec Norton Antivirus and related internet security products, the upgrade to 2007 seemed like a no brainier.  That was until the install started.  If you run into error 9999,171 you may as well give up, it is over.Following the Symantec directions for resolution of the dreaded 9999,171 error caused the entire windows XP install to be corrupt and necessitated reinstallation.  Believing that a reinstall was not all bad as it would clean up several old and no longer used software pieces and provide a clean base for installing Symantec I marched forward.  Once XP was installed and current with the patches it was time to install Symantec again.  No luck, I was still receiving the 9999,171 error.Now it was time to get someone on the phone for support.  This is a good trick since Symantec does not readily publish a phone number for support.  The number by the way is 877-832-2810.  Be prepared for a long wait on hold.  During four support calls I experienced no less that 40 minutes on hold and the longest was over one hour.  Support is provided by offshore resources in India so not only are you fighting a technical problem you must also overcome the language barrier.The four separate calls to support resulted in multiple steps to clean up old installs, prep for install, reboot, reinstall, hack through the registry, and oh yah corrupt windows XP again needing a second reinstall.  During the final call, the support rep finally gave up and indicated the Symantec could not be installed on this Windows XP machine.I have since moved on to McAfee Internet Security Suite 2007.  The install took about ten minutes and I am now up and running again.</review_text>
Norton is now owned by the huge behemouth Digital River, who haven't a clue how to run support or customer service.  They are useless and anything with their grimy mits on it and we take a wide berth of it, wouldn't consider it.  Norton used to be top notch, now it is like pouring mollasses into your computer.  It interferes with everything.  Microsoft seems to have given up on them too, as Norton has not bothered to interface properly with Windows, a consequence being that it is also buggy and problematic.  I can only warn you ~ AVOID!!!  A bad bit of software and a company that hasn't any clue about what customer service is and doesn't look likely to change.  Profit seems to be likely more important to them than service or keeping the Norton family of software up to date and working well...</review_text>
This is my first public review of any product. I generally dont have the time or motivation to go throught the process of posting a review. However, I have never had such a negative experience with a commercially available software package before. From beginning to end, the process of repeated attempts to install and then trying to remove NIS2007 was time-consuming, frustrating, and crippled my computer.First the operating environment details. I'm running XP-Pro SP2 on a 2.6ghz pentium with 1GB of RAM.Upon the de-installation of the existing NIS 2006 and Spyware Doctor applications, I proceeded with the installation of NIS 2007. The installation appeared to go cleanly, but upon attempting to restart, my computer hung on shutting down, and upon attempting to come up, I got a blank desktop with no task bar, start menu, or desktop icons. Later, as I was working with Symantec support and was able to get a desktop back, I also experienced things as not being able to bring up the control panel or click on the 'My Computer' icon. Of course, I had no internet access during the whole ordeal.Since I couldnt find any phone number contact in the ridiculously minimal instruction manual that came with the package, I called my local ISP to find out what they knew about the affects of using NIS 2007. Through them I got a phone number for Symantec support. As a side note, the manual points out ways to get support if you have access to the internet and email, but gives no direction if you dont have access to those.Over the course of the next 4 days of working through my issues with NIS 2007, my experience with Symantec support left me with the impression that they were mostly incompetent and quite innefective. I give Symantec credit for having 24/7 phone support, and I did work with one knowledgable support person there named Jay, but most of the experience was frustrating and time-consuming. The help desk is located in India, and the first problem is that they couldnt hear me though I was speaking loudly. The next problem is that I had to answer the same questions repeatedly as if the person didnt understand my answers. On a number of ocassions, I felt the person on the other end was just going through a script, and wasnt listening to what I was saying or reading my growing case notes. I got passed around a lot to different people and spent a lot of time on hold. They kept trying to get me off the phone even though we hadnt worked through the problem completely. In one instance, the helpdesk person was trying to tell me that things were all fixed even when I had told her there was an activation error during the re-install we were working on.Having worked with tech support and edited registries, and tinkered with start-up configurations and various services settings, I could never get NIS 2007 to install (tried four times). Trying to un-install the package turned out to be almost as difficult and troublesome. Uninstalling has left me with problems with my computer I have yet to work out. I still cant use my scanner because it complains about a symantec DLL issue. I have no idea why that would be.Anyway, I would rate this product less than zero if I could. There was nothing that went right, and a lot that went wrong. I cant believe Symantec could put out such a pathetic piece of software with such inffective support. I'm returning NIS 2007 and trying my luck with Zone Alarm.</review_text>
This product is horrifying. It worked for three months, at which point it experienced a complete meltdown. Started getting Auto-Protect errors, and suddenly could access the internet with Explorer, but not Firefox. It kept trying to send me to Live Update, which wouldn't work, so I uninstalled and reinstalled Norton. Now the error happened again, and I could access the internet with Firefox, but not Explorer. An error message referred me to an online "fix," but -- guess what! -- you can't access any of their fixes with Firefox. You MUST be using Explorer. (Which is, in and of itself, offensive and obnoxious.) Explorer, of course, wasn't working. (Incidentally, with Norton uninstalled, all worked fine, so that was indeed the source of the problem.) Uninstalled and reinstalled Norton again, hoping to get on Explorer and get the fix before the error recurred, but now I couldn't get on the internet AT ALL. At that point, I uninstalled Norton for good. Ditto on the fact that they don't support the product, apparently don't stand behind the product, and apparently aren't very concerned about their reputation. Very disappointing. Previous versions were just fine; this is a complete mess</review_text>
Just terrible software.  Often does not work - if that would be the only thing it would be enough.  But it is worse than that.  Bogs down your computer big time.  Makes it run super slow.  Horrible.  Whoever has written good reviews must be shills for Norton.  Avoid.  Repeat.  Avoid</review_text>
Bought System mechanic 6 pro online, it repairs but reports problems but you cannot get information at all. None of the modules report what is being done. If you need assistance forget it, all you get from IOLO is go see the FAQ's, I don't think humans work there just a computer that generates emails. STAY AWAY FROM THIS COMPANY!!</review_text>
After installing in Sony vgc-ra810 system crashed. Unable to find C:. Have been waiting two days for a legitimate answer from I0L0 and now have two case ##. Phone attempts are met with automated replys the same as the internet. The Amazon seller has been very helpfull so I can not blame him. If I ever get my computer running I plan on visiting all sites that support reviews with a word of advice about lack of HUMAN product support by IOLO. As for now I wanted to get this out to Amazon customers so I am using my neighbors computer</review_text>
Save your money!!!I used the evaluation version of System Mechanic version 6 for 29 days and thought it was great enough that I paid for and upgraded to System Mechanic Professional version on the subscription option for $69.95.I download the installer and ran it at 7:30 am on Sunday morning.  None of the modules, I repeat NONE worked.  I uninstalled.  Cleaned out my registery and directories of all traces of this and the previous version and reinstalled, several time to the point that I gave up at 8pm the sam night.  I search the online support and found no help.  I wrote an email and as of today (Wednesday) have not yet received a reply.  Their phone is constantly busy but I did get through last night at 7pm eastern time (they close at 8pm eastern/5pm pacific) and was transferred to tech support.  For the next hour I listened to the message: "All of our support specialist are busy.  Please stay on the line and your call will be answered in the order in which it was received" until 8pm when the recording switched over to: "Thank you for calling Iolo.  Our business hours are from 9am to 5pm pacific time.  Please call back during these hours."I'm extremely upset.  I'm not a noob and have been using computers since the 386 days.As soon as my American Express bill cycles, I will call and have the charge removed.Version 6 was great, version 7 tanks.Save your money.  Spend it with a company who responds to their customers</review_text>
Systemic Mechanic 6 seemed to be helping, since it handled a lot of the advertised functions well.However, the "repair broken shortcuts" function does not work properly.For a variety of reasons I use a large number of Microsoft Word Shortcuts in my Folder/ File  system.   System Mechanic "repaired broken shortcuts" on a large number of my short-cutted documents by directing the shortcut from the correct file target to the wrong file target.   Now I am pulling up documents which are similar ( but are actually older versions which I have save to an auxiliary hard drive ) or unrelated to the actual, correct target file. This has had severe productivity consequences,  since I have to double check the target of every file opened via a shortcut.Contacting on-line Help was of no help whatsoever.</review_text>
Why buy Iolo System Mechanic when you can get malware for free?I installed Pro 7 and it gave many, many problems. Iolo did not respond to my emails so I uninstalled. Their uninstaller did not work either</review_text>
My daughter (13) and I tried The Number Devil together. She has ADD and has difficulty with math. We found the intro to be too long and the games boring.  This game did not keep her attention at all.  We also tried Math Blaster and would recommend that game instead. I am glad others have found this game helpful unfortunately it didnt for us.</review_text>
I bought this software two days ago, Installed it on my laptop and all of a sudden, my network connection was messed up. I could not figure how to connect to the wireless or wired network. My other computers were still able to connect, so it was a problem with the computer with Fix It installed. After much work, I finally uninstalled the software and right away was able to get back on the network. I am not sure if there is some kind of firewall setting with the software, or if it was just the software itself.Anyway, I am unsure whether to reinstall this software or not</review_text>
This software might be recommended if better utilities weren't out there. This one gives the user a sense of security, but when my system crashed, Fix-It couldn't. I dutifully put in the Rescue Disk, booted up on it, restored my earlier system, exited and rebooted.Nothing. Before I'd been able to get into safe mode, but now nothing. So when I manually restored my system, guess which program got yanked? And it freed up a lot of system resources, too. (Had I known how much before, that alone would have soured me.) My system now runs faster and doesn't lag while typing.Another small criticism: Even though Fix-It has automatic update for virus scans, I found more often than not I had to go to the VCom site and manually download the anti-virus files. No reason was ever given; I'd just get a message telling me to do it. Very inconvenient.Also WARNING*WARNING: This program has strict activation. You can only have it on one computer, so forget putting it on your notebook computer.Finally, be careful when cleaning your registry. Look at every entry this suite wants to delete. If you run it on default, it may remove critical registry keys and settings. In fact, I'd use a different registry cleaner or some of the free ones.Fix-It has some great features, but not enough to make it worth the system resources and a system sluggish system. (Not to mention the anti-virus problem). Try System Mechanic instead.</review_text>
I installed this software after getting it free after rebates, and I must say I am not the least bit impressed. It claims to speed up your system, but instead only slows it down. Seems like it would be because it was bugging down my computer, but it's relatively new and has a gig of memory. As another reviewer mentioned, my internet stopped working correctly (although the other computers on my network without this program worked just fine with internet!) and my system restore just wouldn't work. It deleted a lot of entries I needed to run my system correctly.The anti-spyware was an absolute joke & the updates were large files almost every day. 8 MB a day practically.On a lighter note, Fix-It Utilities found a virus other programs were unable to find.I use Zone Alarm Security Suite and then use CCleaner to take care of the rest. I think they're the best combination. No program beats Zone Alarm's. Fast, secure, and won't bug down your computer. I had to reinstall my operating system thanks to Fix-It Utilities</review_text>
I installed the product hoping it would help me with all the errors I was getting (I have Windows XP). Well, 2 weeks and $200 it's what it took for me to have my computer repaired. It would not let me log on to windows, I got errors I've never seen and it completely messed all my files. BIG waste of money. I had to re-format my hard drive and my computer is only 1 month old!!</review_text>
Purchased Fix-It Utilities 6 a few weeks back and installed it on my desk top running Windows XP.  Immediately after installation I ran the program and repaired only the minimum errors as recommended.  However, many programs on my computer would not run and could not access many files.  Called VCOM for help ,but  their solution did not work.  I was even unable to get system restore to correct the problem. I had to re-format my hard drive and re-install all my programs and files.  I cannot recommend this registry repair</review_text>
Don't buy this software even if you get it free after rebates.  It corrupts your windows registry and makes things worse for you.  You will feel your computer is far better after uninstalling this software.Instead, just follow these steps to keep your PC fast:1.  Run Disk Cleanup (provided by XP)2.  Defrag your hard-disk regularly3.  Clean the registry (there are lot of free software available to clean your registry).That's all that you need to keep your computer fit.  No need to use softwares such as Fix-I</review_text>
I recently purchased an HP Laptop that, to my regret, came with a pre-load of Win Vista.  Some of the bad things about this package are:1. The help files are all on line.  If I'm not connected to the internet, I can't access the help files.2. HP does ship it's laptops with the Vista install CD's.  Instead, a CD to purchase an upgrade to the next version of Vista is included.3. For the newer laptops, HP is not producing drivers for any other OS except Vista.4. Vista is less user friendly than XP or even 2000.5. And yes, Vista looks familiarly like OS X, but is harder to work with.  I have owned several Apples and looks are deceiving.  Just because it looks like an Apple doesn't mean it works like one.6. All of my instructional software no longer works.  I use a lot of software to teach Information Security that no longer works on Vista, such as:a. CyberCiege (An information security wargame)b. Boson CCNA Network Simulatorc. Visual Studio (Not everything works)7. Also, some of the network management tools will not run or run properly on Vista.  I do a lot of remote management from the workstation versus going to the server.  Many of the vendors that provide tools are way behind the power curve on their Vista support.I could go on but what's the point?  I can't even dump Vista to go back to Windows XP or even 2000 if HP won't even make an attempt to produce drivers for the laptop.  Linux is out for the same reason, no drivers.  So I'm basically stuck with an overpriced emailer and word processor.If you plan on purchasing a computer, make sure that if you plan on dumping the OS and going back to XP or changing to LINUX, the vendor has all of the drivers to support the change is not on the Microsoft Vista Conspiracy bandwagon</review_text>
Come one people, Windows Vista is not only as unstable as it's Windows predecesors with a very uglu memory management and a really unsecure and ineffective hard drive and files management; I've lost lots of very important files due to Windows "errors" that shut down applications and even the PC itself, so i decided my self: TO USE LINUX OR TO DIE WITH MICROSOFT !, and i'm still alive ! ;-)As i told you, Vista is nothing more but a cheap copy of visual effects that Linux users had from several years from now; in facto, right now i'm using a Linux version called Sabayon and it is a million light years away from Windows Vista, it's visual effects are simply incredible (try searching "Beryl" in youtube for you to know what i'm talking aboyt), i have not only 3D windows, but 3D Desktops, incredible effects to minimize and maximize and a veeeery looooong list of features that you have to see it for yourself to beleave it.I know that you might be concerned for several aspects at this points that wooried me in time (when i was evaluating Windows Vs Linux):1.- My Documents, that will happen with them?. Nothing will happen, in fact you'll ba able to open them and modify them as you please, the OppenOffice suite is totally compatibble with your Microsoft Documents.2.- My programs?, well there are several options to run Windows programs in Linux, as "cedega", "wine", etc etc etc, si it means that you will be able to run most of the windows programs in Linux.3.- Is it hard to use ?. No way !, it's as easy to use as Windows, you will only have to dedicate a few time (may be a couple of hours) to understand several conceps as the multiple destops, the file system, and the users and permission management (that is the one of the most secures in the world) (Microsoft Windows cant's say that!).So, if you don't beleave search google for sabayon and youtube for beryl and you will open your eyes!.So... think about spending this 400 bucks twice, because Sabayon and other versions as Ubuntu, Kubuntu, some versions of SUSE, and other Linux distributions are TOTALY FREE of charge!. you only have to download them and burn it to a CD or DVD, whatever you like.</review_text>
I bought Vista to get the inevitable familiarity over with as early as possible and what I discovered was an operating system not even close to being compatible yet. Half if not 80% of all routers are not Vista-ready yet, so you can't get a network running for at least a few more months. Any accesories you own with your system no longer work unless they're compatible.. (ie, printers, scanners, burners, etc) so you not only buy an operating system, you have to buy an entirely new set of hardware to go with it. Majority of my programs did not work with Vista, be it Adobe software, Maya, Poser and God forbid any games you own like Warcraft. For the expense and complete hassel, it's not worth owning until eveything is "Ready" (which will probably be a year from now) Save your money. - I returned my copy</review_text>
This OS is not for any ordinary user.  If you know nothing about drivers, peripherals, etc, then don't get this OS.  Lots of incompatability issues.  I thought this OS would make my gaming experience better, apparently it needs lots of work.  Can't play CS:S, Day of Defeat, Lord of the rings Online, etc.  BF2142 and some other games play slower in Vista compared to XP.  I hardly write reviews, but I just want everyone to know that this OS suxs!  Stay with XP Pro SP2.  Games move faster and load better and encoding video and editing software runs much much better on XP.  It isn't worth getting right now, wait a year or two until it gets worked out.  Feels like BETA, which it shouldn't.  Microsoft, you get a F- for your new OS.  You fail.  Nice try</review_text>
I'm not a tech guy.  But from a simple user's standpoint, there is no reason whatsoever to change unless you just have to have a small change in appearance.  About 1/2 the software you might have purchased that worked with XP won't work with Vista.I was thinking that Vista would be an improvement.  But there is nothing there.  Just some minor superficial changes as far as I can tell.  Maybe for IT people, there might be some big difference, but for your average user, there is no improvement at all.Save your money.  Don't buy it.</review_text>
You will probably be more productive and less bug ridden if you stick with what you have.15 years of Outlook and you can't print a single address label or an envelope with one click. (or 10 clicks for that matter)There is no function to easily print out mailing labels either.Lets remember Outlook is a Contact manager ... next to many other things...Maybe Outlook 2010 will be the answer.</review_text>
For those considering Outlook 2007, beware of my experience: one morning I ran Outlook 2007 to find it would not download email messages at all. (I would get an error about MAPI.) This appears to be due to an automatic office update of the junk mail filter.One of the most important features of an email program is that it doesn't suddenly stop being able to check email (imagine being on a business trip). Automatic improvements to the junk mail filter sounds great, but if that means one morning I wake up to not be able to check email at all, then the medicine is worse than the disease.The new features and changes Outlook 2007 really do not compensate for the lack of reliability. If you have another email program that works, I'd stick with it and not switch to Outlook 2007.On a positive note, I was able to fix the above problem by running repair (reinstall) from the Office 2007 install program, but this took half an hour or so to run.</review_text>
I have 7 and 9 year old boys that play chess.  They are also both very computer savy.  I bought this program to buff up their chess playing skills and stategy, but they say they find it boring and don't think it has anything to do with playing chess because the game pieces and boards look nothing like the traditional game pieces.  The characters are very difficult to identify and confusing, they are cartoon renditions dressed up in costumes.  I'd save your money and look for a better chess program or get your child involved in an actual chess club</review_text>
Im going to rate this product a 2 because I like it but I would change a few things if I could.  It does show you a lot of chords and how to play properly and all that good stuff.  The couple of things I would change is the fact that when they are teaching you a chord, you can play along with the program but its only about 15 seconds, then  you have to stop and click play again.  I wish there was an option where  you could choose to repeat it on its own a few times so you dont have to stop every time to play it again.  The other thing is something a little more important.  The product has a program where you could go online to down load a lot of songs to play, its called OLGA.  Well this website is having legal problems and is not online anymore.  So you dont have that option of learning to play your favorite songs from the Beetles or Metalica or The Grateful Dead or anyone else, and thats what they advertise "Play hit songs". So overall, knowing all this I would have shopped around more.  Especially for the price, its defenitly not worth 40-50 dollars when all you get is little 15 second examples on jingle bells and little traditional folk songs.</review_text>
I bought this CD title b/c I wanted to learn how to play the guitar again.  My decision to purchase this was based solely on all the Amazon reviews that I perused beforehand.  You can definitely learn to play the guitar with this, but there are so many other titles out there that are cheaper and more up-to-date.  Furthermore, there is nothing more annoying to me than hearing the instructor loudly singing the songs over the guitar strumming.  His voice dominants in many parts of the lessons, and it deafens the sound of the guitar which makes it very difficult to hear the chords being taught.  Again, the software is good but may not be the best on the market.  Then again, I've only purchased three titles, and this one offers a few things that the others don't include</review_text>
After I installed this software, my Windows XP system shut down with the dreaded "blue screen of death".  I'm still trying to return my system to its former useable state!  Beware</review_text>
Doesn't work on Mac like it says that it does louses up your machine not worth i</review_text>
The problem with this game starts with the introductury movie... it develops slowly, goes on forever, suffers from disconnected animation and does little to set up the ridiculous premise for game play.Once game play FINALLY does start, my child found the games boring and the TRANSITIONS between the games tediously slow.  Cute characters...zero edutainment.  It was consigned to the dustbin by the end of the day</review_text>
I guess I'm spoiled by the I Spy games I've purchased for my children. This game has an enormous amount of "story"...it's almost as bad as sitting your child in front of the television. Interaction is confusing and frustrating. I'd rate this lower but it's clear that a lot of work went into the animation, which is top notch. I just wouldn't classify this as a learning game.</review_text>
I have a 2 month old high-end Dell PC with tons of memory and disk, running Windows XP Pro.  This game doesn't work.  Period.  First of all, when I installed it, it reset my graphics options.  Second, when I attempt to play a game, even at the settings that it chose, I get nothing but a white screen.  After numerous tries, and killing the program with the task manager, I finally attempted the other Activities options.  Clicking on them does absolutely nothing!  It doesn't recognize my mouse clicks.I'm assuming that the game was written for the Apple Mac, and ported to the PC.  Trust me, it doesn't work.BTW, we have tons of other kids games and have never had a problem with any of them.Now I have to figure out how to return this silly thing.</review_text>
This thing is a nightmare. First, it is impossible to understand unless you already know how to run some other comparable system. Next, it requires a huge amount of fiddling with buffers (believe me -- read the help files on this, which are huge and suggest ten different things to do when your music doesn't sound good, and trust me, it won't, either before or after unlimited tweaking). Finally, it actually does not export as it says it does. It lost my files, including one song I cannot quite reproduce (gone forever). Bottom line: If your idea of fun is spending two weeks of vacation fiddling with software that does not work and will never work, then by all means, buy this garbage. I have been using computers since 1985, and this is, I think, the worst single product I've ever seen. On the other hand, if you want to actually make music, you might want to try Sony's ACID Pro 6, which you can try out for free (the company thinks you'll like it, whereas the sadists at Cakewalk must know perfectly well that you won't, hence no demo).</review_text>
The retail price is totally wrong. I could get it for cheaper from another vendor</review_text>
Cakewalk"s advertisement saying something like..." no experience needed to operate this software..." is, in my mind, mis-leading at least and a down right lie at most. I've had it now for about three weeks, work on it most days, usually in the middle of the night so I can really concentrate on it, and still cant get anything out of it.All I wanted was some backing tracks for my acoustic guitar work...blues, pop, country....so far nothing and I am thinking about giving up.I can operate a computer but this skill has nothing to do with this most confusing piece of junk I have ever seen.BEWARE...unless your a recording engineer you probably will be disapointed.</review_text>
This is the slowest. Operating. System I have ever used. The first time I installed XP Home, I didn't see what was so bad about it, but when we tried installing it on our new Gateway Machine, it imedettly slowed all system operations down to a crawl. Even My brother's laptop, which is a very Fast Machine, has XP pro, and it randomly slows down. Don't get this operating system. It's slow, buggy, and expensive</review_text>
This operating system was one of the most unsatisfactory I have ever used--including DOS, Win 3.1, Windows 95 and Windows 98.Aside from being incompatible with older hardware, XP Home Edition crashes frequently-particularly if you like to work with several windows open at once.Most important, the program is highly susceptible to viruses and hackers. Preventing these two problems requires expensive add-on software and hardware.True enough, the built-in firewall OUGHT to work. But in my case, hackers got in anyway. I had to hire an expensive data recovery guru-another story in itself.Even reinstalling the program did not solve the problem. My computer was completely compromised. I was eventually forced to junk the machine.After my dreadful experience with XP Home Edition, I have sworn off Windows forever. Mac and Linux are both far superior</review_text>
Do not buy this.  Go with Mac OS X 4.2 Tiger, it doesn't crash or lock up.  Plus you will get access to really cool applications out of the box that lets you do almost anything media-wise.  I could go one for hours how the Macintosh operating system is better but I will say one last thing...  Tiger is faster than Windows.  Research has proved that Tiger and all the other operating systems conserve CPU performance to such an extent that 90%-100% of the speed is left for applications and such.  Windows eats up so much speed along with DOS that from 20%-30% of the performance is left for the user.  That puts a normal Windows computer (3Ghz) at less than 1Ghz.  While a normal Mac computer (2Ghz) runs at 2Ghz.  Plus the fastest Mac is a dual G5 each running at 2.7Ghz.  So actual speed is 5.4Ghz.  The fastest Windows computer is around 3.6Ghz which runs around 1Ghz.  That is a HUGE difference (5.4Ghz-1Ghz.)  When Apple moves to Intel chips next year (about,) The Macs will run around 6.4Ghz if not more.  That is an even MORE HUGE difference.  Take my word for it.  The Windows world is not worth it.  Whenever I go on my Mom's computer (which is running on Windows XP,) I encounter a lock up or annoying hickup in the OS, EVERY TIME!!  I agree that a good amount of people don't find Windows to be unstable, but even when I go to a friend's house I notice them there as well.  Every Windows computer I have used for more than 20 minutes has locked up.  But it's not just this, it's also that Tiger is so much easier to use.Take my advice (I've converted many people) and switch to Mac... Please.  I swear that most of you who read this and switch will be very pleased.  It might be a little wierd at first to get used to the new OS, but I mastered it in a day when it took me months on Windows.  Plus you can purchase Microsoft Word for Mac as well (which I think is easier to use than the Window's counterpart.)So go and throw that ugly Windows computer away and get a spanking new, shiny white, STABLE, Mac!!!</review_text>
I have used DOS, Win3.1, Win95, Win98 and now this piece of crap OS. Microsoft's only interest is making money, thats why they come out with a new release of an OS upon a new release of an OS. Each one just as buggy, insecure and unstable as the previous version.Anything coming from Microsoft just plain sucks.I have now switched from InterCrap explorer to Mozilla and from Out-Crash-express to Thunderbird, soon I will completely switch to Linux, a FAR better and FUNCTIONAL OS for a far better price, namely free. My next laptop will be a Mac.Dont waste your money, Microsoft designed software is garbage by definition. And for the person saying he can understand we are not all geeks : I shouldnt HAVE to be a frigging geek to use an O</review_text>
Since buying the upgrade of windows XP i have had to reinstallit 3 times -onto a clean hard disk- The first time it just disappeared and turned into a blue screen,with messages that hive files were gone missing? 2nd time round the registery gotcorrupted and the last time it refused to boot,and not wantingto have to trall through another install i used the XP CD to try the recovery consol. This was as much use as a cigarettelighter on a motor bike. None of the commands worked,and even trying the help file was useless. There seems to be a seriousproblem with system restore in XP, and im fully updated with all the latest SPacks,and stacks of space on my hard disk  alotted to SR! Check dates will disappear and when you really need ST to get you back and running -it goes pear shaped! I now running 3 restored version of XP completly backed up on a seperate hard disk using Power Quests Drive image.My experences with XP are ITS NOT RELIABLE..</review_text>
I am not at all happy with this product. The instructions are terrible and the program is not at all intuitive. It was a total waste of my money and time.</review_text>
I was able to install most of MS office but am having printer conpatability problems.   I wasn't able to install Vitural Pc properly and get error messages when i boot up.  I'm going to have to the Mac store genius bar to get the problems straightened out.  All in all I think that every thing will work OK but I'm going to have yto travel over 50 miles to get it fixed.  Maybe it's best to stick with Mac software for Macs.  I've NEVER has a problem installing them</review_text>
This product arrived with 2 number 2 installation disks for the Virtual PC and no number 1.  As a result, I was not able to install VPC, which was one of the reasons I purchased this overly expensive product.  The Office part does not seem that signicant an upgrade to the Office X that I had. So it is both an aggravation and a rip off</review_text>
I purchased the upgrade since I'd already bought both Office v.X and Virtual PC 6.1 last year.The biggest letdown is that Microsoft's promised support for the G5 is nearly non-existent.  I have a dual processor G5 with an ATI Radeon 9800 card (Apple), and after trying to install Virtual PC 7 three times, I cannot get a VM to work.  It did install (and work) flawlessly on my G4 Powerbook.  Googling for reviews finds it's very hit or miss, but if (when) it misses, you'll regret investing the extra $$$ in an immature product</review_text>
This product will not work on my notebook even after multiple installs. The tech support emailed that any CD or DVD copy software had to be removed. I guess that sort of makes a DVD or CD R/W drive rather pointless. I removed the copy software and still have bad results. About 1 out of twenty times it get to the menu were you can actually use it.  Maybe it doesn't like my corporate virus protection. I find it hard to believe that a lot of government agencies and large companies use this software if it that picky. I rate this product as totally useless.</review_text>
I have had trouble and no satisfaction with this product.I am downloading Grateful Dead concerts from the internet. I want to turn them into audio or data CDs. Sometimes I get a whole concert as one giant file; I want to cut that into tracks and save it. Sometimes I get a bunch of tracks; I want to combine the songs that "go into" one another (my car stereo inserts a two-second delay between tracks). One of the things I want to do is to save the files (which are mostly MP3s) in the same bit rate and format as the originals, so I loose as little "music" as possible.The MP3 codec seems to be really buggy. Most of the combinations of bit rates and codec strategies create really wacky files: some go 5/6 normal speed, others are compressed into chopped up shortened versions of the original. When I pick a combination of settings that work, I usually lose a lot of fidelity as compared to the original (even when I'm only combinining four MP3's into one).Try cutting one MP3 into two, and then recombining the parts into a whole. No matter what I try, there's a little click in the place where the two files are joined. This should be an easy thing, since a lot of very basic editing is cutting and splicing.The upshot is, buying this was $40 down the drain. I'm going to have to find better software for my purposes</review_text>
The reviews of this software are a bit harsh, but pretty much true. It slow, is a resource hog, doesn't really like to share the machine with other applications. Support is bad, email transfer to move it to another system just plain doesn't work and it is really hard to make a complete backup with all of your attachments.  And - Windows Vista support is really limited.That said, if you have a really fast machine it does work well and has features I use every day that I can't get anywhere else. You can save any email as a history record attached to the sender OR any other person in your contact database. These attachments are copies so they stay with the database even if you purge your email (which is nice).Email client is simple, but because it ISN'T OUTLOOK - I have personally been almost completely unaffected by worms, virus and other email hazards that have over the years affected most MS Outlook users. This is a feature that has saved me more time than the hassles in the first paragraph.The program runs smoothly for me but, I have a Core 2 Duo 7200 with 2 gigabytes of RAM. Just about the fastest processor you can get. I think without the maximum processor and memory you WILL have delays and slooow loading times.One more issue you might have is making backups. Since it uses a SQL database that is open whenever SQL Server is running, a normal backup program might not be able to backup the database file. You need to stop the service first. This is a hassle that if you don't know about you might be setting yourself up for disaster.</review_text>
Let's start with Outlook interface.  These are the exact words from their user manual:"ACT! 2007 E-mail will work through Microsoft Outlook versions 2000, 2002 (XP) or 2003."So those of us with newer versions of Outlook cannot synch the Outlook email or calendar with Act.  What's the point?  Then what are you supposed to synch with your Blackberry - Outlook so you can get your calendar and email information or Act so you can get your client database.The Act email is so basic and primitive looking, you  can't put attractive auto signatures on it.Then they tell you that you can have one month of telephone support, but it's only available during work days, not on the weekends.  Since I purchased the product on the weekend, I won't be able to speak with someone to ask for a full refund until Monday.  I've used this product for 24 hours and I'm giving up.  What a waste of time and money.How does this company survive with such a bad product?If anyone knows of a good CRM program for a small business, please share.</review_text>
iF i COULD, i WOULD GIVE THIS NEGATIVE STARS.Caveat emptor! Let the buyer beware. I made the horrible and expensive mistake of buying this the beginning of Feb. 2007. I had to open the box to realize I needed to load it as administrator. That was beyond my limited knowledge. Since it was opened I stupidly believed in their money back guarantee and got a return authorization. It took forever and many calls. They kept on lying on when the refund was mailed. Yes, this went into April 2007!!!!! They insisted the mailing date was April 9th. On the 18th I thought I'd never get it. They stopped payment and maybe issued another. Well, I received the $199 (I am shafted on my state sales tax.) But because those idiots didn't put the name of my street, it apprently was returned and what I got was postmarked April 16th!!!!! And they refuse to rescind the stoppayment. Sooooo...I now need to pray I will ever receive the replacement. HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE. I can't beleive these people sell accounting and contact software</review_text>
Good grief.  Where do I begin?  We upgraded two computers from 6.0 to ACT 2007.  Prior to the install, we totally reformatted our hardrives and did a clean install of Windows XP.  We performed an XP update, installed MS Office and basically had two smokin' clean machines - more or less brand new.  Then we we installed ACT! 2007 expecting perfection. Our problems with the software have been:1) Miserable, buggy installation - barely worked.2) Inability to convert our old ACT 6.0 e-mail database into the new version of ACT 2007.3) Slow, slow, sloooowwww performance.4) e-mails will delete themselves for no apparant reason.  This is the worst of all.5) Terrible syncing with the Palm.  Sometimes it works, other times it doesn't, overwrites data when it is not supposed to and vice-versa.5) Useless Sage tech support.Don't buy this product.  In fact, I would never buy another product from Sage ever again.  My colleague has already ditched ACT! and switched to using the Palm Desktop and Outlook Express.  This was after losing all his e-mails.  If I lose all my e-mails again - I will uninstall and ditch my copy altogether.I would love to reclaim the hours of my life lost to this poorly written loser of a program.</review_text>
1 Star is being generous.  I've been an ACT user for almost 20 years.  I think it's time to say good-bye.Reasons:1.  2007 version is agonizingly slow.  Effects my whole system.  I added 1 gb of RAM bringing my total to 2gb with no improvement.  Seems like 5 secs to execute ANY command in the program.  Doesn't seem like much bu count it...one one thousand, two one thousand...  It adds up when you use the program all day, every day.2.  Support is atrocious. You get 60 days after purchase and then can't even access their tech moderated forum unless you pay $300 a year.3.  It ought to be broken down.  I use it to manage client information and communication, I don't need all the Opportunity garbage and one can spend more time managing a process than actually doing the darn thing.4.  Support sticks.  In the last couple of years, I've never had a phone call answered in less than 30 minutes...and that includes when I was dumb enough to pay the then $200 a year.5.  Support stinks even when you pay 300 a year.6.  Support is a ripoff.  One support plan.  No by incident option.  300 bucks or nothing.7.  Did I mention that support is the worst?  They seem to do things on the website and then think about what they just did.  Navigating their forums is a nightmare.  I had to click around for 10 minutes this morning to figure out how to post in an unmoderated forum.  (BTW, 4 messages total in the 2007 section in 6 months.  I guess most pay their 300 bucks for the moderated forum.)8.  An example of how time consuming it can be:  It took me a week of phone calls with several reps to get the UPGRADE installation to function.  And I mean it didn't function at all.  It made such a mess that I had to reformat my hard drive to get it to install.  A first in 20+ years of computer use.Sage seems to think this program is the only one a user installs on their computer.  Bad attitude.SAGE and ACT! are poster children of everything bad about the software industry today.Do yourself a favor, if older versions are working for you...stay there.  The enhancements in 2007 are not worth the trouble.If you're looking for a contact manager, look elsewhere.</review_text>
It is difficult to use words harsh enough to describe this product and this company.I have owned this software for about 80 days.1. In 80 days of use this product has completely locked up or not opened twice.2. I have called the 'support' line 4 times. The minimum time I was on hold was 40 minutes.3. My initial 'support' period is about to expire and I now will have to pay $200 to get more 'support'4. You have to buy additional software to get your data onto a palm device.In summary: The product has locked up about every 40 days and the average hold time is 40 minutes when you call them.Save yourself the grief - buy nothing or buy something else</review_text>
I have been a long-time ACT! user. My biggest complaint is recovery. If you have to move the email and database to another computer due to a failure you have to jump through hoops; that's just what one feels like doing when the pressure is on. I still can't bring my ACT! 2007 email over even though ACT! says it was restored successfully (empty folders!). They have a ridiculous technical support team unwilling to help unless you pay, pay and pay and their knowledge base must have been restored like my email: non-existent. The earlier versions were great. I agree with a previous reviewer that when they switched to SQL it all went downhill. I think I'll stick with anything else. It is really ashame. ACT! used to be fast, tight and clean; now it is clunky, lethargic and hangs for 20 seconds on all the time (for some stupid reason) running on an a 2.4 dual core AMD with 4GB memory. Even when Symantec had it they didn't screw it up, but now, you may be better-off sticking with the Palm Pilot contact management software--well, maybe not</review_text>
I just purchased the top end Dell Dimension XPS (with the 10,000 RPM harddrive) but I still have to allow about 10 seconds for the initial program startup, then it seems to hang for 15 to 20 seconds after that. I usually just go get a cup of coffee when I start ACT and when I come back we are ready to roll.I also reboot my system every time I close ACT.  The system just seems to run better without any "lingering" remnants of the program in memory.Whenever I delete a contact the program locks up.  It has done this through several versions.  I simply reboot, restart ACT and it works fine.At some point ACT changed the date on many (hundreds) of my activities to 11/18/2004.  Now I manually type the date into the call, to do, meeting and note fields to avoid this problem in the future.I have been an ACT customer since the early DOS days.  I have a huge commitment to the program in that much of my important data is now stored here (and some of it is nowhere else).  It is so difficult to export "all the data" (including notes, history, etc) that I am basically trapped.My point is, a program like this is not one that you can easily bail out of like Word or Excel, which has some alternatives available which will read your current files.  A lot of the ACT! database is proprietary and while you can purchase a conversion program from a few vendors, it is not a cheap proposition to do so</review_text>
We may never know if we like this product as the Amazon box was empty when it arrived.  We have had no help from amazon, compusa, nor the maker of this software after numerous emails and phone calls.  This was my son's Christmas present and he's still waiting... at this rate we'll end up with the opinion that we shouldn't order software online...</review_text>
DarkBASIC is only good for people very new to programming and interested in games. To make a commercial-quality game in this language would be lunacy, BASIC just isn't quite flexible enough to do that with ease, and the DarkBASIC renderer looks very, very ugly. However, BASIC remains very easy to learn and DarkBASIC has some commands that are fun to toy with.If you're trying to get into serious game development, learn C++ and either learn how to use libraries like OpenGL or DirectX, or start modding a popular engine like the Unreal engine or Source. And make sure you've learned a good deal of physics and math</review_text>
This program is good if you want to mold the matrix bit by bit. But if you want to make games in a snap, spring for the professional and get a level editor on a DarkBASIC website</review_text>
I got this as a present about two years ago, and I have had mixed feelings.  I like it, but I get really frustrated because the program is buggy.  I cannot create a standalone executable, and the program has random bugs.  Also, it is very hard to create proffesional-type games.  Be aware that the machine you run standalone programs on has to have a video card, regardless of whether you use it or not.  In conclusion, good idea, but very buggy</review_text>
Thought the cards would be like Broderbund's American Gretings Creatacard Platinum 8 software but it was not and I did not like what I got.</review_text>
I bought a new state-of-the-art computer in February that came preloaded with Windows Vista. I was initially excited to get a computer that was running the newest operating system, and I hoped it would mean that my computer would have a much longer effective life. I have been nothing but disappointed since receiving this machine, especially knowing that had I called Dell, they would have installed XP instead.PROs:-Better security (it prompts me & allows me to stop some of the annoying "automatic" programs that software makers sneak onto your system)-Better appearance (this is strictly cosmetic, and I'd rather stare at an ugly screen that worked rather than a pretty, useless one)CONs:-FREEZING: I use this computer 2-3 hours a day and I can expect 1-2 freezes/day. Restarting often fails, and I have to cut the power and restart again.-DISPLAY PROBLEMS: although the cosmetics of the program were better, Vista can't display anything right. I tried updating the display driver which caused a major crash after restarting. I had to boot in safe mode and rollback the driver to get my computer back. Apparently, the newest display drivers are incompatible with Vista.-INCOMPATIBILITY: Entirely too many programs are incompatible with Vista, including some fairly big ones (lots of Adobe software, iPods, display drivers, etc.) I know Vista is new, and these software companies are slow to adapt, but does it really make sense for an operating system like Vista to render virtually all of my other software obsolete? Why can't Vista play nicely with the other kids?-ITS SLOW!!!-- Part of the reason I bought a new, state-of-the-art computer was to replace my old laptop (which still runs OK, but has become a little buggy & sluggish in the past 4 years). Although this computer is light years ahead of the old one, it actually runs EVEN SLOWER than my old laptop. Technical support has largely attributed this to the demands of Vista.BOTTOM LINE:1. IF YOU ARE NOT GOOD WITH COMPUTERS, AVOID VISTA LIKE THE PLAGUE2. VISTA IS A RIP-OFF. Save your money and keep/get XP-- I'm probably going to return my computer and make the manufacturer install XP so I can regain some speed and system stability. Maybe in the future Vista will work OK, but not right now...3. The incompatibility issues-- though there are several-- conspicuously include problems with Mac-oriented software (iPod, Adobe). I can't help but feel that Microsoft built-in these specific incompatibility issues in order to battle Apple</review_text>
SAVE YOUR MONEY. DOES'NT BILL ALREADY HAVE ENOUGH OF IT? I WISH BILL HAD TO PAY US FOR ALL THE WASTED TIME AND HEADACHES. DON'T WORRY, FOR A FEW DOLLARS MORE YOU CAN FIX IT. WHAT A RACKET</review_text>
Microsoft should have done more testing on this product.  This is one mess up product.  I have never seen a version of Microsoft Windows so mess up.  There are so many bugs in this product it is not funny.  I've always been a big Microsoft fan, but I can't endorse this version of Microsoft Windows.  I'm a PC and Console gamer and let me tell you something.  Microsoft Windows Vista does not go with most PC games.  That is very sad.Even if Microsoft gave me a free version of Microsoft Windows Vista Home Premium, I wouldn't take it.  I've read where some Federal Government Agencies won't even use Microsoft Windows Vista because it so mess up and it has so many bugs in it.  I'll stick with Microsoft Windows XP which from what I understand pretty much does all the same things that Microsoft Windows Vista does but without all the bugs in it. Plus you can play any PC game on Microsoft Windows XP.  You can't do that with Microsoft Windows Vista.  I love Microsoft Windows XP.Why should anyone waste their time and money upgrading to Microsoft Windows Vista if it doesn't work right?  It is really frustrating because brand new PC games coming out right now and in the future aren't compatible with Microsoft Windows Vista.  If you don't believe me, go into different gaming web sites and read about all the problems people are having playing brand new PC games that just came out with Microsoft Window Vista.  Please Microsoft, fix Microsoft Windows Vista</review_text>
I think this product is highly overated and this claimof being 99% accurate is false.Once in while it can amaze you by typing a sentence with 100% accuracy , but this enthusiasm is quickly dashed whenyou realise that the very next sentence is completegibberish which bears absolutely no relation to what yousaid and you wonder how it could have possibly interpetedwhat you have in that manner.I think this program maybe accent sensitive so that a person with an American accent may get good results whilea person with a British or an Australian accent may get poor results for the same level of training.In summary I think the program is unreliable with anaccuracy of 45% at its present level of developement.It has plenty of potential and with future developementit could much more reliable but at its present level ofdevelopement I think the performance is mediocre.</review_text>
I will never buy another product from this manufacturer. I have a legal copy of this program, and on the weekend my motherboard died. I had to buy a new board then reinstall all my software, and when I got to DNS8 it told me I'd registered too many times and I had to buy a new copy.Hidden somewhere in the site I found reference to uninstalling the previous install whilst online to allow me to install it again. So, I dug out my old hard drive, set it up temporarily, connected to the internet and uninstalled. Went to the new machine and installed and ... no dice. Same message.This is the worst example of product activation, and when I went to customer support they wanted my credit card number in order to charge ME $9.95 to install a legally purchased product. I will now explore other means because I fully intend to use the software I paid a lot of money for.And in case anyone from the company ever reads this (unlikely), I'm going to use all my online clout to tell people just how annoyed I am. I only get one thousand three hundred unique visitors per day to my websites and blogs, but that adds up to quite a few people over a couple of months and you can be damn sure every one of them will hear about this. I once wrote a lengthy blog post praising your product. Now it's time for the addendum</review_text>
G'day,I bought DNS 8 Standard to use mainly on trips so I could keep a diary of the trips.When I tried it, the voice recognition was so-so.The worst part was that after about 3 pages the "file" fills up and you have to begin a new one.Now maybe there is a way around this, but I and no one else will be able to find out from Nuance.  Their customer [dis]service is down at the bottom of the Marianas Trench.  [I could make reference to whale droppings, but that wouldn't be polite.]I emailed them about this and was told to call for an answer.  However, that would be my one and only free call.I really think, Nuance needs competition.Hello there Microsoft</review_text>
I bought this software because I really wanted to learn Spanish and be fluent. The price and marketing of the company made me believe that this package was the most complete package on the market.So I was very excited to receive it after spending $450 on a software. My excitement did not last long after that.I was shocked to see how the software itself looked, I was expecting a top of the line interface for the price I paid but that software seemed years old.But I still wanted to get my money worth so tried the first level for hours, even days, as I was convinced I could learn Spanish with it. I also tried the other 2 levels to make sure that my issue was not only with that first level.I had looked at the demo and noticed that most of the content was based on that same acitivity with the 4 pictures. I was expecting different exercises for the full version...The software gets so repetitive, I was really disappointed, even more because of the outrageous price of that package</review_text>
This was a huge waste of money. If you have plans to make a custom animation, do not buy this.  Anime only alows you to manipulate one of their few charecters.  You can not change eye color or hair color.  If you want a good animation you have to go to one of their websites and purchase a character for $10- $20.  Their free ones are completly dumb. Using their "easy to use" bone rigging tool takes a long time to set up and use.  It took me ten minutes to make one for a stick figure. (which didn't work very well) You can't even group anything unless you buy their $180 upgraded version.  I  spent hours trying to use this, and could figure none of the above out.  It also took two weeks to get here instead of four days.  I don't recomend this to people who are looking for an easy to use animation creator.</review_text>
Don't buy Vista--any version, yet.  MS released it WAY too early.  Some examples why:* Too many hardware drivers not yet available, i.e., Creative Audigy  sound cards; Nvidia graphics cards, and Linksys wireless network components, just to mention a few.  When I contacted product manufacturers, I sensed a ho-hum attitude.  Moreover, some peripherals are totally incompatible.  Example:  My Epson Perfection 1650 scanner was rejected by Vista, so I was forced to buy a newer model (Epson Perfection 4990 Photo).  Hmmmm.  One wonders whether these sorts of incompatibilities result more by design (purposely?) than from insurmountable technological deficiencies.*  Too many Vista compatible application updates are not yet available.*  The "Upgrade" versions of MS Vista (versus the "full" versions) seem to be full of bugs.  Soon after I installed Vista Ultimate, I encountered a major problem that MS tech support has been trying to resolve for over two weeks.  It is so pervasive that MS Outlook 2007 has been affected to the extent that some of its features are not available.  It appears that during the installation process, something went awry with "Windows Event Log" and the "Event Viewer."  Furthermore, the latest version (Vista compatible) of Diskeeper 2007 Pro will not launch, most likely for the same reason.*  It appears MS went way overboard on security features to the extent of paranoia.  Every time you click on just about anything, a pop-up will appear asking your permission to "allow" it to launch.  Very annoying, and VERY unnecessary.  It's as though MS adopted an underlying assumption throughout the development process that the average end user has an IQ of about 85.*  MS tech support quality has deteriorated substantially.  Most of the time when you call you will reach someone in India.  Albeit these people are very polite, they cannot think "outside the box."  Nor are they in touch sufficiently enough with the nuances of the English language, thus impairing expeditious understanding on both sides of the conversation.  Based upon my recent experience with these folks, I sense that a soccer mom could be trained as a MS tech support rep in very little time. What I mean by that is this:  During my multiple contacts with them I developed the feeling they rely totally on reading from manuals, scripts, and on-line knowledge bases.  In other words, they seem not to be able to analyze and troubleshoot problems independent of external references.* Bottom line:  Do NOT purchase Vista until AFTER service pack 1 is released, or whatever they happen to name their first major fix-it update package.  For now, stay with the more reliable XP versions.  I truly regret that I had to discover all of this the hard way.  It has been very costly in more ways than one.</review_text>
I have used Turbo Tax for as long as I can remember.  I have always purchased their business and their personal tax products.  Generally I had been satisfied. However this year after spending much time over many months working on a complicated return, Turbo tax dumped all the data including that which was saved many times over several months. It corrupted all but 2kb of data and can't even open that. Of course you can't get a person via telephone or email.I would give them o stars if that was an option. So long Intuit</review_text>
This was my first year using Turbotax, and it's also my last!Since 1992 I was a faithful user of HR Block's Taxcut for Mac.  In spite of it costing more than the Windows version, I used it every year except for 1995 when various problems related to my AOL dial-up service prevented me from using it.  Since TurboTax is the only option out there for people who use a Mac, you'd think I'd be continuing to use them for now on, - but you'd be wrong!I purchased my copy of TurboTax Deluxe from Amazon.com to save $5.  Since TaxCut made certain that no information from it's software could ever be imported by other software, I filled in my personal data as I began.  I was a little disappointed that TurboTax doesn't allow you to skip the "step-by-step" method, and just fill in the actual forms the way TaxCut did as an option.    While the downloads were an annoyance (6 or 7 separate files each time), for the most part the software was OK.  Picking up from where you leave off wasn't always possible, but 5 or 6 clicks would get you back to the right spot.My first major annoyance came with the state software.  After filling in some data, and seeing the overall results, I wanted to look at the forms to see what they were doing with my data.  I also needed to see where they had placed data that was imported from the federal information I'd entered.  Well, there's no way to see your data on state forms until you're finished and print them out (or preview as .pdf files from the print dialogue).  When you do that the software somehow magically creates the state forms for printing, but the state forms don't seem to exist anywhere else except in that print spool!  I found this extremely annoying, and a real time waster.The final blow, however, was when I got to filing.  The advertising is an unnecessary annoyance.  Since I don't owe any state taxes, I just usually print those forms out and mail them in --- it doesn't make any sense to me to pay for filing something when I don't owe anything and I'm not going to benefit from that "faster" refund.  Then I came to the crusher.  TurboTax wanted $30 for e-filing my Federal forms!!  TaxCut charged $14.95 and $15.95, but then they always rebated the cost.  I was told that Intuit used to do that, but obviously they decided to make some additional money this year.  Earlier in the day that I filed the saw the head of the IRS on CNBC being interviewed. He said that e-filing makes their job so much simpler.  Well, if it helps them that much, they should devise a way for computer users who buy software to file returns directly to the IRS without Intuit, H R Block and the others as middlemen.  And they should let us file for free if it makes their work so much easier.While I have had my doubts about the services that allow you to fill out online forms, and then do your filing for you, I haven't heard of any security problems with them, so that's the direction I'm planning to take next year.  As far as I'm concerned, TurboTax blew it by being unfair with their e-filing fees</review_text>
I have used Intuit products since 1992, and was quite satisfied until 4 years ago when Intuit began installing hidden software on users' computers in an attempt to "stop piracy", which caused numerous problems for us honest users who paid for the program.Secondly and even more significantly, I began noticing an apparent shift in Intuit's philosophy toward it's customers: cut back on customer support, and attempt to exploit them at every possible opportunity in order to make more money.In short, Intuit disrespects their customers.As a loyal paying customer, I will not be disrespected or taken for granted. Their level of service and support has declined. Their products constantly pimp you to spend more money on Intuit as you try to use their programs.That is why I have sworn off Intuit products when there is an alternative.  Why reward someone who treats you badly?</review_text>
if you have used the online version in the past, stick with it. buying it on disk does not allow you to import data from previous returns if done on line and you can not upload to myturbotax. almost as if two separate companies! plus the User interface on this software stinks bigtime. very hard to navigate back and forth. online version is actually better (though i didn't try it this year). does intuit actually employ programmers or watch real users? they spend far too much money on useless features like videos and not enough on simple ui issues</review_text>
I have been using Turbo Tax since 1998, I use computers every day, and (as an engineer) I am used to using difficult applications (Pro-E, Mathcad, UG, etc). This years edition of Turbo Tax Deluxe was the worst Turbo tax I have ever seen (& I usually like it very much). I purchased in January and had to update 4 times. One update took 6 hours (some of us live in the boonies and broadband is not an option). In addition, the application brought up menus and selections that were not applicable (farm income at the PA State form). When I tried to delete the entries (at the Federal level as instructed) they would not. My 1 business expense entry kept getting duplicated ("copy 2" and every time I deleted it, it would reappear on the next pass through. Every time I entered the "State" tab, it acted like I was never there before with a "Start State" button that always lead me through all the same questions (It did retain my answers from prior visits). Where was the "Continue State" button? I also noticed that using the "back" button and then moving foreward again caused never before seen dialogs to occur, even though the same "foreward" choices were made. Once I backed up to check something & then moving foreward caused my state tax status to jump from +$46 to -$1548!! Upon backing up I saw that some of the check boxes regarding the sale of my home were unchecked. I did not check them, but rather backed up two more screens, then moved foreward again the two screens and the boxes were again checked! One more foreward click and my taxes again returned to +$46. One of the years I liked best was when there was a "checklist" so you could see where you had been and what was already addressed. This years State was definetly worse than the Federal, but even that was a dissapointment. I did complete this years filings & submitted both online, I hope I don't get burned! Turbo Tax!-- Please improve for next year or it may be my last year. You realize that at 59.95 + 39.95 filing + my time + aggravation like this year, and an accountant is looking attractive. If you are on the "inside" you probably know why this is happening...outsourcing code gen to India, not  outsourcing code gen to India, programmer cut-backs, programming application changes, archiving application changes, project management issues, whatever. Just realize that there is a problem & fix it</review_text>
Since Tax Cut decided not to produce a Mac version this year, I got stuck with Turbo Tax.  Their website promises that one may import data from the previous year's Tax Cut return.  Then you buy the thing, and you find out that it requires you to load the Turbo Tax program and your 2004 Tax Cut data onto a Windows machine, transfer there, then load it back onto the Mac for this to work.  So, like a chump I borrowed a friend's windows machine and did all this.  But, it doesn't work.  Not at all.  And it takes a lot of time to find that out.  Tried every workaround I could think of.  Nope.  It doesn't work.</review_text>
For federal returns this is a generally usable product with a very poor User Interface and Help system,   For state returns this product falls below the bar of "usable".  I have used the principle competitor, "Tax Cut: in the past and have found it to have generally a poor UI, but it was significantly better than Turbo Tax.Some examples of the poor User Interface experience are:*	If you enter the employer ID number from a W-2 in an attempt to retrieve it from the internet and the retrieve fails, then you are asked to re-enter the same ID number when you enter the W-2 information manually.*	Investment Sales: I have about 20 stocks I've sold over the past year, but the window only shows 3 at a time (with a scrollbar).*	On the form page, Schedule D-1 (the continuation form for stock sales) is displayed on the screen with scrollbar if the number of items exceeds the window height, but the scroll bar would not let me scroll to the bottom 2 entries.  Printing these out does however show them*	When entering a stock sale, you can indicate it is worthless to which Turbo tax will tell you that it will set the sale date to 12/31, regardless of what you entered in compliance with IRS rules.   So on my next stock that was worthless I tried to not enter a sale data knowing it would just override it, but the program insisted I enter a sale data, only to then immediately override it.*	Entering Federal information was usually clear enough, but an obvious lack of effort is shown in the state returns (PA in my case).  Cryptic questions are asked with no explanation and no useful help.  For example "Enter adjustment to income, and indicate type of adjustment -- the choice for type include OID, ABP, etc. with no explanation of what these are!.  It is not clear whether the amount of the "adjustment" should be an absolute or a delta. Requesting help brings up a screen on an irrelevant topic (penalties for early withdrawal of savings).*	On my state return, it dragged me through 3 screens for EVERY stock sale I made.   (about 20 of them - so 60 screens).  Since it already had the info from the federal return I was doing nothing other than clicking Continue over and over. Much better would be to present me with a table of all the sales and ask me to check the information there.*	It transferred information about my stock sales from my Federal to my state return.  However I was only a part year resident of the state and it made no attempt to either calculate, or warn me, that many of the sales would not be taxable events in that state because they were sold when I was not a resident of that state.In conclusion, while Turbo Tax ultimately did help me get the job done, I think I'll try going back to TaxCut next year</review_text>
After purchasing this product, I found there were several problems with scanning. I contacted Nuance (who purchased ScanSoft) to ask for assistance from Technical Support. However, I then learned they want $9.95 for each incident when a request is made by email. Not by phone - by email. After putting out a great deal of money for this product, I should not have to pay $9.95 for assistance with each issue that is a problem with their product. Save yourself a great deal of grief and avoid this product. I regret that Amazon does not allow me to give this product "0" stars.</review_text>
I was a real fan of omnipage until this version. The scanning speed is slug like. The proof reading function has is less functional the version 14, and it tends to forget the scanner settings.No noticable new features where added from version 14, and this seems to be a new version for the sake of milking the client base</review_text>
If you spend a good deal of your time doing OCR on books skip this program. It is even slower than the previous version (which was tortoise-like) still screws up the order of columns, is very bad at reading mixed numbers and letters, Takes forever to move through long documents, and just genreally makes you feel like you are back to using a 486 when you are working on a pentium 4. Oh, and don't be fooled by the claim that it can actually create fillable forms. It will take you less time to create it from scratch in Word than to scan it in and then fix all the errors. I'm switching to Kurzweil</review_text>
I've used Omnipage 12 and 14 and got the latest version to convert an out of print book to a text pdf.  Nothing really fancy, two column text mostly w pictures and captions plus 3 tables. Using this software was a nightmare.  The OCR worked better than the previous version BUT it showed mixed fonts on the page (two column text w a title about 1/3 down and above the text).  No problem I thought, I'll just use the wysiwyg (what you see if what you get) text editor to fix this..it looks very nice w some good features.  Well, wysiyg is more like wysiwyDON'Tget.  I'd fix the fonts, save the file, open it in adobe reader and find that Omnipage had made some startling changes in the fonts/size and the titles.  I tried for 3 hrs to get a simple table of contents page w just a title and 8 lines (each w text followed by a page number)...no go.  Plus the wysiwyg editor would sometimes inexplicably throw me into 'replace text' mode while I was trying to insert text and I couldn't get out.In frustration I used a friends machine w Abby Finereader 7.0 Pro...what a welcome change.  OCR was at least as fast and accurate and the editor, while not as feature laden as Omnipages, actually worked!  I did in 6 hrs what I'd been trying for well over 12 to do in Omnipage..and that was w/o going thru any of the tutorial info..just loaded it and started.  I'm buying Abby for my next project, they've upgraded to 8.0 and I'll bet it's editor delivers what Omnipage only promises.  I wouldn't recommend Omnipage 15 Pro to anyone</review_text>
I bought this to convert some .AVI and .MOV files so I could try video podcasting with a web multimedia class I teach.  I've done this successfully with a shareware product, but thought the resulting video could be a little sharper, so I was willing to pay for and try a commerical product.  (Pinnacle, right?  They do a lot of this stuff, they must know what they're doing . . . . )  HA!!!!  HUGE mistake.  The interface is horrible, and the conversion just-plain-sucks.  Everything came out in flouescent colors with huge blocks covering the screen.  Totally, completely unwatchable.  It looks like a 60s psychedellic experience, like "motion art," not like a proper video at all.  Avoid this product!!</review_text>
I bought this, installed it, patched it, and then started going through the rather incomplete and disorganized documentation. The examples I played around with all worked fine. I started writing my own program, a simple math game with basic sprites and speech. I wrote a simple speech and graphics routine, which mostly worked. I wanted to try to figure out why one of my functions was going into an infinite loop and so I started the Debug mode, so I could watch what the variables were doing (very simple, basic, and common programming practice). Blat - debug mode crashes. Debug mode works on much simpler programs and for the few examples I tried out, but on my 200 line routine it generates exceptions. After the crash, I opened my project and found that everything I had written in my source had been reverted to an old version. I know for a fact that it was saved many times since then, but for some reason it decided to recall an old version for loading, as if all my Saves after an arbitrary point never happened. If I can't run debug mode on my programs or save my sources, then what's the point of this software? Complete and total buggy garbage</review_text>
I purchased this item from Amazon.  The disc had scratches and was unable to either use it or get my money back.  These items can not be returned</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the box saying how many they've sold anyone who knows anything about software knows you cannot return an opened software box so sold means nothing.This software in unimpressive, I bought it because I needed to do my wedding invitation and I liked the description thinking I could use it for may other things as well.Well I ended up using WORD for my invitations, yes WORD, why because word actually did everything I wanted that this program said it would do but didn't! I spent HOURS trying to use it's "simple" templates to no avail they would not print correctly or in the size they claimed to be. In the end I am out the money I spent and pretty mad about it</review_text>
I bought this to protect my new Dell Axim, a replacement for my Palm Tungsten E (and a step up).  The Axim is wireless enabled so I wanted to protect it.  When I tried to install it, I ran into major issues.  It automatically wanted to install to the Palm (seeing the Palm Desktop software).  There was NO way to override it or choose which device to which it should install.  I contacted Customer Service (an issue in itself) via phone and email.  Emailed response told me to uninstall my Palm software.  How stupid!  I have no intention of uninstalling the Palm just yet.  Meanwhile, trying to PHONE Customer Service was a joke.  I tried a few times, once spending over 60 minutes on hold, another over 90 minutes, with no human contact.  I have a business to run, not plenty of time to waste!  Maybe it works great, but the complications of trying to install prevented me from ever finding out.  Amazon was terrific and let me return the product</review_text>
BE CAREFUL - If you buy this version of Symantec Antivirus for Handhelds -IT WILL NOT WORK WITH MICROSOFT MOBILE 2005.  Supposedly Symantec Antivirus for Handhelds. Version 3.5 will work with Mobile 2005</review_text>
I Purchased this product in Nov 2006. Reviews at other sites indicated this was a wonderful product, the very best, editor reviews - not user - the product is to new I guess. I looked at the specs and it had features which looked very appealing, so I thought I would try it - Bummer. Acronis 10 installs fine, sets up a file system on a seperate physical drive and appears to work, until you verify the images, all are corrupted. I have contacted Acronis several times, they have given me several test tools to find out what might be wrong.  Nothing has been resolved after 4 1/2 months. The tools and debuging has shown no errors in my hardware.  I have to keep using Ghost-2003 to do my images, it works fine. Acronis support acts like its a unheard of problem, but I now find references all over the Internet about this image corruption problem going back to version 6</review_text>
This product is a huge waste of time.  It loaded easily enough, looks friendly, and is feature rich but it just doesn't work !  And support is awful.  Biggest problem is it just would make a good back up image.  Burned many dvd's and the program kept telling me the files were corrupted.  In most cases, I couln't even get confirmation of that.  The program did something to my DVD drive.  It would ask me to swap a spanned set, yet disable my drive !  Process had to be cancelled, whole system rebooted just to get access to my dvd drive again.  When I tried manually checking the files they wouldn't open.  Explore or mounting the images kept requiring a "password".  But I don't use passwords !  Made sure the settings were all password free.Stick with Norton Ghost !!!!!</review_text>
this software never worked after installation using the cd i bought it ask me to extend my preview " your preview using this feature has expired to continue using purchase the full version today"I have tried to contact the seller in vain. This is very unfortunite for such people to continue hacking customers money with under rated product</review_text>
This software is fine for altering digital pictures if you do not have any other programs, but if you want to make exciting slideshows, this software is very basic and not user-friendly.  I had technical problems from the start.  You are better off using MS Powerpoint than this software</review_text>
this product is extremely difficult to learn. I recently purchased two more expensive manuals ro learn the process and also the tutorials the company has are beyond the average users learning.</review_text>
I received the bundle but there is no installation key for Shade LE.I noticed the someone else's review stating this same problem is no longer visible so I figured I'd post it again</review_text>
...buy it here and save $s!Shipping cost from the UK added $46.95 to the price AND a Foreign Debit Card Transaction fee of $2.51 for a waste of $49.46 that could have been spent getting additional models.Or get the download version and save even more as like someone else pointed out, the included manual is near useless and has not improved since version 4. Practical Poser 6 is still the best book to get if you are serious about doing Poser 6 development</review_text>
I installed Adobe 8.0 at the request of a client in order to view secure docments on-line.  Two serious problems were caused by this: 1) Window 2000 Outlook runing under XP would crash after the Adobe reader was launched. Closing the reader and restarting Outlook would not always fix the problem. Often the computer would require a cold re-boot.2). More serious, Adobe 8 installation corrupted my Agilent Technologies Genesys 8 and later (Eagleware) RF simulation software tools.  This resulted in the Genesys simulator to fail to find the authentication file.  Because the correlation between installing Adobe was not apparent considerable amount of time was lost on this project.  Adobe also causes problems with OrCAD 15 license server.I have currently un-installed Adobe 8 had to re-install and patch previously installed Microsoft and enginnering software tools.</review_text>
Please see reviews of the previous version 7.0. The Adobe activation process can cause a lot of continuing problems for legitimate users of this software. Too bad such good software is hampered by such a process. Being in the software business, I don't mind companies worrying about piracy and taking some measures but this is a bit too much. You might need to allow the software to access the internet regularly to keep your activation (and not bother you with notices of reactivation) but that also means you open it for Adobe to do their push marketing into their software. I have used Adobe products for over 15 years and have always liked them. Too bad, they have lost the customer focus in their rage for software piracy and greed for intrusive marketing</review_text>
TaxCut did not warn me that I needed to fill out additional forms required for taking the exemption for a qualified child, nor did it lead me through the Schedule C like TurboTax does. TurboTax may be more expensive, but it's well worth it to save the headaches that this program caused. If you have complicated tax forms or unusual tax situations (or prefer an intuitive program, rather than something that makes you say "What am I supposed to do next???") stick with TurboTax</review_text>
This program has a bug in processing 1099-R data that makes the whole software package useless to me.  After filling in the data from my 2005 1099-R form, the program informed me that these monies were taxable in 2003 not 2005, and that these data would not be included in my 2005 return.  I could not find a way overide this problem. Also, there was no apparent way to directly contact H&R Block to find out how to fix it.  After wasting a couple of hours I now have to trash the taxcut software and spend more money to purchase turbo-tax, which from prior years experience is relatively bug free.</review_text>
I got the hang on the 21% and all they could tell me at tech support is to shut down extra services. Well the only services I had running was the security services (firewall and antivirus). As an experiment I tried loading it on two computers set up identically. On one I shut down the antivirus and on the other I shut down the firewall. Neither would install. So I shut down both on both computers and it installed perfectly on both. I cant believe that they want you to shut down security in order to install. Makes me wonder.."What are they hiding that they dont want me to know about". I checked adaware and a registry cleaner and even ran my AV again and found nothing but still... It makes you wonder. Also the layout is very poor, so buggy they have many, MANY patches and updates. Will not print forms correctly and want to charge you fees to e-file when it is free from the governments. They just want more money.In my opinion...DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS CRAP. BY THE TIME YOU WASTE YOUR MONEY ON GETTING THIS TO WORK, YOU CAN GET A PROFESSIONAL TO DO IT FOR YOU FOR LESS</review_text>
Unfortunately, this application includes only a Mac OS 9 (not the Mac OS X as advertised) version.  I cannot review the cds in general, as I cannot run them.  Why did they re-publish the 1998 software in 2006, again in Mac OS 9?  Frustrating</review_text>
This dictionary is not for the person who English is his second language. It does not have enough sentence examples to let you know how to use each entry word. In addtion, the micro doesn't work well with MS Word.</review_text>
I was thoroughly disappointed.  The first few words I looked up in the thesaurus were not listed -- words like upholstery!  When I went online to see what I might be able to glean from their online site, first Fogware had not sent me a coupon, then I had to deal with bad customer service (I am not doing business with any companies anymore that give bad support) then after I finally got the coupon code they had left out of my box, the online info is exactly what we have in the cd -- so save your money and do not subscribe to their extended services site unless you need a spanish online dictionary also!  VERY BAD!  I am now going to go buy Roget's and check it out</review_text>
This is the worst thing I have ever bought. I bought it because I am having some trouble in spanish in school. I bought it thinking that if I gave a english word it would give you the spanish word or vise versa. But all it does is give you the definition and does not give you the english word.So save your self 20 dollars and don't buy thi</review_text>
Although this dictionary's contents are extensive, the screen functions are relics from the DOS era.  They are laborious and clumsy.  To find a word for difinition, it has to be spelled perfectly, there's no list of proximations to the word entered.  Changing a word selection is also clumsy especially in the thesaurus when the cursor doesn't show up in the entry slot. If someone knows of a better software, I'd sure like to hear cause this thing sucks!!  Maria McGowan</review_text>
I have been using FrontPage since 1997.  I am webmaster for three websites and have alway really thought this was a great program!  BUT!  I have only upgraded to FrontPage 2000 and find that with my XP computer, Win XP does not support FrontPage.  Now, if I want to continue with my family Genealogy Site and a community Genealogical Society site, I will need to purchase and learn ANOTHER program.  At age 70, I really don't feel like doing that!Does anyone know if FP 2003 will work on Win XP?  OR  How can I get my FP 2000 to work on my WIN XP computer?</review_text>
I am not a 'professional,' but figured out how to build a website with this program, which I bought thinking that it was going to help me produce more professional-looking websites/pages, and I invested a bunch of other money in how-to books I'd ordered here, and lo and behold, the server with which I have a website I maintain for my city gov't does NOT support any sites made with this program, and then I find that NEITHER DOES YAHOO where I have my personal site and have been promoting to the city to move their official website to!!!  I've apparently wasted a lot of money and had NO CLUE this would happen when I finally put a website together with this program.  I never would have imagined Yahoo would not support the most current page builders, but it could be they want to force people to use their wizards.  WHY would Microsoft not have a patch available or something to fix this problem so this program can be used for more than just my entertainment spending hours and hours trying to learn it and build something, then find out it was for NOTHING???  Of course, both the server with the city website and Yahoo work with versions up to 2002....but I can't invest another over-$100 for the old version now just for that.  Yeah, it's great....made a pretty page, but only I can see it.  If I could publish with it, I wouldn't have just given it one star here</review_text>
I gave this a 2nd star for a support call ms provided.  If you do have a frontpage server, and have it set "on", it had some advantages over ftp.I bought it for use on our family website which is mainly pictures.  I've used 6-8 programs for creating galleries over the years.  I think a perl script using Linux' mogrify worked best.  This works worst!  The free ones w/ the digital cameras beat it.  Frontpage is missing the most fundamental piece to view photos-  A next/previous button.  You can choose from several thumbnail displays including a cool mosaic/colage type thing.  Once you expand it, you must remember the shot you were on, back up, and then click on the next one!  Unbelievable.I know what I need for handling photos efficiently.  Flicr has it- cross-tab indexing of the same photo.  I think picassa is close and getting closer.  This wasn't worth the cost of Picassa- FREE</review_text>
Have tried about six times to install it.  I've followed all of the online troubleshooting advice, all to no avail.  It says it installed with three nonfatal errors and five warnings.  It tells you to check the log.  Well, there are over 85k entries and even if I found the errors I don't see any way to correct the errors. When I try to run it I get "starter MFC Application has encountered a problem and needs to close".  I'll be returning this puppy to Amazon for a replacement</review_text>
i am underwhelmed with the dvd-rom from britannica. it ia a waste of timeand money. their main object is to sell britannica with snatches to createinterest.these dvd-roms should be sent free to arouse interest. i now owntwo dvds and both are unsatisfactory.</review_text>
EB own words: "Unfortunately, at this time the Britannica software is not compatible with Windows Vista. We are working on developing another version of the 2007 software that will work on Windows Vista and we are planning to release this version in the upcoming months. Please check back with us in another month or so and we should have some more information about the Vista-compatible software. But, it is entirely possible that we will not have Windows Vista compatible version of the 2007 product available and that we will wait until the development of the 2008 software." They do NOT offer a reasonable on-line subscription</review_text>
Since most of the complaints are from recent switchers I went ahead and bought this because most of their problems don't apply to me (running on PowerPC, no old data to transfer), and because intuit offers a 60 day money back satisfaction guarantee.  Oh, and i downloaded it from their site, saving like 5 bucks.Here's the thing.  The QFX file that quicken uses to get data from financial institutions is restricted.  My bank offers the download, so i can get the file just fine.  However, part of quicken's import process is an internet check with the bank to see if they "support" mac users.  By support, all that really means is the bank pays quicken to allow mac users to import their QFX files.  If not, you get an error message saying to try the import again later.  There is a hack floating around the 'net that invloves changing some of the text in the QFX file, and it works.  BUT there are cheaper alternatives out there that support the format (moneydance is one) with no fuss.Aside from this issue, the interface is really bad. It looks like a check register.  If I wanted a glorified spreadsheet in the shape of my checkbook, i would have made one.  The program is not even close to intuitive, which means if you dislike/avoid tracking your finances like me this software will scare you away pretty effectively, making your purchase pointless.Lastly, the customer support is really very bad.  You basically get canned responses that don't even really address the questions you ask, in semi-broken English.I'm sure that someone with banks that have mac supported QFX, tons of patience, and is predisposed to dealing with accounting minutiae would find this program useful/powerful.  For me, all the advanced features in the world don't matter if i can't even use the most basic ones</review_text>
I've been using Quicken for Windows for years.  Since I recently bought a Mac, I thought I'd switch Quicken over from Mac to Windows.  Forget it!  The Mac version is totally incompatible with Windows, you must export your data and then re-import it on the Mac.  This works OK for simple checking / Visa accounts, but it **fails completely** for investment or brokerage accounts.  If you look on Quicken's support site, they say "Reinvest Dividend, Reinvest Income and banking transactions in an investment account must be *manually entered*"  Hello?!  Like I'm going to manually enter 12 years of investment transactions?  With most major products (Adobe Creative Suite, MS Office), the same files work transparently across Mac and Windows.  Quicken's inability to even import the data, nevermind actually opening it, reeks of incompetence.  Stay away from this product</review_text>
Intuit charges banks extra to support Mac users, and many banks don't pay.  So the convenience of automated transaction downloads is impossible for me on Quicken Mac.  Several other features are lagging behind the Windows version.  And for some inexplicable reason, transferring data between Quicken for Windows and Quicken for Mac isn't complete or straightfoward.I haven't used competing products, but for Mac users I recommend either running the Windows Quicken version (using Boot Camp or Parallels) or buying another product.  And by all means, let Intuit know that their pricing practices are costing them customers</review_text>
I purchased this product thinking that it would revolutionize my financial organization -but I should have known better after I have started to read all of the product reviews.I can't even give a thorough review, since I can't seem to get past even downloading my savings & checking information from my bank.  The incorrect balances are showing, and the register doesn't show all of the transactions that my banking website shows.  I'm finding that I have to actually check my banking website to cross-check Quicken!  To me, that ain't so quick.I've just spent over 45 minutes on an online "chat" - which was more of a waste of time than anything.  The customer's support suggestions pretty much entailed deleting files, restarting, deleting files, restarting.10 minutes ago, he wrote this:Ashish R.: Thank you.Ashish R.:  Please  give me 2 minutes only.Stacey: I think I would just like to return the product...Stacey: It isn't working...Stacey: are you still there?Stacey: Right...Stacey: Hello?I'm still sitting here waiting.  I want to return this product - DO NOT BUY!</review_text>
I've been using Quicken for over a decade, and I have to admit it is critical to my personal financial management.  But I had no reason to upgrade from Quicken 2004 until Intuit decided to "break" it and force the upgrade by crippling certain features.  Quicken 2007 for Mac's feature set is not significantly different from the 2004 version, much less 2005 or 2006, and is certainly inferior to Quicken for Windows.  That's bad enough but Quicken 2007 is also WAY less stable than my prior version (I'm using the R2 update).  It crashes frequently.  Bottom line, Intuit should be absolutely ashamed of themselves for putting this garbage on the market.  I for one will never buy another one of their products and recommend the same for everyone else out there</review_text>
I have to agree with all these reviews already posted. I was getting error messages for Intuit stating that I would not be able to download stock quotes after a certain date, so I ordered a new copy of Quicken for $50 thinking it would be an upgrade. To my amazement, it is exactly the same as Quicken 04, no real developments. I feel very cheated by Intuit. If 04 was only going to be good for a couple of years, they should have disclosed the fact in the first place. If they are going to squeeze money out of loyal customers, I would at least expect and improved product. They are making a real mistake here, as their credibility is now zip. I have been buying TurboTax every year, and have been a loyal Quicken user for many years, but now I think I will look for something else.</review_text>
